THE  COAST  GUARD’S  REVISED  DEEPWATER 

IMPLEMENTATION  PLAN 

S.  HRG.  109–1096 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES AND THE COAST 

GUARD 
OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JUNE  21,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

62–473 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  FISHERIES  AND  THE  COAST  GUARD 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on June 21, 2005  ...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell 
..............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
................................................................................

Statement of Senator Stevens 

WITNESSES 

Collins,  Admiral  Thomas  H.,  Commandant,  U.S.  Coast  Guard;  Accompanied 
by Rear Admiral Pat Stillman  ............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
O’Rourke,  Ronald,  Specialist  in  National  Defense,  Congressional  Research 
Service  ...................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Wrightson,  Margaret  T.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice,  U.S.  Gov-
ernment Accountability Office  .............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted to Admiral Thomas H. Collins by:  ....
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................
Response to written questions submitted to Ronald O’Rourke by:  ......................
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................
...........
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Margaret T. Wrightson by: 

Page 
1 
7 
7 
6 
6 
1 
3 
6 

8 
10 

38 
40 

19 
22 

68 
66 
63 

88 
86 
83 

80 
78 
74 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

THE  COAST  GUARD’S  REVISED  DEEPWATER 

IMPLEMENTATION  PLAN 

TUESDAY,  JUNE  21,  2005 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES AND THE COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:15  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Olympia  J.  Snowe, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator SNOWE. This hearing will come to order. 
Admiral  Collins  and  Ms.  Wrightson,  and  Mr.  O’Rourke,  I  want 
to  thank  each  of  you  for  testifying  at  this  critical  hearing  on  the 
Coast Guard’s revised Deepwater Implementation Plan. 

I  called  for  this  hearing  today  to  further  examine  the  plan  re-
cently released by the Coast Guard revising how it will implement 
its  Fleet  Recapitalization  Modernization  Project,  known  as  Deep-
water. Congress outlined the actual requirements for this report in 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  Act  for  Fis-
cal  Year  2005.  I  applaud  the  Coast  Guard  for  this—for  an  enor-
mous  record  of  success  across  the  board,  whether  it’s  in  its 
homeland- or non-homeland-security missions. 

And my hearing today is going to focus, essentially, on the ques-
tion  of  whether  or  not  the  service  is  going  to  be  able  to  carry  out 
the  enormous  achievements  and  successes,  long  into  the  future, 
that  has  been  experienced  by  the  Coast  Guard.  And  Deepwater  is 
the future of the Coast Guard. Without the advanced assets and ca-
pabilities  that  this  program  will  provide,  our  mariners  and  coastal 
communities  will  watch  the  benefits  this  service  provides  slowly 
erode.  The  Nation  cannot  afford  to  lose  or  reduce  the  on-water 
presence  of  this  vital  agency,  so  now  is  the  time  for  Congress  and 
the  Administration  to  renew  its  commitment  to  properly  fund  and 
ensure the Coast Guard—that it’s capable of doing all that we ask 
it to do. 

When  the  Congress  called  for  this  report,  we  intended  to  have 
the  Coast  Guard  evaluate  its  needs  and  requirements  in  a  post-9/ 
11  environment.  The  original  Deepwater  proposal  was  developed 
prior to the 9/11 catastrophic events. As we delved into this revised 
plan,  however,  it  becomes  glaringly  obvious  that  it  does  not  meet 
the needs of a post-9/11 threat environment. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

I  am  deeply  disturbed  by  this  stunning  reversal  of  the  Coast 
Guard when I study the figures, and compare the number of ships 
and  planes  that  the  service  originally  desired  to  what  this  revised 
plan  recommends.  For  example,  despite  a  massive  increase  in  the 
Coast Guard’s homeland-security mission, this report does not pro-
pose  increasing  the  number  of  ships  patrolling  our  shores.  Even 
more  disturbing,  is  the  total  number  of  cutters  could  be  less  than 
what  was  originally  planned,  as  displayed  in  this  chart  here  that, 
I believe, gives a strong indication of what this revised plan would 
do,  compared  to  the  request  and  the  recommendations  pre-9/11. 
These figures, in my opinion, are not capable of meeting the signifi-
cant increases in mission responsibilities that the Congress has as-
signed  to  this  service.  There  is  no  logical  methodology  that  would 
reach  these  same  conclusions,  that  I  am  aware  of.  All  of  the  stud-
ies,  both  the  RAND  Center  and  the  Center  for  Naval  Analysis,  in-
dicate  much  higher  numbers  for  surface  and  aviation  assets  are 
needed.  Simply  put,  the  role  of  the  Coast  Guard  in  defending  our 
Nation  has  increased  exponentially,  and  its  available  resources 
should  reflect  this  reality.  And  even  though  the  numbers  in  the 
same  categories  show  an  increase  in  its  numbers  being  procured, 
it must be pointed out that these numbers are much higher due to 
the  use  of  refitted  legacy  assets,  most  of  which  are  being  refitted, 
and not new assets. 

The Coast Guard will tell us today that the assets they are plan-
ning on purchasing will have greater capabilities than the original 
Deepwater  ones;  therefore,  the  argument  is  that  the  Coast  Guard 
does  not  require  as  many  vessels  and  aircraft  because  of  the  new 
capabilities. While the new capabilities and technologies are essen-
tial to accomplishing the service’s mission, they’re a poor substitute 
for actual on-water presence. Capacity is the most important capa-
bility  of  all.  Capability  is  not  the  limiting  factor  for  success.  The 
number  of  ships  is  what’s  limiting  the  performance.  There  is  no 
substitute  for  having  these  assets  on  the  water.  No  question.  It 
helps  to  establish  an  increased  enforcement  presence  for  the  mar-
iner. 

Another  aspect  of  this  report  I  find  equally  disturbing  is  the  ab-
sence of the word acceleration. I, frankly, find it shocking that the 
Coast  Guard  did  not  evaluate  ways  to  shorten  and  expedite  the 
timeframe  for  acquiring  Deepwater  assets.  Again,  the  acceleration 
of this project, in my opinion and the opinion of so many others in 
Congress,  is  desperately  required,  as  the  service  legacy  assets  are 
breaking  at  a  significantly  higher  rate  than  anticipated.  Oper-
ational  mishaps  have  increased,  along  with  unanticipated  mainte-
nance  days.  This  equates  to  ships  being  tied  to  the  pier  for  exten-
sive  periods  of  time,  not  being  underway  in  the  water  patrolling 
our  coasts.  The  Coast  Guard  is  losing  the  equivalent  of  two  major 
cutters each year in lost patrols. 

I  emphasize  security,  as  well,  because,  again,  accelerating  the 
timetable would give American taxpayers a Coast Guard capable of 
meeting  its  vital  security  missions.  We’re  not  talking  about  theo-
retical threats in a distant future. We’re talking about dangers that 
have  become  a  reality  in  this  new  threat  environment,  this  new 
normalcy.  And  this  Nation  requires  a  Coast  Guard  that  can  re-
spond to current and emerging threats. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

I refer you to the second chart, on the performance-gap analysis. 
It demonstrates the actual—in the gray line, the actual legacy deg-
radation; the purple line is the proposed solution in this revised im-
plementation  plan  of  the  Coast  Guard;  and  then  you  see  the  post- 
9/11  Coast  Guard  mission  demands,  at  the  higher  line,  and  what 
it’s  going  to  require,  showing  the  red  line,  to  close  that  gap.  And 
it  continues  to  be  a  growing  and  significant  gap.  We  are  talking 
about  a  post-9/11  environment,  and  yet  that  gap  is  growing  wider 
and wider, even under the Coast Guard’s revised plan. 

The Coast Guard should no longer have to say, ‘‘We can do more 
with less.’’ We have heard that consistently before this Committee, 
time and again. Frankly, I think it’s a phrase that we ought to re-
move from the vocabulary. I well recall a past Commandant saying 
that,  ‘‘Doing  more  with  less  will  evolve  into  doing  everything  with 
nothing.’’  Obviously,  we  all  refuse  to  accept  that  philosophy  and 
that rationale. 

But, Admiral Collins, it clearly does rely on the Congress and the 
Administration—and,  obviously,  you—in  providing  the  necessary 
resources  to  the  men  and  women  who  deserve  quality  assets,  be-
cause  they  perform  life-saving  missions  each  and  every  day,  both 
in  the  non-homeland-  and  homeland-security  responsibilities  and 
obligations, as you well know. So, we need to get to a common un-
derstanding  and  consensus  of  how  we  are  going  to  bridge  this  gap 
under  the  new  proposed  plan  that  you  are  submitting  to  the  Con-
gress.  Frankly,  I  have  some  serious  concerns  about  that,  and  we 
need  to  explore  some  of  those  issues  here  today,  because  I  see  us 
just  extending  this  recapitalization  program  further  and  further 
out into the future. We are talking 20–25 years. And we are going 
to  have  to  put  more  investments  into  the  legacy  assets  that  are 
aging.  I  think  we  are  going  to  compound  some  very  serious  prob-
lems.  So,  we  are  obviously  looking  forward  to  your  testimony  here 
this morning. 

Ms.  Wrightson,  thank  you,  as  well,  for  being  here.  You  certainly 
contribute  enormously  to  this  discussion  in  helping  the  Coast 
Guard  to  meet  its  responsibilities  and  recommendations  based  on 
your invaluable insights. 

And, Mr. O’Rourke, thank you, because you have also contributed 
measurably in shaping and debating national policies affecting our 
national  defense,  our  homeland  security,  and  shipbuilding  pro-
grams, as well. 

And  I  want  to  thank  each  and  every  one  of  you  for  being  here— 
and Admiral Stillman, as well—thank you for being here to provide 
support on a number of issues. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Snowe follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
We have an urgent Coast Guard matter at hand that now demands our attention. 
Admiral  Collins,  Ms.  Wrightson,  and  Mr.  O’Rourke,  I’d  like  to  thank  each  of  you 
for testifying at this critical hearing on the Coast Guard’s Revised Deepwater Imple-
mentation Plan. 

I  also  want  to  thank  my  fellow  Committee  Members  for  attending  this  morning 
and  demonstrating  their  commitment  to  the  future  of  the  United  States  Coast 
Guard.  For  years  and  years,  this  Committee  has  watched  this  military  service  at-
tempt  to  do  more  with  less,  and  this  unsustainable  pattern  has  caught  up  with  us. 
We are here today because this Committee, and this Nation, must understand the 
dire situation in which the Coast Guard now finds itself, regarding its ‘‘Deepwater’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

recapitalization  plan.  Eight  years  ago,  Deepwater  was  conceived  in  the  knowledge 
that the Coast Guard’s aging vessels and aircraft needed to be modernized, and they 
proposed  to  do  this  over  a  20-year  timeline.  At  the  time,  we  thought  this  would  be 
sufficient. 

But  then  on  September  11,  2001,  everything  changed.  Everything,  that  is,  except 
for the Coast Guard’s assessment of how Deepwater would help them meet the new 
terrorist  threats  facing  our  nation.  The  Coast  Guard  recently  issued  a  report  that, 
shockingly,  says  it  actually  needs  fewer  ships,  planes,  and  helicopters  than  before 
9/11. 

That  violation  of  common  sense  is  at  the  crux  of  today’s  hearing.  This  committee 
must  expose  the  heart  of  the  contradictions  before  us,  and  help  the  Coast  Guard 
immediately  correct  its  course.  If  we  let  the  Administration  continue  with  this  way 
of  thinking,  the  foundations  of  Deepwater  will  continue  to  crumble  before  our  eyes. 
I am sure that Admiral Collins will testify that—as always—his men and women 
can  ‘‘get  by’’  with  what  the  Administration  has  requested.  As  admirable  as  that 
stance  is,  however,  the  cold  hard  truth  remains  that  the  Coast  Guard  is  experi-
encing  a  record  number  of  casualties  and  mishaps  like  never  seen  before,  and  it  is 
simply becoming unsafe for our young men and women to serve aboard these aging 
assets.  Catastrophic  engine  failures  and  main  space  casualties  have  risen  at  an 
alarming rate in the fleet. 

Because  my  colleagues  and  I  were  alarmed  to  see  this  chronic  downward  spiral 
of  asset  failures,  we  directed  the  Coast  Guard  to  report  on  how  it  can  reverse  this 
trend. In the Department of Homeland Security Appropriations Act for FY 2005, as 
part  of  our  oversight  for  the  largest  Coast  Guard  acquisition  in  history,  we  called 
for  this  report.  We  knew  that  the  original  Deepwater  plan  was  outdated,  since  it 
was  developed  before  September  11,  2001.  We  intended  to  have  the  Coast  Guard 
evaluate  its  operational  and  asset  requirements  in  a  post-9/11  environment—in 
which  we  have  significantly  greater  knowledge  of  terrorist  attacks  and  other 
threats. 

As we delve into this new plan for revising Deepwater, however, it becomes glar-
ingly obvious that it does not meet the demands of a post-9/11 world. I am stunned 
and disheartened to learn that the Administration tells us that this service may not 
require  as  many  ships  in  the  water  and  airframes  in  the  sky.  They  try  to  justify 
this by saying that the Deepwater assets will have ‘‘greater capabilities’’ than those 
in  the  original  Deepwater  plan.  Therefore,  the  Coast  Guard  says  it  does  not  need 
as many assets. While I agree that new technologies are essential to accomplishing 
the  service’s  missions,  such  capabilities  simply  do  not  substitute  for  actual  on-the- 
water presence. Capacity is the most important capability of all. 

When  I  study  the  figures  in  this  report,  and  compare  the  number  of  assets  that 
the  service  originally  called  for  to  what  this  revised  plan  says,  I  am  overtaken  by 
total  disbelief  to  see  the  Coast  Guard  wants  fewer  ships  and  aircraft.  And  that  is 
relying more and more on simply upgrading its legacy assets, at a time when these 
old  assets  are  failing  more  frequently.  Phrase  it  however  you  would  like . . . or 
cushion  the  numbers  to  create  the  illusion  of  having  more . . . but  nothing  will 
substitute  for  the  fact  that  our  Nation  requires  more  new  assets—along  with  more 
capabilities—in the water and in the air. And we must utilize those assets now. 

Allow me to elaborate. Despite a massive increase in the Coast Guard’s homeland 
security mission, this report does not propose increasing the number of ships patrol-
ling  our  shores.  Even  more  disturbing—the  total  number  of  cutters  could  be  less 
than  what  was  originally  planned.  The  National  Security  Cutter  went  from  6  to  a 
range  of  6–8,  the  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter  remained  the  same  (this  is  the  workhorse 
of the fleet), and the Fast Response Cutter went from 58 to a range of 43–58. These 
figures  are  not  capable  of  meeting  the  expanded  mission  responsibilities  that  Con-
gress has assigned to the service. Simply put, the role of the Coast Guard in defend-
ing  our  Nation  has  increased  exponentially,  and  its  available  resources  should  re-
flect this reality. 

Another  aspect  of  this  report  I  find  equally  disturbing  is  the  total  absence  of  the 
word  acceleration.  I  find  it  shocking  that  the  Coast  Guard  did  not  evaluate  ways 
to  shorten  the  time  frame  for  acquiring  Deepwater  assets.  Completing  Deepwater 
on  a  10  or  15-year  timeline,  would  not  only  offer  a  cost  savings  of  up  to  $4  billion 
over the life the program, it also gives the American taxpayers a Coast Guard capa-
ble  of  meeting  its  vital  security  missions,  sooner  rather  than  later.  The  Coast  even 
conducted  its  own  acceleration  feasibility  study  and  stated  that  acceleration  was 
possible,  it  saved  billions  of  dollars,  and  it  provided  thousands  of  more  operational 
mission hours. 

I emphasize security, because we are not talking about theoretical threats in some 
far-off land . . . the dangers are a reality that we risk facing every day. Therefore, 
as the GAO rightly noted, we need to focus on how well this service is actually per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

forming in its multiple missions. This graph, which the Coast Guard provided, illus-
trates  the  gaps  in  performance  that  the  service  is  experiencing.  This  clearly  shows 
the  inadequacy  of  the  proposed  Deepwater  solution  in  closing  the  performance  gap 
as  a  result  of  the  severe  degradation  of  legacy  assets.  Simply  put,  the  ships  and 
planes  that  have  served  the  Coast  Guard  well  for  so  long  can  no  longer  absorb  the 
pace of operations required to secure this Nation in today’s world. 

Admiral  Collins,  having  served  as  Chairman  of  this  Fisheries  and  Coast  Guard 
Subcommittee  for  more  than  8  years,  I  refuse  to  believe  this  report  reflects  what 
you  want  for  the  young  men  and  women  serving  under  you.  I  strongly  believe  the 
Coast  Guard  serves  as  a  cornerstone  of  our  Department  of  Homeland 
Security . . . and  cornerstones  of  our  national  security  should  not  be  in  the  di-
lemma the Coast Guard now finds itself. 

But  we  would  be  mistaken  to  frame  this  hearing  totally  around  questions  of  na-
tional  security,  because  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  uniquely  positioned  to  perform 
a  wide  variety  of  missions  critical  to  our  Nation’s  maritime  needs.  Last  year  alone, 
the Coast Guard responded to more than 32,000 calls for assistance and saved near-
ly 5,500 lives. These brave men and women prevented 376,000 pounds of marijuana 
and  cocaine  from  crossing  our  borders,  stopped  more  than  11,000  illegal  migrants, 
conducted  more  than  4,500  fisheries  boardings,  and  responded  to  more  than  24,000 
pollution incidents. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  aggressively  defended  our  homeland  as  it  undertook  more 
than  36,000  port  security  patrols,  conducted  19,000  boardings,  escorted  more  than 
7,200  vessels,  and  maintained  more  than  115  security  zones.  The  Coast  Guard  has 
reviewed and approved domestic security plans for 9,580 vessel and 3,119 facilities, 
and they verified security plan implementation on 8,100 foreign vessels. 

We  must  all  take  note  of  these  figures,  because  with  the  current  condition  of  its 
assets  and  the  continued  degradation  of  its  ships  and  planes,  the  Coast  Guard  will 
lose  its  ability  to  maintain  this  impressive  track  record.  For  now,  we  can  still  ap-
plaud  the  Coast  Guard  for  its  success,  but  my  concern  at  this  hearing  focuses  on 
the service’s ability to carry out these achievements and successes long into the fu-
ture. 

And  Deepwater  is  the  future  of  the  Coast  Guard.  Without  the  advanced  assets 
and  capabilities  that  this  program  will  provide,  our  mariners  and  coastal  commu-
nities  will  watch  these  benefits  erode.  The  Nation  cannot  afford  to  lose  or  reduce 
the on-the-water presence of this vital agency . . . because if we do, more lives will 
be  lost  at  sea,  that  is  the  hard  truth.  Now  is  the  time  for  Congress  to  renew  our 
commitment  to  properly  fund  and  ensure  the  Coast  Guard  is  capable  of  doing  all 
that  we  ask  of  it.  It  is  time  to  turn  words  into  action,  so  that  our  Coast  Guard  is 
no longer the 40th oldest of 42 naval fleets in the world, an embarrassing fact that 
I continue to state year after year. 

The  Coast  Guard  should  no  longer  have  to  say,  ‘‘we  can  do  more  with  less.’’  It 
is  time  for  us  to  remove  that  phrase  from  the  Coast  Guard’s  vocabulary,  once  and 
for all. It is unfortunate that a quote I once heard from a past Commandant is com-
ing  true  today . . . that  ‘‘doing  more  with  less  will  evolve  into  doing  everything 
with  nothing.’’  I  refuse  to  accept  this  statement,  which  undercuts  the  very  core  of 
our homeland security. 

Admiral  Collins,  our  Nation  relies  upon  the  Coast  Guard  today  more  than  ever 
before. I intend to ensure you have the necessary resources to carry out the agency’s 
homeland  security  and  traditional  missions  now,  and  for  the  future.  But  I  cannot 
give your men and women the assets they require unless you tell us what the Coast 
Guard  needs,  not  what  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  thinks  the  Coast 
Guard  should  have  based  on  its  budget  models.  Let  me  remind  you  how  the  2004 
Coast  Guard  Authorization  Bill  amended  Section  93  of  title  14  of  the  U.S.  Code: 
after informing the Secretary, the Coast Guard Commandant is authorized to make 
recommendations to Congress as you consider appropriate. Admiral, please use this 
law as we intended. 

Ms. Wrightson, I want to welcome you again to the Senate and thank you for all 
the  service  you  have  provided  us  in  assisting  the  Coast  Guard  in  their  endeavors. 
I look forward to your testimony today. 

Mr.  O’Rourke,  I  welcome  you  to  our  committee  and  look  forward  to  your  testi-
mony. I have read your recent report on the Coast Guard’s Deepwater Program and 
acknowledge  your  expertise  in  the  national  defense,  homeland  security,  and  ship-
building issues facing this Nation. 

Again, welcome. I thank you all for appearing today. 

Chairman Stevens? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
I  was  just  sitting  here  looking  at  that  model  and  wondering 
where  we  can  hang  it  from.  Not  much  room  up  here  on  this  com-
mittee table for that. 

But  I  understand  every  word  that  the  Chair  has  said.  I  think 
that those of you at the table really have been magicians in fitting 
in  the  requirements  in  the  limited  budget  that’s  been  made  avail-
able  to  you.  So,  I  hope  we’ll  all  keep  that  in  mind—and  even  your 
request  for  the  Fiscal  Year  2006,  you’ve  got—anticipated  costs  of 
maintaining  legacy  assets  has  eaten  up  more  than  a  quarter  of 
your Deepwater funding. And we’ve just got to understand that. It’s 
the budget process, not the planning process, that has led us to the 
position  we’re  in.  I  don’t  disagree  with  what  Senator  Snowe  has 
said  at  all,  but  I  do  think  that  it’s  the  same  thing  we’re  facing  in 
the services, we’re facing in many areas, because of the budget con-
straints that we face right now, due to the deficit and the war, that 
we’ve  got  to  find  some  way  to  get  through  this  period  without  de-
stroying  the  future  of  the  Deepwater  Program  or  of  the  overall 
military services. 

So, I look forward to your testimony, and I look forward to work-
ing with Senator Snowe to try to find some way to start the process 
of  reducing  this  sort  of  eating  away  at  the  Deepwater  funding  be-
cause of the increased costs of maintaining an aging fleet. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Co-Chair Inouye? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Madam  Chair,  I  thank  you  very  much.  And  I 

wish to associate myself with your opening remarks. 

May I ask that my statement be made a part of the record? 
Senator SNOWE. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
We  have  waited  a  long  time  for  the  revised  Deepwater  Plan  and  I  look  forward 

to discussing it with our esteemed witnesses. 

The  Deepwater  Program  is  integral  to  the  evolution  of  the  Coast  Guard  in  our 
post-9/11  world.  This  revised  plan  is  the  first  time  we  have  been  able  to  examine 
the Coast Guard’s vision for the future. Because of an aging fleet and expanded re-
sponsibilities, without the Deepwater acquisition, the Coast Guard will soon be con-
strained to meet its safety and security responsibilities. 

There  are  a  couple  of  key  issues  to  consider.  First,  it  is  vital  that  we  help  the 

Coast Guard move forward with Deepwater in a timely manner. 

Second,  we  need  to  know  why  the  20-year  revised  plan  has  a  notable  reduction 
in the number of key assets being requested. I am concerned that reducing the num-
ber  of  requested  cutters  in  the  face  of  increased  need  may  lead  to  problems  down 
the road as we rely more heavily on legacy assets. 

I understand that many assets will have new communications and intelligence ca-
pabilities,  which  should  act  as  ‘‘force  multipliers.’’  However,  even  the  best  of  such 
systems need a threshold level of physical presence to be effective. 

Third, I am told that no simulation has yet been run using the precise mix of as-
sets  and  capabilities  actually  provided  in  the  revised  plan.  Thus,  we  do  not  know 
if the plan will meet the needs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

Fourth,  I  have  concerns  regarding  the  oversight  and  management  of  the  Deep-
water project. The only other major government program using a Lead System Inte-
grator  Approach,  the  Army’s  Future  Combat  System,  is  being  reevaluated  due  to 
concerns with oversight and conflicts of interest. 

I look forward to hearing today about the Coast Guard’s efforts to deal with these 

issues. 

Senator SNOWE. Ranking Member, Senator Cantwell? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Chairwoman  Snowe,  for  holding 
this  important  Committee  hearing  and  discussing  the  Deepwater 
Program of the Coast Guard. 

We,  obviously,  do  rely  on  the  Coast  Guard  for  many  important 
services,  including  fisheries  enforcement,  icebreaking,  and  search 
and  rescue.  And,  obviously,  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission,  when  it 
comes  to  the  expanding  homeland-security  needs  that  we’ve  been 
outlining  as  a  nation,  has  resulted  in  a  25  percent  increase  in  re-
sponsibility  which  seems  to  further  that  Coast  Guard  long-time 
motto of ‘‘do more with less.’’ So, I am sure that if anybody can do 
it,  the  Coast  Guard  can,  yet  the  creativity  and  ingenuity  that’s 
going into the designing of this system-by-system approach is com-
mendable and the acquisition and revitalization of these legacy as-
sets  is  very,  very  challenging.  So,  I  share  some  of  my  colleagues’ 
concerns,  both  on  the  issues  of  acceleration,  but  also  on  the  issues 
that  the  GAO  has  raised  in  recommendations  about  improvement 
and  performance  and  the  prime  responsibilities  for  accountability 
to the outside organizations that are involved in integrating these. 
So,  I  look  forward  to  today’s  hearing  to  hear  about  how  you  are 
integrating  those  GAO  recommendations  and  what  we  need  to  do 
to  make  sure  that  we  are  addressing  some  of  these  challenges  on 
capability  as  we  consider  acceleration  of  Deepwater.  If  we’re  going 
to  continue  to  discuss  acceleration,  how  do  we  have  the  increased 
capability that goes with this particular plan? 

So,  I  look  forward,  Madam  Chairwoman,  to  the  testimony  of  the 
panelists. And I want to make sure that I mention that I do believe 
that  it’s  important  to  look  at  the  oversight  recommendations  by 
GAO. 

So, with that, Madam Chairwoman, thanks again for holding this 

hearing, and I look forward to the testimony. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 
Thank you Senator Snowe, for holding this very important hearing to discuss the 
Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program,  and  the  revised  plan  that  it  recently  submitted 
to Congress. 

The Deepwater Program—the Coast Guard’s major recapitalization of its some 90 
cutters  and  200  aircraft—was  first  conceived  long  before  the  events  of  September 
11, 2001. Even then, the Coast Guard realized the need to significantly upgrade its 
assets,  which  include  some  of  the  oldest  vessels  of  any  Coast  Guard  in  the  world. 
After  September  11,  2001,  the  Coast  Guard’s  traditional  missions  of  law  enforce-
ment,  maritime  safety,  drug  interdiction  and  environmental  protection  were  ex-
panded  to  include  a  much  greater  emphasis  on  homeland  security.  With  operations 
for homeland security increasing by about 25 percent, the Coast Guard’s assets have 
been stretched to the limit. Therefore, I am very pleased that the Coast Guard has 
finally provided us with a new Deepwater plan that will achieve all of its missions, 
including its homeland security missions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

However, I share the concerns of some of my fellow Senators about several aspects 

8 

of the Deepwater Program, and regarding the new plan in particular. 

First, the Coast Guard has not adequately demonstrated that the increased capa-
bility  of  assets  included  in  the  new  plan  will  compensate  for  the  plan’s  reduced  ca-
pacity—particularly  for  the  $19  million,  20-year  plan  that  I  believe  is  the  current 
‘‘going  forward’’  option.  With  the  increased  focus  on  homeland  security,  and  the 
ever-present  need  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  work  in  the  more  traditional  areas,  it  is 
unclear to me that the Coast Guard can continue to achieve more with less. 

Second, I am concerned that the Coast Guard has changed its plans with respect 
to  retiring  certain  older,  ‘‘legacy’’  aircraft—its  C–130  fixed-wing  airplane  and  its 
HH–60 helicopter, which it now intends to retain. 
The  Coast  Guard’s  has  already  experienced  difficulties  that  it  had  not  predicted, 
with  resultant  cost  increases,  in  upgrading  its  old  HH–65  helicopters  and  110′  cut-
ters.  I  wonder  if  the  decision  to  backtrack  on  purchasing  new  assets  for  these  two 
classes  of  aircraft  was  performance  driven,  or  if  rather,  it  was  driven  largely 
through budgetary concerns. 

Finally, I am concerned about whether the Coast Guard is doing all that it should 

to ensure proper management and oversight of this long-term contract. 

The Government Accountability Office (GAO) has long-raised its concerns regard-
ing  the  Coast  Guard’s  decision  to  use  a  non-standard  contract  structure.  In  a  2004 
report,  GAO  found  problems  with  the  lack  of  incentives  for  keeping  costs  down 
under this approach—where the prime contractor makes all ‘‘make or buy’’ decisions 
without the competition required of traditional procurement models. 

It also found serious shortfalls in the Coast Guard’s internal oversight of the pro-
gram.  While  I  recognize  the  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has  made  in  implementing 
these  recommendations,  nine  of  the  eleven  recommendations  remain  unmet  accord-
ing to the GAO. 

I wonder if even these recommendations go far enough, given that the Deepwater 
Program could last for as long as 25 years under a single prime contractor. My col-
league,  Senator  McCain,  recently  raised  similar  concerns  with  an  Army  program— 
the Future Combat System. In that case, following investigation, the Army returned 
to  a  more  traditional  contract  format  with  improved  transparency  and  oversight  of 
the program. 

Admiral  Collins,  I  look  forward  to  your  testimony  today  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  re-
vised Deepwater plan, and hope that my concerns will be addressed. I also look for-
ward  to  the  testimony  of  Ms.  Wrightson  of  GAO,  and  of  Mr.  O’Rourke  of  the  Con-
gressional  Research  Service,  and  hope  that  they  will  have  some  recommendations 
on  how  management  of  this  major  program  can  be  improved,  for  the  benefit  of  the 
Coast Guard, and for the benefit of the American people. 

Finally,  I  thank  our  Chairwoman,  Senator  Snowe,  once  again,  for  holding  this 

hearing today. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Cantwell. 
Admiral Collins, you may begin. Welcome. 

STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS, 

COMMANDANT, U.S. COAST GUARD; 

ACCOMPANIED BY REAR ADMIRAL PAT STILLMAN 

Admiral COLLINS. Well, good morning, distinguished members of 
the Committee and Madam Chairman. It’s a great pleasure for me 
to  be  with  you  here  today  to  address  the  issues  of  our  Deepwater 
Program. 

The  Deepwater  Program  continues  the  recapitalization  of  our 
cutters,  our  boats  and  aircraft,  and  supports  the  infrastructure  to 
reverse  the  declining  readiness  trends  and  improve  the  critical 
operational  capabilities  and  readiness  that  you’ve  mentioned  in 
your opening comments. 

Importantly, it—we are convinced that the system-of-systems ap-
proach  is  the  right  approach.  It  will  create  an  interoperable  sys-
tems  of  capability  that  are  really  force  multipliers  together.  The 
sum  is  greater  than  the  individual  parts.  It  will  help  us  identify 
and intercept threats well before they reach the shore. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

Our  revised  Deepwater  Acquisition  and  Implementation  Plan  is 
a  performance-based—and  I  stress  that—performance-based  and 
goal-driven  roadmap  with  identified  phases,  timelines,  and  target 
completion dates that will enable us to ensure that our cutters and 
aircraft  are  equipped  with  the  right  systems,  the  right  capabilities 
to operate successfully in the post-9/11 environment. 

The  enhanced  capabilities  are  in  the  areas  of  C4ISR,  airborne 
use-of-force,  force-protection  system,  long-range  surveillance  and 
strategic  lift,  and  CBRN  protection.  And  these  enhanced  capabili-
ties  are  absolutely  critical  to  ensuring  the  maritime  security  of 
America  and  its  $750  billion  maritime  transportation  system.  The 
added  capabilities  will  allow  us  to  leverage  our  assets  far  beyond 
the  current  fleet  operational  output.  New  upgraded  interoperable 
C4ISR  capabilities,  for  example,  along  with  airborne  use-of-force, 
will help fuse tracking, surveillance/detection, and classification in-
formation  into  relevant,  usable  common  operating  pictures  that 
operational commanders can deploy to execute their missions more 
effectively. 

These same Deepwater assets and capabilities are integral to the 
Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  perform  its  missions  of  ports,  waterways, 
and coastal security, migrant and drug interdiction, as well as fish-
eries enforcement and search and rescue. 

For  example,  C4ISR—command,  control,  communications,  com-
puters,  intelligence,  surveillance,  and  reconnaissance—these  up-
grades  to  our  current  cutters,  as  well  as  the  airborne  use-of-force 
capabilities,  enabled  cutter  crews  from  the  GALLATIN,  from  the 
RUSH,  and  the  THETIS,  to  collectively  seize  more  than  33,900 
pounds of cocaine last year. Cutter GALLATIN, alone, seized more 
than 24,000 pounds of cocaine, worth $768 million. And, overall, we 
seized  240,000  pound  of  cocaine  last  year,  an  all-time  record  by 
100,000  pounds.  These  achievements  are  a  true  testament  to  the 
value  of  Deepwater  communication  upgrades  and  enhancements. 
Their  installations  on  these  aging  legacy  cutters  played  a  signifi-
cant role in the success here in this particular mission. 

We  are  pleased  with  the  performance  enhancements  realized  to 
date,  and  we  look,  with  great  anticipation,  to  the  productivity  en-
hancements that will be realized in the future, when new construc-
tion and Deepwater assets containing even more robust capabilities 
come into the service later in this decade. 

In  essence,  the  President’s  budget—2006  budget  for  the  Inte-
grated  Deepwater  System—takes  aim  on  transforming  the  Coast 
Guard and stemming the decay of declining readiness trends. It in-
cludes  the  proper  mix  of  legacy  systems,  enhancements,  conver-
sions,  sustainment,  and  platform  or  system  replacement  to  ensure 
an effective transition from legacy systems to new systems over an 
extended  period.  This  is  the  balance  we  have  to  continue  to  work, 
the  balance  between  legacy  investment  and  new-system  invest-
ment. It’s critical to maintaining the right level of operational capa-
bility  now—we  have  to  operate  now—and  over  the  entire  period  of 
the transformation that I’ve referenced. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan,  and  the 
2006 budget, in particular, is about placing the—it is about placing 
the  right  tools  in  the  very  capable  hands  of  Coast  Guard  men  and 
women. And they have shown, time and time again, they know just 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

what  to  do  with  it  when  we  get  this  right.  They  deserve  nothing 
less than our continued support, and we will give it to them. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify today, and I’ll be happy 

to answer questions at the appropriate time. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Admiral Collins follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS, COMMANDANT, 

U.S. COAST GUARD; ACCOMPANIED BY REAR ADMIRAL PAT STILLMAN 

Introduction 

Good morning Mr. Chairman and distinguished members of the Subcommittee. It 
is  a  pleasure  to  have  an  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  discuss  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Integrated  Deepwater  System  and  the  positive  impact  it  will  have  on  the 
Coast Guard’s ability to secure America’s maritime borders, aid persons in distress, 
facilitate  the  safe  and  efficient  flow  of  commerce,  and  respond  to  the  expeditionary 
requirements of U.S. combatant commanders. 

On September 10, 2001, our primary maritime focus was on the safe and efficient 
use  of  America’s  waterways.  Since  9/11,  we  have  made  great  progress  in  securing 
America’s  waterways,  while  continuing  to  facilitate  the  safe  and  efficient  flow  of 
commerce. There is no doubt that work remains, but there is also no doubt that we 
continue  to  improve  maritime  homeland  security  each  and  every  day—thanks  in 
large  part  to  the  continued  strong  budgetary  support  of  the  Administration,  and 
Congress, and certainly this Committee. 

The  Integrated  Deepwater  System—the  centerpiece  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  trans-
formation  and  my  top  capital  priority—plays  an  absolutely  critical  role  in  building 
a more ready and capable 21st century Coast Guard equal to the challenging tasks 
we face today and anticipate tomorrow. 

The  Deepwater  team’s  government-industry  partnership  achieved  many  program 
milestones  during  2004  and  strengthened  Deepwater’s  foundation  by  incorporating 
far-reaching  program  and  contract-management  improvements  in  accordance  with 
recommendations from the Government Accountability Office. 

With the strong support of the Department of Homeland Security (DHS), the Ad-
ministration, and Congress we are positioned to play an even greater role in reduc-
ing  the  future  risk  of  a  terrorist  event  against  the  homeland.  During  the  past  2 
years,  we  have  modernized  select  legacy  assets  to  operate  more  effectively  until  re-
placed by Deepwater assets. Through the revision of the Integrated Deepwater Sys-
tem mission needs statement and implementation plan we have established require-
ments  for  improved  capabilities  on  converted  or  new  Deepwater  platforms  that  are 
necessary for the Coast Guard to perform its full range of post-9/11 missions. 

The  revised  plan,  based  on  a  comprehensive  performance-gap  analysis,  updates 
the  original  pre-9/11  Deepwater  Program  by  modifying  the  original  assets  that 
would have been delivered to incorporate improved post-9/11 capabilities; retaining, 
upgrading, and converting aviation legacy assets as part of the final asset mix; and 
adjusting  the  program’s  overall  asset  delivery  schedule  to  maximize  operational  ef-
fectiveness.  The  Revised  Implementation  Plan  ensures  Deepwater  cutters  and  air-
craft  will  be  equipped  with  the  right  systems  and  capabilities  (summarized  below) 
to  operate  successfully  in  the  post-9/11  threat  environment.  These  enhanced  capa-
bilities  are  absolutely  critical  to  ensuring  the  maritime  security  of  America  and  its 
$750 billion maritime transportation system: 

time domain awareness); 

• Interoperable  network-centric  command-and-control  system  (essential  for  mari-
• Increased speed and integrated weapons systems on select cutters; 
• Helicopter airborne use-of-force and vertical insertion and delivery; 
• Improved fixed-wing aircraft long-range surveillance and transport; 
• Enhanced anti-terrorist and force protection; and 
• Detection-and-defense systems for chemical, biological, and radiological threats. 
Deepwater’s  revised  implementation  plan  is  paramount  in  addressing  the  goals 
that  Secretary  Chertoff  has  established  to  integrate  intelligence  and  operations 
across DHS using a rigorous risk-based framework for decisionmaking. 

Deepwater cutters and aircraft equipped with these capabilities will be leveraged 
far beyond the operational limitations of original Deepwater assets due to recent ad-
vancements  in  maritime  domain  awareness,  intelligence,  and  homeland  security 
partnerships. These advancements, combined with enhanced Deepwater capabilities, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

will enable the Coast Guard to close existing operational shortfalls so it may execute 
its  full  range  of  homeland  security  and  national-defense  missions  far  more  effec-
tively,  reduce  risk  in  the  maritime  domain,  and  improve  the  safety  and  readiness 
of  all  platforms.  The  revised  plan  also  provides  for  the  progressive  sustainment, 
modernization,  and  conversion  of  aging  legacy  assets  as  Coast  Guard  transitions  to 
a recapitalized fleet. 

It is estimated the revised Deepwater long-term acquisition will cost between $19 
billion and $24 billion over a period of 20 to 25 years. Because Deepwater is a per-
formance-based  acquisition,  the  revised  plan  projects  a  range  of  assets  for  the  final 
force levels of two classes of cutters and some aircraft. As stated in the revised im-
plementation  plan,  the  final  number  of  assets  will,  at  a  minimum,  be  sufficient  to 
meet  Department  of  Homeland  Security  and  Coast  Guard  long-range  performance 
goals. 

Since  we  provided  Congress  with  the  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  in 
March,  we  have  had  a  very  constructive  engagement  with  House  and  Senate  over-
sight  committees.  We  have  now  provided  the  Congress  with  details  on  the  revised 
plan’s asset delivery schedules over the life of the program. We fully appreciate the 
role  Congress  plays  in  providing  for  a  21st  century  Coast  Guard  and  its  need  for 
more detailed information upon which to make informed decisions. 

Nearly 3 years ago, President Bush said, ‘‘The U.S. Government has no more im-
portant mission than protecting the homeland from future terrorist attacks.’’ The re-
vised Deepwater Implementation Plan represents a significant investment in ensur-
ing Coast Guard mission performance now and in the future. In short, it will result 
in  a  Coast  Guard  possessing  the  21st  Century  technologies  necessary  to  safeguard 
the Nation, protect our citizens, and reduce the risk of a terrorist attack against the 
Nation originating in the maritime domain. I look forward to further discussing this 
major milestone with you this morning. 

The Coast Guard’s 2006 budget includes $966 million for Deepwater, a 33 percent 
increase  over  last  year’s  appropriation.  This  investment  will  make  important  con-
tributions to the DHS strategic goals of improving threat awareness, prevention and 
protection  against  terrorist  attacks,  and  response  and  recovery  should  they  occur. 
The Deepwater budget’s increased asset funding for 2006 will yield essential sys-
tem-wide capabilities for our maritime homeland security mission and sustain oper-
ational  effectiveness  in  all  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  military,  multi-mission,  and  mari-
time responsibilities. Deepwater aligns completely with my overarching budget goals 
to: (1) recapitalize the Coast Guard, (2) implement the Maritime Strategy for Home-
land Security, and (3) enhance mission performance. 
Reducing Maritime Risk 

Today’s  global  maritime  safety  and  security  environment  demands  a  new  level  of 
operations  specifically  directed  against  terrorism  without  degrading  other  critical 
maritime safety and security missions. Most importantly, the Coast Guard must im-
plement  the  improved  Deepwater  capabilities  identified  in  our  revised  implementa-
tion  plan  if  we  are  to  mitigate  maritime  security  risks  successfully  in  the  post- 
9/11 world. 

Secretary of Homeland Security Chertoff has emphasized that the three variables 
of threat, vulnerability, and consequence serve as the appropriate model for assess-
ing  risk  and  deciding  on  the  protective  measures  we  undertake  as  a  nation.  This 
is a framework quite familiar to Coast Guard men and women who perform multiple 
missions  in  our  Nation’s  ports,  waterways,  coastal  areas,  and  on  the  high  seas.  In 
terms of threat, vulnerability, and consequence there are few more valuable targets 
than the U.S. maritime transportation system: 

• Threat:  While  the  9/11  Commission  notes  the  continuing  threat  against  our 
aviation  system,  it  also  states  that  ‘‘opportunities  to  do  harm  are  as  great,  or 
greater, in maritime or surface transportation.’’ 
• Vulnerability:  The  maritime  transportation  system  annually  accommodates  6.5 
million  cruise  ship  passengers,  51,000  port  calls  by  over  7,500  foreign  ships,  at 
more  than  360  commercial  ports  spread  out  over  95,000  miles  of  coastline.  The 
vastness  of  this  system  and  its  widespread  and  diverse  critical  infrastructure 
leave  the  Nation  vulnerable  to  terrorist  acts  within  our  ports,  waterways,  and 
coastal zones, as well as exploitation of maritime commerce as a means of trans-
porting terrorists and their weapons. 
• Consequence:  Contributing  nearly  $750  billion  to  U.S.  gross  domestic  product 
annually  and  handling  95  percent  of  all  overseas  trade  each  year,  the  value  of 
the U.S. maritime domain and the consequence of any significant attack cannot 
be  understated.  Independent  analysis  and  recent  experiences  on  9/11  and  the 
West  Coast  dock  workers  strike  demonstrates  an  economic  impact  of  a  forced 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

closure  of  U.S.  ports  for  a  period  of  only  8  days  in  excess  of  $58  billion  to  the 
U.S. economy. 

The 9/11 Commission also drew a strong linkage between improved defenses with 
the  government’s  ability  to  reduce  the  risk  of  a  terrorist  attack—a  linkage  that  re-
lates directly to the imperative to recapitalize the Coast Guard through an increas-
ingly capable Deepwater system of systems. The Commission reported: 

‘‘Our  report  shows  that  the  terrorists  analyze  defenses.  They  plan  accordingly. 
Defenses cannot achieve perfect safety. They make targets harder to attack suc-
cessfully, and they deter attacks by making capture more likely. Just increasing 
the  attacker’s  odds  of  failure  may  make  the  difference  between  a  plan  at-
tempted, or a plan discarded. The enemy also may have to develop more elabo-
rate  plans,  thereby  increasing  the  danger  of  exposure  or  defeat.  Protective 
measures  also  prepare  for  the  attacks  that  may  get  through,  containing  the 
damage and saving lives.’’ 

Since  9/11,  the  President,  DHS,  and  the  Coast  Guard  have  made  significant 
strides  to  secure  our  homeland  by  instituting  these  types  of  protective  measures  to 
help  deter  attacks  in  the  maritime  domain.  However,  maritime  safety  and  security 
gaps remain. These gaps present risks that must be reduced. 

The  Coast  Guard  guides  its  efforts  by  implementing  policies,  seeking  resources, 
and deploying capabilities through the lens of the national Maritime Security Strat-
egy.  However,  continued  risk  reduction  is  contingent  upon  Coast  Guard  capability, 
capacity,  and  readiness.  Without  these  basic  building  blocks,  implementation  of 
maritime security strategies will not be sustainable. With that in mind, my highest 
priority  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  2006  budget  is  to  continue  to  recapitalize  the  Coast 
Guard  as  a  necessary  foundation  to  implementing  the  maritime  security  strategy, 
as  well  as  ensuring  we  continually  enhance  mission  performance  across  the  entire 
suite of Coast Guard mission requirements. 

Recapitalizing  the  Coast  Guard  is  the  foundation  of  our  ability  to  continue  im-
proving maritime security while facilitating the flow of commerce. It is on this foun-
dation that the 2006 budget continues to build out Coast Guard Deepwater capabili-
ties  necessary  to  reduce  risk  and  implement  the  national  maritime  strategy  for 
homeland security—today, tomorrow, and into the future. 

The  2006  Deepwater  budget  continues  the  recapitalization  of  our  cutters,  boats, 
aircraft and support infrastructure to reverse declining readiness trends and provide 
critical operational capabilities to meet today’s maritime security and safety threats. 
As  detailed  in  the  National  Strategy  for  Homeland  Security,  this  remains  a  critical 
need in protecting the homeland. 
Recapitalize the Coast Guard 

Despite  spending  increasing  amounts  to  maintain  operational  assets,  the  Coast 
Guard  is  experiencing  a  continuing  decline  in  fleet  readiness.  Legacy  cutters  are 
now  operating  free  of  major  equipment  casualties  (equipment  failures  that  signifi-
cantly impact mission performance) less than 50 percent of the time, despite the in-
vestment  per  operational  day  increasing  by  over  50  percent  over  the  last  6  years. 
The  resulting  ‘‘readiness  gap’’  negatively  impacts  both  the  quantity  and  quality  of 
Coast Guard ‘‘presence’’—critical to our ability to accomplish all missions. 
Readiness Declining 

The majority of the Coast Guard’s operational assets, designed for the threat envi-
ronment of the 1960s and 1970s, will soon reach the end of their anticipated service 
lives resulting in rising operating and maintenance costs, reduced mission effective-
ness,  unnecessary  risks.  Listed  below  are  some  specific  examples  highlighting 
alarming system failure rates, increased maintenance requirements, and the subse-
quent impact on mission effectiveness: 

• HH–65  helicopter  in-flight  engine  power  losses  occurred  at  a  rate  of  329  mis-
haps per 100,000 flight hours in Fiscal Year 2004. This is up from a Fiscal Year 
2003  rate  of  63  mishaps  per  100,000  flight  hours.  The  engine-loss  rate  has  re-
sulted  in  flight  and  operational  restrictions  and  high  levels  of  risk  to  our  air-
crews.  Re-engining  the  HH–65  will  remain  the  Coast  Guard’s  highest  legacy 
asset  priority  until  complete.  We  greatly  appreciate  Congress’  support  in  cor-
recting  this  critical  safety  and  reliability  issue,  including  transferring  an  addi-
tional  $40  million  into  Deepwater  to  accelerate  this  re-engining  effort  in  Fiscal 
Year  2005.  The  2006  budget  requests  $133  million  to  complete  re-engining  of 
the remaining operational HH–65s. 
• The  110-foot  patrol  boat  fleet  has  experienced  23  hull  breaches,  or  openings  in 
the  hull  from  corrosion,  requiring  emergency  dry  docks.  The  resultant  loss  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

operational days poses unacceptable risks to our personnel. By the end of 2005, 
the  Coast  Guard  will  have  taken  delivery  of  eight  reconfigured  123-foot  patrol 
boats,  which  are  upgraded  110-foot  patrol  boats  designed  to  sustain  this  cutter 
class until replacement with the Integrated Deepwater System’s Fast Response 
Cutter. 
Last  month,  I  directed  that  Deepwater’s  conversion  of  110-ft.  patrol  boats  be 
terminated  at  eight  hulls  for  several  reasons.  First,  the  pre-9/11  design  for  the 
123-foot  patrol  boats  did  not  provide  needed  homeland  security  capabilities 
called  for  in  the  revised  Deepwater  mission  need  statement.  Second,  the  ad-
vanced deterioration of the 110-foot patrol boat hulls, increased costs associated 
with conversion and technical difficulties were also significant parts of this deci-
sion.  Several  steps  have  been  taken  to  mitigate  the  near-term  operational  im-
pact  of  this  termination.  For  the  long  term,  the  Coast  Guard  has  advanced  the 
design and construction of the new Fast Response Cutter by a full decade. The 
revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  builds  improved  post-9/11  capabilities 
into this cutter’s design and delivers it far sooner than originally planned. 
• Our  high  and  medium  endurance  cutters  are  experiencing  sub-system  failures 
due  to  old  and  unserviceable  systems.  The  378-foot  high  endurance  fleet  aver-
ages  one  main  space  casualty,  with  potential  to  escalate  to  main  space  fire,  on 
every  patrol.  Three  out  of  a  total  class  of  12  ships  have  recently  missed  oper-
ations  due  to  unscheduled  maintenance  required  to  repair  failing  sub-systems. 
The  total  number  of  unscheduled  maintenance  days  for  the  major  cutter  (me-
dium  and  high  endurance  cutters)  fleet  has  increased  from  85  days  in  Fiscal 
Year  1999  to  358  days  in  Fiscal  Year  2004  (over  a  400  percent  increase  over 
Fiscal Year 1999). This loss of operational cutter days in 2004 equates to losing 
two  major  cutters,  or  5  percent  of  our  major  fleet  for  an  entire  year.  The  2006 
budget includes funding for six mission effectiveness projects to help sustain the 
medium endurance cutter fleet, and funds construction of the third National Se-
curity  Cutter,  the  replacement  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  high  endurance  cutter 
class. 

These same Deepwater assets are integral to the Coast Guard’s ability to perform 
its  missions  of  ports,  waterways,  and  coastal  security;  migrant-  and  drug-interdic-
tion  operations;  fisheries  enforcement,  and  search  and  rescue.  In  2004,  Deepwater 
legacy  assets  made  invaluable  contributions  to  America’s  maritime  security  and 
safety: 

• Operation  ABLE  SENTRY  blanketed  the  coastline  of  Haiti  with  legacy  Coast 
Guard  Deepwater  assets,  which  interdicted  more  than  1,000  illegal  migrants 
during  this  operation  and  deterred  many  thousand  more  from  taking  to  sea  in 
unsafe boats. 
• The  378-foot  Coast  Guard  cutter  GALLATIN,  and  its  Airborne-Use-of-Force- 
(AUF)  capable  helicopter  seized  more  than  24,000  pounds  of  cocaine  worth  an 
estimated  $768  million  and  detained  27  suspected  smugglers  in  the  span  of  7 
weeks. The GALLATIN’s commanding officer has indicated that the secure-com-
munications  improvements  made  by  the  Deepwater  Program  were  key  to  this 
effort. 
• The  Coast  Guard’s  aging  Deepwater  cutters  and  aircraft  patrolled  over  28,000 
hours in direct support of maritime homeland security missions. 110-foot patrol 
boats alone patrolled 13,000 hours supporting port and coastal security missions 
including,  cruise  ship  escorts,  critical  infrastructure  protection,  and  countless 
security boardings. 
• Working  in  conjunction  with  the  U.S.  Secret  Service  during  the  national  polit-
ical  conventions,  270-foot  medium  endurance  cutters  and  110-foot  patrol  boats 
provided  maritime  security,  enforced  security  zones,  and  served  as  command 
and  control  platforms  coordinating  maritime  traffic.  Deepwater  aircraft, 
equipped  with  the  AUF  package,  provided  air  security  and  conducted  maritime 
security patrols. 

Deepwater’s  modernization  and  recapitalization  of  the  Coast  Guard  includes  ef-
forts  to  sustain  these  legacy  assets  to  continue  to  perform  the  Coast  Guard’s  mis-
sions  while  replacement  assets  are  being  acquired.  These  sustainment  and  in  some 
cases upgrading efforts are already beginning to yield results at sea: 

• On February 13, the crew of the 123-foot cutter MATAGORDA, on its first oper-
ational  patrol  following  a  major  conversion  as  part  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deep-
water  Program,  played  an  instrumental  role  in  intercepting  a  smuggler’s  boat 
attempting 
illegally. 
MATAGORDA, outfitted with a more capable command-and-control system dur-

to  bring  25  Cuban  migrants 

into 

the  country 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

ing  its  recent  Deepwater  upgrade,  assumed  the  role  of  on-scene  commander  in 
the  Florida  Straits  to  coordinate  the  interdiction  effort.  After  a  long  chase  the 
smuggling  boat  was  safely  stopped  two  miles  south  of  the  Dry  Tortugas.  The 
smugglers were turned over to Customs and Border Protection officials, and all 
of  the  migrants  were  repatriated  to  Bahia  de  Cabanas,  Cuba,  on  February  14. 
• Late  last  year,  crews  on  the  Coast  Guard  cutters  GALLATIN,  RUSH,  and 
THETIS  collectively  seized  more  than  33,949  pounds  of  cocaine  during  law-en-
forcement  deployments—continuing  the  Coast  Guard’s  record-setting  pace  es-
tablished  during  Fiscal  Year  2004  when  240,518  pounds  of  cocaine  were  seized 
(shattering  the  previous  record  of  139,000  pounds  interdicted  in  2001).  Deep-
water  communication  upgrades  and  previous  enhancements  installed  on  these 
aging legacy cutters played a major role in their success, because the operations 
involved  multiple  cutters,  Federal  agencies,  and  foreign  countries—mandating 
seamless  connectivity  and  high  levels  of  interoperability  between  all  partici-
pants. 

In  each  of  these  recent  operations,  the  Deepwater  Program’s  C4ISR  (command, 
control,  communications,  computers,  intelligence,  surveillance,  and  reconnaissance) 
upgrades allowed cutter crews to maintain a common operational picture and higher 
levels  of  maritime  domain  awareness  (MDA).  The  upgrades  included  provisions  for 
first-time  use  of  a  classified  Local  Area  Network  and  the  Secure  Internet  Protocol 
Router  Network  (SIPRNET),  which  commanding  officers  attribute  to  ‘‘revolution-
izing their world of work’’ because it affords crew access to real-time intelligence in-
formation  and  Department  of  Defense  satellite  imagery  during  current  operations, 
as  well  as  increased  speed  and  size  of  transmission  through  compressed  bandwidth 
capability. 

As  gratifying  as  these  early  demonstrations  of  the  efficacy  of  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram’s  acquisition  strategy  may  be,  they  are  but  a  harbinger  of  what  the  future 
holds  when  new-construction  Deepwater  assets  possessing  more  robust  capabilities 
begin to enter service later this decade. 

The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  for  the  Integrated  Deepwater  System 
takes  aim  on  reversing  the  Coast  Guard’s  declining  readiness  trends  and  trans-
forming  the  Coast  Guard.  The  budget’s  level  of  investment  in  the  Integrated  Deep-
water  System  provides  the  Coast  Guard  with  the  capability  and  capacity  essential 
to meet our Nation’s maritime homeland security needs; providing a layered defense 
throughout  ports,  waterways,  coastal  regions  and  extending  far  offshore,  as  well  as 
sustaining  other  mission  area  efforts,  such  as  search  and  rescue  and  living  marine 
resources.  Specifically,  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  President’s  budget  requests  $966  mil-
lion for the Integrated Deepwater System to: 

• Continue  acquisition  of  Eagle  Eye  tiltrotor  Vertical-Takeoff-and-Landing  Un-
manned  Aerial  Vehicles  (VUAVs),  including  mission  sensor  packages  and 
ground control technology; 

Cutter (NSC); 

Patrol Cutter (OPC); 

copters and HC–130H aircraft; 

• Complete re-engining of all operational HH–65 helicopters; 
• Complete  service-life  extension,  avionics,  and  radar  upgrades  for  HH–60  heli-
• Procure  long-lead  material  for  and  production  of  the  third  National  Security 
• Complete  design  and  procurement  of  long-lead  material  for  the  first  Offshore 
• Conduct testing and evaluation of the first Fast Response Cutter (FRC); 
• Complete  mission  effectiveness  projects  on  six  Medium  Endurance  Cutters 
(WMECs) to sustain these cutters until they can be replaced with the OPC; and 
• Continue  innovative,  interoperable  network-centric  C4ISR  system  upgrades  to 
improve maritime domain awareness and provide a common operational picture. 
Funding  included  for  legacy  asset  sustainment  projects,  such  as  HH–65  re- 
engining and WMEC mission effectiveness projects, is critical to sustain capabilities 
today, while the acquisition of new and enhanced Deepwater assets will ensure the 
Coast Guard has the right capabilities tomorrow. 
Revised Post-9/11 Deepwater Implementation Plan 

The  events  of  September  11,  2001,  have  changed  the  performance  requirements 
for Coast Guard people and the assets they use. The original Deepwater system de-
signed  for  September  10,  2001,  simply  could  not  do  all  that  would  be  required  of 
it after September 11, 2001. 

The Coast Guard began to adjust Deepwater shortly after the contract was award-
ed in June 2002 by modifying the capabilities required of the first major new asset, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

the  NSC.  These  changes  are  included  in  the  current  updated  baseline  and  will  en-
able  the  first  NSC,  now  slated  for  delivery  in  2007,  to  conduct  maritime  homeland 
security missions. 

In  March,  together  with  Secretary  and  Mrs.  Chertoff,  I  participated  in  the  keel- 
laying  ceremony  for  our  first  NSC.  Mrs.  Chertoff,  the  cutter’s  sponsor,  noted  that 
she looked forward to the day when American families can rest a little easier know-
ing  that  the  men  and  women  of  the  Coast  Guard  are  conducting  missions  up  and 
down the coasts of our Nation in this fine ship. I agree wholeheartedly. 

The  keel  laying  for  the  first  hull  in  our  new  class  of  NSCs  marked  a  significant 
milestone in the Integrated Deepwater System’s transformation of the Coast Guard 
for  our  21st-century  missions.  Like  other  Deepwater  cutters,  aircraft,  and  systems, 
the NSC will play a major role in safeguarding the maritime security of our Nation 
for many years to come. 

Along  with  the  immediate  changes  to  the  NSC’s  design  specifications,  DHS  and 
the  Coast  Guard  recognized  the  need  to  conduct  a  thorough  review  of  the  plans  for 
all  Deepwater  assets.  Changes  to  the  national  strategic  security  environment  after 
9/11 necessitated modifications to the Deepwater Program focused on defeating ter-
rorist  threats,  addressing  contemporary  mission  demands,  and  satisfying  current 
and emergent operational priorities. 

The revised Integrated Deepwater System mission need statement and implemen-
tation  plan  were  developed  following  a  comprehensive,  year-long  analysis  of  the 
Coast Guard’s post-9/11 mission requirements. 
Capability 

The revised plan addresses the Coast Guard’s dual challenges of legacy-asset dete-
rioration  and  performance  gaps  by  enhancing  the  performance  of  selected  Deep-
water  assets  through  added  capabilities  and  conversions,  including  C4ISR  systems; 
adjusting  the  implementation  schedule  and  mix  of  individual  assets  over  the  life  of 
the program; and providing necessary balance over the life of the program based on 
the DHS strategic goals, current and emerging mission requirements, and the need 
to provide for a high-quality workplace for Coast Guard men and women. 

The  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  updates  the  original  plan  by:  (1) 
modifying  the  original  assets  that  would  have  been  delivered  by  the  Deepwater 
project to incorporate design requirements for improved post-9/11 capabilities; (2) re-
taining,  upgrading,  and  converting  aviation  legacy  assets  (C–130s,  H–60s,  H–65s) 
as part of the final asset mix; and (3) adjusting the program’s overall asset delivery 
schedule  (e.g.,  advancing  delivery  of  the  FRC  and  OPC  by  ten  and  5  years  respec-
tively) to maximize operational effectiveness. 

Specific operational enhancements contained in the revised Integrated Deepwater 

Systems implementation plan include: 

• An  innovative,  integrated  network-centric  C4ISR  system  to  harness  the  power 
of  an  interoperable  network  to  enhance  performance  in  all  mission  areas,  im-
prove  MDA,  and  provide  a  common  operational  picture—key  to  Coast  Guard 
leading  the  inter-agency  effort  to  know  and  respond  to  maritime  conditions, 
anomalies,  vulnerabilities,  and  threats.  Improvements  to  C4ISR  enable  earlier 
awareness  of  events  through  the  more  effective  gathering  and  fusing  of  ter-
rorism-related  information,  analysis,  coordination,  response—all  critical  to  de-
tecting,  deterring,  and  defeating  terrorist  attacks.  Upgrades  to  Deepwater  sur-
face  assets,  for  example,  contribute  directly  to  improved  intelligence  collection 
and  fusion  through  a  sophisticated  Shipboard  Sensitive  Compartmentalized  In-
formation Facility (S/SCIF), sensors, and increased data-exchange bandwidth; 
• Improved maritime-security capabilities such as increased speed and integrated 
weapons  systems  on  selected  Deepwater  cutters  essential  to  higher  levels  of 
maritime  homeland  security  during  a  terrorist  attack,  opposed  boardings,  and 
other high-risk operations; 
• Airborne  use-of-force  and  vertical  insertion  and  delivery  capabilities  to  allow 
helicopters to provide warning and/or disabling fire, and to deploy, deliver, and 
recover boarding teams safely and more effectively; 
• Improved  fixed-wing  aircraft  long-range  surveillance  to  increase  MDA  and  re-
duce maritime patrol aircraft shortfalls in operating hours; organic Coast Guard 
air transport capability will enable deployment of Maritime Safety and Security 
Teams and National Strike Force teams for faster, more effective response; 
• Improved  capabilities  for  anti-terrorist/force  protection  on  select  Deepwater  as-
sets  with  all-weather  self-defense  and  the  ability  to  protect  high-value  assets; 
assets will have the capability to engage terrorists with higher assurance of sur-
vivability and continued mission capability; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

• Improved  asset  capabilities  for  detection  and  defense  for  chemical-biological-ra-
diological (CBR) threats—essential to survival and continued operations during 
a CBR attack involving a weapon of mass destruction. 

These  are  ‘‘must-have’’  capabilities  in  today’s  threat  environment  and  the  Nation 
would  be  remiss  to  build  out  a  Coast  Guard  without  them.  Consider  the  96  hour 
advanced  notice  of  arrival  requirement  for  vessels  arriving  in  U.S.  ports—just  one 
of the many improvements to maritime security resulting from the landmark Mari-
time  Transportation  Act  of  2002.  This  reporting  requirement  enables  the  Coast 
Guard  to  identify  threats  before  they  enter  our  ports  where  they  can  do  the  most 
harm.  The  revised  post-9/11  capabilities  listed  above  enable  the  Coast  Guard  to  re-
spond  quickly  and  forcefully  to  neutralize  these  threats  before  they  enter  our  Na-
tion’s ports, waterways and coastal areas. 

The revised implementation plan maximizes existing capabilities by calling for the 
conversion of H–60 and H–65 airframes to serve as multi-mission helicopters. Again, 
this  is  a  prudent  and  reasonable  investment  decision  reflecting  the  many  years  of 
experience we have operating and maintaining these aircraft. 

The  rigorous  periodic  depot-level  maintenance  process  addresses  corrosion  and 
technology obsolescence issues on a recurring basis. When these helicopters are con-
verted,  the  airframes  will  be  taken  apart  down  to  the  structural-component  level 
based  on  a  standard  maintenance  cycle.  In  addition  to  planned  technical  upgrades, 
strict specifications govern the requirement for refurbishment or replacement of air-
craft components. 

Deepwater’s original implementation plan proposed by ICGS recognized the Coast 
Guard’s ability to sustain aircraft indefinitely provided sufficient funding was avail-
able for necessary maintenance, repairs, and periodic system upgrades. In the origi-
nal plan, the H–65 was selected for the final Deepwater force structure as a multi-
mission cutter helicopter (MCH), and the H–60 was to be retained through at least 
2022.  Under  the  new  plan  both  helicopters  have  been  selected  for  the  final  Deep-
water force structure. 

The  H–65  re-engining  is  well  underway,  setting  the  stage  for  the  additional  up-
grades  identified  in  the  revised  implementation  plan.  Earlier  this  month,  Coast 
Guard  Air  Station  Atlantic  City,  NJ,  accepted  its  fifth  re-engined  aircraft,  and  one 
was delivered to Coast Guard Air Station Savannah, GA. 
Capacity 

The  Deepwater  system’s  performance-based  acquisition  strategy  allows  the  Coast 
Guard to respond to changing conditions and threats, and provides a vehicle for ca-
pability  and  schedule  adjustments  over  the  life  of  the  program—maximizing  value 
and  performance  through  technology  refreshment  and  innovation.  For  example,  ca-
pability improvements incorporated at both the asset and system level in the revised 
implementation  plan  resulted  in  adjusting  the  original  mix  of  some  platforms. 
Owing to planned increases in C–130 aircraft for long-range surveillance and trans-
port,  for  example,  it  is  possible  to  adjust  the  number  of  CASA  CN–235  aircraft 
(MRS) originally planned for the program. 

Similarly,  the  AB–139  helicopter,  originally  proposed  by  Integrated  Coast  Guard 
Systems  (ICGS)  as  a  notional  future  platform,  was  determined  not  to  possess  the 
endurance  and  power  necessary  to  meet  post-9/11  requirements  such  as  the  need 
to  transport  six-member  boarding  teams,  plus  equipment,  for  vertical  insertions  to 
ships  at  ranges  up  to  200  nautical  miles  from  a  cutter  or  shore  station;  it  also  did 
not  meet  other  requirements  associated  with  airborne  use-of-force  and  operating  in 
known icing conditions. Existing Coast Guard H–60 helicopters are capable of meet-
ing  these  requirements  and  also  have  a  mature  logistics  and  training  base  in  the 
armed forces that we may leverage. 

The flexibility inherent in Deepwater’s acquisition will enable the Coast Guard to 
adjust the final mix of selected platforms as overall system-of-systems capability im-
provements  are  generated  by,  for  example,  significant  improvements  to  the  pro-
gram’s system for C4ISR or Unmanned Aerial Vehicle technology. 

Legitimate  questions  have  been  raised  regarding  our  decision  to  project  a  range 
for the numbers of some assets—the system’s capacity—when the Deepwater acqui-
sition is completed some 20 to 25 years from now under current funding projections. 
It is very difficult to predict today, with precise accuracy, what the optimum mix 
of Deepwater assets will be 15, 20, or 25 years from now. For that reason, our long- 
range  projection  for  the  acquisition  depicts  a  range  of  numbers  for  five  of  our  11 
Deepwater assets. From its inception, Deepwater has been a performance-based pro-
gram.  The  final  mix  of  assets  and  fleet  size  will  be  based  on  assessments  of  our 
threat  environment,  mission  requirements,  the  actual  performance  of  each  asset, 
and  the  overall  Deepwater  system  of  systems’  performance.  This  approach  is  both 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

consistent with our long-range acquisition strategy and reflects good stewardship of 
the taxpayer’s dollars. 

A  more  complete  explanation  of  the  Deepwater  acquisition  strategy  helps  to  ex-
plain  the  rationale  behind  the  projected  range  of  asset  numbers.  In  short,  more  ca-
pable  assets  will  be  able  to  do  a  great  deal  more  than  those  reflected  in  the  pre- 
9/11  Deepwater  construct—just  as  modern  power  tools  and  materials  enable  a  car-
penter to build a home in a shorter amount of time than the days when hand saws 
and hammers were the norm. 

We  believe  our  plan  to  incorporate  improved  post-9/11  operational  capabilities  on 
all  major  surface  and  aviation  platforms  will  reap  significant  system-wide  perform-
ance improvements that will have a bearing on capacity requirements. In the world 
of  C4ISR,  for  example,  we  have  already  seen  how  command-and-control  upgrades 
to  our  legacy  cutters  serve  as  a  force  multiplier  to  generate  impressive  dividends 
in  operational  effectiveness  and  efficiency.  Armed  with  earlier,  more  accurate,  and 
continuously  streamed  intelligence  and  operational  data  to  maintain  a  common  op-
erating picture, commanders can employ their assets far more effectively than in the 
past. 

The Coast Guard faces the same resource constraints as every other Federal agen-
cy  today,  and  it  would  be  a  breach  of  responsible  stewardship  to  acquire  additional 
capacity  if  a  smaller  force  is  able  to  satisfy  our  long-term  performance  goals.  We 
will not know the answer to that question for a number of years. Deepwater’s final 
number and mix of assets will, at a minimum, be sufficient to meet DHS and Coast 
Guard long-term performance goals. The program’s alternative acquisition schedules 
provide far more meaningful vehicles for assessing the program’s current and future 
direction. 

For  this  reason,  our  emphasis  to  identify  and  incorporate  the  correct  design  re-
quirements for the many improved capabilities needed to perform the Coast Guard’s 
post-9/11 missions is the correct priority at this point in the Deepwater acquisition. 
We will have many years to adjust Deepwater’s final capacity based on the system’s 
actual  performance,  changes  to  mission  requirements,  and  the  future  threat  envi-
ronment. 
A Year of Achievement 

As  part  of  our  efforts  to  enhance  mission  performance,  it  is  appropriate  to  ac-
knowledge  that  Deepwater’s  Coast  Guard-industry  team  marked  numerous  impor-
tant  milestones  during  2004.  Beyond  the  past  year’s  success  story  of  C4ISR  up-
grades  to  legacy  cutters,  Deepwater’s  C4ISR  shore-side  upgrade  was  completed  in 
2004,  at  the  Communications  Area  Master  Station  Pacific  (CAMSPAC)  facility  at 
Point  Reyes,  Calif.  The  first  shore-based  IDS  communications  upgrade  was  com-
pleted in 2003 at Communications Area Master Station Atlantic (CAMSLANT). 

As I discussed, we laid the keel for our first NSC in late March. The contract for 
that  cutter  was  awarded  just  last  June  to  Integrated  Coast  Guard  Systems  (ICGS, 
a  joint  venture  between  Lockheed  Martin  and  Northrop  Grumman).  The  Coast 
Guard’s  contract  for  the  second  cutter  in  the  class  was  awarded  to  ICGS  in  early 
January.  Northrop  Grumman  Ship  Systems  is  leading  the  production  effort,  with 
Lockheed  Martin  responsible  for  the  design,  manufacture,  and  integration  of  the 
cutter’s systems for C4ISR. From start-up to keel laying in a little less than 2 years, 
this is an impressive achievement. 

Also  last  June,  the  Coast  Guard  awarded  a  contract  to  ICGS  to  begin  the  design 
and final requirements work for the OPC, Deepwater’s medium-sized cutter. The de-
sign  and  final  requirements  for  the  third  class  of  Deepwater  cutters,  the  FRC,  also 
will move forward smartly in 2005. 

There also was steady progress in Deepwater’s modernization and recapitalization 
of  Coast  Guard  aviation  assets  last  year.  For  example,  the  first  production  re- 
engined  HH–65  helicopter  incorporating  Deepwater  upgrades  completed  its  test 
flights  successfully  in  September  and  entered  full  operational  service  at  Aviation 
Training  Center,  Mobile,  Alabama,  in  early  October.  We  are  evaluating  the  feasi-
bility of opening a second production line to allow the Coast Guard to accelerate this 
critical  upgrade  on  our  HH–65s,  mindful  of  their  reputation  as  the  ‘‘workhorse  of 
the fleet.’’ 

Similar progress is evident in the recapitalization of the Coast Guard’s fixed-wing 
aircraft inventory. In 2003, the Coast Guard awarded a contract to ICGS for concept 
and  technology  development  of  our  new  maritime  patrol  aircraft.  Initial  contracts 
between  Lockheed  Martin  and  EADS  CASA  are  for  the  procurement  of  three  CN– 
235–300M  medium-range  surveillance  maritime  patrol  aircraft.  Delivery  is  sched-
uled  for  2007  following  configuration  for  Coast  Guard  missions.  The  contract  also 
includes an option for spare parts and integrated logistic support, as well as an op-
tion  for  five  additional  aircraft.  The  CN–235–300M  completed  a  successful  prelimi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

nary design review in December. Deepwater’s Eagle Eye tiltrotor VUAV successfully 
completed  its  preliminary  design  review  last  March  and  underwent  its  critical  de-
sign review in January 2005. 

These  milestones  also  illustrate  the  Deepwater  Program’s  important  industrial- 
base ramifications. Shipbuilding, aviation, and information technology systems come 
to  mind  immediately,  but  it  is  worth  noting  that  Lockheed  Martin  and  Northrop 
Grumman, joint partners in Integrated Coast Guard Systems (ICGS), have contracts 
with  companies  producing  supplies  or  conducting  work  for  the  IDS  program  in  41 
states. 
National Fleet 

Deepwater’s recapitalization of the Coast Guard also plays a key enabling role in 
providing  the  means  to  achieve  the  national  fleet  policy’s  goals  for  interoperable 
Coast Guard and Navy assets. The policy is in place to ensure our two services work 
together  to  synchronize  our  multi-mission  platforms,  infrastructure,  and  personnel 
to provide the highest level of naval and maritime capability for the Nation’s invest-
ment.  This,  of  course,  is  absolutely  essential  if  we  are  to  obtain  the  highest  levels 
of  operational  effectiveness  in  maritime  homeland  security  and  homeland  defense 
operations,  as  well  as  in  the  performance  of  our  national-defense  responsibilities 
providing  expeditionary  support  to  U.S.  joint  combatant  commanders  around  the 
world. 

Admiral  Clark,  the  Chief  of  Naval  Operations,  has  said  that  the  global  war  on 
terrorism’s  heightened  requirement  for  improved  homeland  defense  and  maritime 
security  has  produced  a  Navy-Coast  Guard  partnership  unlike  anything  the  sea 
services  have  experienced  in  many  years.  Partnership  with  the  Navy  and  the  De-
partment of Defense allows an effective two-way flow of capability to meet both ex-
peditionary and domestic security imperatives—all very much in the national inter-
est.  A  number  of  initiatives  are  in  motion  to  advance  the  national  fleet  concept  fol-
lowing  my  senior-level  talks  with  Admiral  Clark  last  November.  Deepwater’s  con-
tribution  to  national  fleet  policy  objectives  will  only  increase  as  the  Program  con-
tinues to gain momentum during the years ahead. 

The Deepwater Program is actively working with the Littoral Combat Ship (LCS) 
program at a functional level on small boat launch and recovery, weapons and com-
bat  systems,  and  mission  modules.  We  are  exploring  other  collaborative  opportuni-
ties  with  the  Naval  Air  Systems  Command  and  the  Marine  Corps  Systems  Com-
mand. 

The  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  directly  supports  this  inter-agency 
collaboration  with  the  Navy.  The  plan’s  provisions  for  more  capable  Coast  Guard 
cutters,  aircraft,  patrol  boats,  and  C4ISR  systems  will  enable  us  to  achieve  the  na-
tional fleet policy’s call for the highest level of naval and maritime operational inte-
gration for improved maritime security. 

Assistant Secretary of Defense for Homeland Security, Paul McHale, recently em-
phasized  this  compelling  requirement.  ‘‘It  is  in  the  maritime  domain  that  I  believe 
we  have  our  single  greatest  opportunity  to  enhance  our  domestic  U.S.  security,’’  he 
said.  ‘‘We  must  achieve,  in  short,  complete  synchronization  of  Coast  Guard  and 
Navy capabilities.’’ 
Program Management 

Deepwater  also  has  made  steady  progress  implementing  recommendations  from 
the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  to  improve  program  management  and 
oversight.  Last  year,  GAO  identified  13  items  of  concern  in  two  separate  audit  re-
ports.  The  Deepwater  Program  has  worked  diligently  and  successfully  to  address 
them. 

Since  its  March  2004  report  was  issued,  we  have  updated  GAO  regularly  on  the 
implementation  of  these  improvements  through  four  detailed  reports,  six  overall 
program briefings, and multiple on-site meetings regarding specific topic areas, and 
four  briefs,  including  a  day-long  conference  in  January.  We  have  taken  specific  ac-
tions to improve program management efforts to measure and evaluate cost, sched-
ule, and performance; improve communications, and to encourage future cost control 
through rigorous competition. 

In short, the Coast Guard has embraced the GAO’s recommendations. Eleven rec-
ommendations  were  grouped  by  three  categories:  program  management,  contractor 
accountability,  and  cost  controls  through  competition.  GAO  has  closed  two  of  the 
eleven  recommendations  as  completed  by  the  Coast  Guard,  and  we  anticipate  fur-
ther closures and satisfactory progress during the weeks ahead. These GAO closure 
actions  and  Coast  Guard  progress  reports  document  the  work  the  Coast  Guard  has 
done  to  comply  with  the  GAO  recommendations.  Two  recommendations  of  the  13 
total,  contained  in  a  second  separate  audit  report,  addressed  updating  the  Deep-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

water  acquisition  schedule.  The  Coast  Guard  complied  with  this  request  as  part  of 
the Fiscal Year 2006 budget process. 

To  improve  program  management,  we  have  restructured  Deepwater’s  Integrated 
Product  Teams  (IPTs)  to  comport  with  GAO  best  practices,  improved  electronic  in-
formation sharing systems, stabilized the workforce through human capital improve-
ments,  and  standardized  information  flow  from  the  program  to  field  units  to  facili-
tate delivery of, and transition to upgraded Deepwater legacy platforms. 

Regarding  contractor  accountability,  the  Coast  Guard  has  refined  the  ICGS  per-
formance criteria to standardize input and increase the objectivity of annual assess-
ments.  To  continually  monitor  contractor  performance,  the  Coast  Guard  employs  a 
‘‘balanced  score  card’’  and  an  earned  value-management  system  (both  of  which  are 
considered ‘‘industry best practices’’). 

To ensure cost control through competition, the Coast Guard reviews the competi-
tion  of  ICGS  subcontracts  through  periodic  evaluations.  Additionally,  ICGS  has 
agreed  to  notify  the  Coast  Guard  prior  to  deviating  from  the  accepted  contract  pro-
posal  if  they  decide  to  execute  work  in-house  above  $10  million  that  was  proposed 
to be subcontracted by a company other than the ICGS prime contractor. 

The  Coast  Guard  welcomed  the  GAO’s  recommendations  last  year.  We  viewed 
them  as  an  independent  review  of  IDS  contract-management  practices.  During  her 
testimony  to  the  Senate  last  month  on  the  Deepwater  Program,  I  was  gratified  to 
hear  Ms.  Margaret  Wrightson,  GAO’s  Director  for  Homeland  Security  and  Justice 
Issues, describe the Coast Guard’s response to her agency’s review of our Deepwater 
Program  as  a  ‘‘constructive  engagement’’  on  the  issues.  I  share  Ms.  Wrightson’s  as-
sessment  and  remain  committed  to  the  success  of  what  I  judge  is  a  collaborative, 
complementary effort. 

We  fully  recognize  that  GAO  still  sees  the  potential  for  our  contracting  approach 
to  pose  a  number  of  inherent  risks  that,  left  unaddressed,  could  lead  to  increased 
costs  and  schedule  adjustments  in  the  Deepwater  Program,  but  I  restate  today  the 
Coast  Guard’s  unwavering  commitment  to  good  stewardship.  The  Deepwater-indus-
try  team  is  a  developing  organization  fully  committed  to  continuous  process  im-
provement,  the  adoption  of  best-business  practices,  and  an  open  frame  of  reference 
leading to continued refinement of its acquisition strategy and business plan. 

We take our stewardship seriously, and we will achieve program success through 
performance measures and accountability. Simply stated, the GAO is making active 
contributions to help us successfully execute this critical Deepwater Program. 
Conclusion 

I appreciate your strong support of the Deepwater Program over the past several 
years in providing the Coast Guard with the tools necessary to meet our multi-mis-
sion  and  military  demands  and  to  fight  the  Global  War  on  Terrorism.  I  am  ex-
tremely  proud  of  our  Coast  Guard’s  accomplishments  since  9/11  as  we  strive  to  in-
crease maritime homeland security while continuing to perform a myriad of critical 
maritime safety functions. 

Funding  requested  for  the  Deepwater  Program  will  positively  impact  our  ability 
to deliver the maritime safety and security America demands and deserves by focus-
ing  resources  toward  our  three  critical  priorities:  recapitalize  the  Coast  Guard,  im-
plement  the  Maritime  Strategy  for  Homeland  Security,  and  enhance  mission  per-
formance. 

The  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan’s  progressive  modernization  and  re-
capitalization  will  provide  improved,  critically  needed  capabilities  that  are  funda-
mental  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  deliver  required  levels  of  operational  excel-
lence necessary for the security of the Nation and the safety of our citizens. 

Thank your for the opportunity to testify before you today on the Deepwater Pro-

gram. I will be happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Ms. Wrightson? 

STATEMENT OF MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON, DIRECTOR, 

HOMELAND SECURITY AND JUSTICE, 

U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Ms. WRIGHTSON. Thank you. I’m pleased to be here today to dis-
cuss Deepwater Program implementation, focusing on the results of 
our work for this Subcommittee on the condition—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Would you pull that mike up a little, please? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Ms. WRIGHTSON. A little—OK. Can you get it there? Have I—OK. 

I’ll start over. 

I’m  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  Deepwater  Program  im-
plementation,  focusing  on  the  results  of  our  work  for  this  Sub-
committee  on  the  condition  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  legacy  Deepwater 
assets, actions the Coast Guard has taken to maintain these assets, 
and  on  the  management  challenges  the  Coast  Guard  faces  in  ac-
quiring replacements. 

The bottom line of our work to date is this; the costly and impor-
tant  Deepwater  Program  will  continue  to  carry  substantial  risk, 
and,  therefore,  need  constant  monitoring  and  management  atten-
tion  to  successfully  accomplish  its  goals  of  maximizing  effective-
ness,  minimizing  total  ownership  costs,  and  satisfying  the  assets’ 
users. The substantial revisions to the Coast Guard’s mission needs 
statement  and  its  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan,  as  well  as  re-
cent  funding  uncertainties,  are  the  latest  evidence  of  the  com-
plexity and challenges the Coast Guard faces. 

With  respect  to  the  risks,  our  work  has  identified  three  main 

points: 

First,  the  need  to  replace  or  upgrade  deteriorating  legacy  assets 
is considerable. While the Coast Guard lacks measures that clearly 
demonstrate  how  this  deterioration  affects  its  ability  to  perform 
missions,  it  is  clear  that  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  insufficient 
in the post-9/11 environment. 

Second,  although  the  need  to  replace  and  upgrade  assets  is 
strong,  the  acquisition  management  and  oversight  risks  we  have 
identified  will  likely  increase  under  a  more  aggressive  acquisition 
schedule.  The  cost  increases,  schedule  slippages,  and  project  can-
cellations that have occurred so far are warning signs. We will con-
tinue to work with the Coast Guard to determine how best to man-
age these risks so that Deepwater missions can be accomplished in 
the most cost-effective way, going forward. 

Third,  there  are  signs  that,  as  the  Deepwater  Program  moves 
ahead, the Coast Guard will continue to report additional problems 
with  existing  assets.  Some  of  these  problems,  such  as  those  of  the 
378-foot  cutters,  are  included  in  the  compendium  the  Coast  Guard 
uses  to  set  sustainment  priorities  and  plan  budgets,  but  have  not 
yet been funded, because they pertain to assets that are first to be 
replaced. However, projects such as these to address problems that, 
may  be  today  or  on  the  horizon,  nevertheless,  are  likely  going  to 
be needed. 

Turning  to  some  of  the  very  important  details—and  I’m  going  to 
try  and  shorten  my  statement,  in  the  interest  of  time  here—our 
analysis of the most recent 5 years shows that the condition of the 
assets generally declined during the period, but the available condi-
tion measures do not demonstrate that rate of decline to be as fast 
or  clear  cut  as  the  Coast  Guard  has  asserted.  Also,  not  all  assets 
showed  similar  downward  trends.  We  believe  the  trends,  however, 
should  be  viewed  with  deep  caution.  While  there  is  no  systematic 
quantitative  evidence  sufficient  to  demonstrate  that  we’re  headed 
for  a  train  wreck  here,  this  does  not  mean  that  the  assets  are  in 
good  condition  or  have  been  performing  their  missions  safely,  reli-
ably,  and  at  levels  that  meet  or  exceed  Coast  Guard  standards. 
Rather,  evidence  from  our  site  visits  showed  aging  and  obsolete 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

systems  and  equipment  as  a  major  cause  of  the  reduction  in  mis-
sion capabilities for a number of Deepwater legacy aircraft and cut-
ters. 

Turning to the Coast Guard efforts to address the problems with 
their  assets.  Beginning  in  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  has  annually 
issued  a  compendium  consolidating  information  needed  to  make 
planning  and  budgeting  decisions  regarding  maintenance  and  up-
grades.  Also,  and  very  significantly,  Coast  Guard  crews  have  been 
spending  increasingly  more  time  between  missions  to  prepare  for 
the next deployment. Such efforts are likely to help prevent a more 
rapid  decline  in  the  condition  of  the  assets,  but  it  is  important  to 
note  that,  even  with  increasing  amounts  of  maintenance,  these  as-
sets  are  still  losing  mission  capabilities  due  to  equipment  and  sys-
tem failures. 

In  reality,  our  work  suggests  that  simply  working  harder  may 
not be enough. In this regard, the Coast Guard has recently begun 
to  develop  a  strategy,  known  as  CAMS,  to  better  prioritize  the 
projects  needed  to  upgrade  legacy  assets  in  order  to  achieve  the 
greatest  overall  mix  of  capabilities  that  maximizes  performance 
across  missions.  Although  it  is  too  soon  to  assess  the  effectiveness 
of  this  strategy,  we  regard  it  as  a  good-faith  effort  toward  more 
knowledge-based budgeting for legacy asset sustainment. 

In  addition  to  this  effort  at  the  operational  level,  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Pacific  Area  Command  has  recognized  that  a  different  ap-
proach  to  maintaining  and  sustaining  its  378-foot  cutters  may  be 
needed,  in  light  of  the  slippage  in  dates  for  its  replacement.  As  a 
first  step,  command  officials  have  launched  an  initiative  applying 
new business principles to the problem, including ensuring that op-
eration  and  maintenance  staff  work  closely  together  to  determine 
priorities  and  accepting  the  proposition  that,  with  constrained 
funding,  not  all  cutters  will  be  fully  capable  to  perform  all  types 
of  missions.  The  PAC  approach  has  potential;  but,  as  the  Com-
mander,  himself,  told  us,  it  is  likely  there  will  be  needed  an  infu-
sion of funding, no matter what. 

With  respect  to  the  challenges  the  Coast  Guard  faces  to  replace 
or  upgrade  its  legacy  assets,  as  you  know,  Madam  Chairman  and 
others, from the outset, we have expressed concern about the risks 
involved  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  approach.  Last  year,  we  reported 
that,  well  into  the  second  year,  key  components  needed  to  manage 
the program and oversee the contractor had not been effectively im-
plemented.  The  Coast  Guard  also  had  not  updated  its  master 
schedule,  and  costs  were  rising  above  original  estimates.  More  re-
cently,  we  have  seen  slippages  in  the  national  security  cutter  and 
emergency  acceleration,  such  as  for  the  HH–65.  Unobligated  bal-
ances are growing. We have also seen at least one instance of a se-
rious  performance  problem,  this  being  hull  breaches  on  the  first 
converted 123-foot patrol boats. 

We  have  made  numerous  recommendations  to  improve  the  pro-
gram’s  management  and  oversight,  and  the  Coast  Guard  has 
agreed with nearly all of them, and they have made progress. How-
ever, management issues remain, that I’d be happy to discuss, that 
may take some time to fully address. 

Additionally,  there  is  uncertainty  around  the  mission  needs 
statement  and  the  implementation  plan,  which,  at  the  end  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

day,  is  based  on  models  and  assumptions,  rather  than  facts,  and 
we’ll need some time to see if it will play out. 

Finally,  there  are  uncertainties  around  Deepwater  funding. 
When  the  program  began,  we  expressed  the  concern  that  this  pro-
gram  would  need  stable  funding  over  the  20-year  period.  In  4 
years,  funding  has  not  stabilized.  If  funding  does  not  stabilize  at 
whatever level you all decide, that will increase the risk to the pro-
gram. 

And  since  I’ve  hit  a  red  light,  I’m  going  to  thank  you  very  much 

and look forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Wrightson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND 

SECURITY AND JUSTICE, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Madame Chairwoman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I am pleased to be here today to discuss our preliminary observations on the con-
dition of Deepwater legacy assets; 1 actions the Coast Guard has taken to maintain, 
upgrade,  and  better  manage  these  assets;  and  management  challenges  the  Coast 
Guard  faces  in  acquiring  replacements  for  them.  Deepwater  legacy  assets  consist 
mainly  of  aircraft  and  cutters  capable  of  operating  further  out  to  sea,  but  missions 
may  begin  at  ports,  waterways,  and  coasts  and  extend  seaward  to  wherever  the 
Coast  Guard  is  required  to  take  action.  The  Coast  Guard  uses  these  assets  to  per-
form  a  variety  of  missions,  such  as  interdicting  illicit  drug  shipments  or  attempted 
landings  by  illegal  aliens,  rescuing  mariners  in  difficulty  at  sea,  protecting  impor-
tant  fishing  grounds,  and  responding  to  marine  pollution.  After  the  events  of  Sep-
tember  11,  2001,  these  missions  were  expanded  to  include  a  greater  emphasis  on 
ports, waterways, and coastal security. The Coast Guard’s expanded responsibilities 
caused  changes  in  how  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  used—for  example,  in  con-
ducting  more  security  patrols—and  they  also  created  a  need  to  make  adjustments 
in  mission  requirements  for  assets  that  would  be  updated  or  built  as  part  of  the 
long-term acquisition program. 

Many  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  at  or  approaching  the  end  of  their  estimated 
service  lives.  In  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  began  a  multiyear  Integrated  Deepwater 
System  acquisition  program  to  replace  or  modernize  the  legacy  assets.  The  Coast 
Guard’s new implementation plan estimates the cost for the Deepwater Program at 
$19  billion  to  $24  billion.  From  Fiscal  Years  2002  through  2005,  the  Coast  Guard 
was  appropriated  nearly  $2.2  billion  for  the  Deepwater  Program.  This  amount  in-
cluded  close  to  $1.3  billion  for  new  acquisitions  and  $460.5  million  for  upgrades  of 
the  legacy  assets.  Further,  because  the  Coast  Guard  must  continue  to  operate  the 
Deepwater  legacy  assets  until  the  new  assets  are  acquired,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
spent  close  to  $594  million  during  Fiscal  Years  2002  through  2004  to  fund 
intermediate- and depot-level maintenance of these assets.2 

The Administration is requesting $966 million for the Deepwater Program for Fis-
cal Year 2006—$242 million more than Congress appropriated for the program last 
year. Part of this request ($239.5 million) is for maintenance and upgrades to some 
Deepwater  legacy  assets  and  is  predicated,  in  part,  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  assertion 
that  its  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  ‘‘failing  at  an  unsustainable  rate.’’  Faced  with 
this  concern,  the  Coast  Guard  has  studied  options  for  replacing  Deepwater  legacy 
assets  more  rapidly  than  initially  planned  and  thereby  avoiding  some  of  the  costs 
that  might  be  involved  in  upgrading  these  assets  sufficiently  to  keep  them  running 
for  longer  periods.  In  the  coming  years,  both  the  Coast  Guard  and  Congress  will 
likely be considering the advisability of such changes in the program. 

The  House  Appropriations  Committee  recently  requested  information  from  the 
Coast  Guard  about  its  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan.  Because  the  Coast 
Guard  was  unable  to  present  information  that  the  Committee  deemed  satisfactory, 
the  Committee  recommended  reducing  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  Deep-
water  budget  request  of  $966  million  by  nearly  50  percent.  In  late  May,  the  Coast 
Guard  submitted  documentation  to  the  Committee  in  an  effort  to  comply  with  it’s 
request.  As  of  early  June  2005,  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  appropriation 
was still pending. 

My testimony today addresses three issues related to these considerations: 
• Changes  in  the  condition  of  Deepwater  legacy  assets  during  Fiscal  Years  2000 

through 2004; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

• Actions  the  Coast  Guard  has  taken  to  maintain,  upgrade,  and  better  manage 
• Management  challenges  the  Coast  Guard  faces  in  acquiring  new  assets,  espe-

Deepwater legacy assets; and 

cially if a more aggressive schedule is adopted. 

My testimony is based on past and current work for this subcommittee and other 
Congressional committees. Our current work included analyzing data and condition 
measures 3 used by the Coast Guard for determining Deepwater legacy assets’ condi-
tion,4 reviewing  Coast  Guard  actions  to  maintain  and  upgrade  the  legacy  assets, 
meeting with operations and maintenance staff covering each type of Deepwater leg-
acy aircraft and each class of Deepwater legacy cutter, assessing the improvements 
the Coast Guard is making in its management of the Deepwater acquisition. We will 
be  following  up  this  testimony  with  a  written  report  that  will  contain  additional, 
detailed information related to the condition of Deepwater legacy assets, and the ac-
tions  the  Coast  Guard  is  taking  to  maintain  and  upgrade  them.  As  part  of  the  fol-
low-on  report,  we  will  also  further  examine  the  Coast  Guard’s  management  of  the 
Deepwater  Program  and  follow  up  on  recommendations  made  in  a  prior  GAO  re-
port.5 Our work was carried out in accordance with generally accepted governmental 
auditing standards. 

In summary, our work thus far shows the following: 
• Coast  Guard  condition  measures  show  that  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  gen-
erally  declined  between  Fiscal  Years  2000  and  2004,  but  the  Coast  Guard’s 
available condition measures are inadequate to capture the full extent of the de-
cline  in  the  condition  of  Deepwater  assets  with  any  degree  of  precision.  While 
there  is  no  systematic,  quantitative  evidence  sufficient  to  demonstrate  that 
Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  ‘‘failing  at  an  unsustainable  rate’’  as  the  Coast 
Guard  has  asserted,  this  does  not  mean  that  the  assets  are  able  to  perform 
their  missions  safely,  reliably,  and  at  levels  that  meet  or  exceed  Coast  Guard 
standards. Evidence we gathered in ways other than reviewing condition meas-
ures,  such  as  interviewing  Coast  Guard  operations  and  maintenance  staff, 
showed significant problems in a variety of the assets’ systems 6 and equipment 
that  will  need  to  be  addressed  if  the  assets  are  to  continue  performing  their 
missions at or near current levels until replacement assets become operational. 
These problems are not necessarily reflected in the condition measures. For ex-
ample,  the  Coast  Guard’s  HH–65  helicopter  consistently  exceeded  the  Coast 
Guard’s primary condition measure during Fiscal Years 2000 through 2004, yet 
its  engine  is  being  replaced  because  it  lacks  sufficient  power  to  meet  mission 
requirements.  The  Coast  Guard  has  acknowledged  that  it  needs  measures  that 
more clearly demonstrate the extent to which asset conditions affect mission ca-
pabilities, but such measures have not yet been finalized or implemented. 
• The Coast Guard has taken several types of actions to keep existing assets oper-
ational,  but  these  actions,  while  helpful,  may  not  fully  address  mission  capa-
bility  issues  and  may  require  additional  funding.  The  Coast  Guard  now  com-
piles  information  that  can  be  used  to  better  identify  and  prioritize  the  mainte-
nance  or  upgrade  projects  that  need  to  be  done  to  keep  existing  assets  oper-
ating.  Coast  Guard  personnel,  according  to  evidence  obtained  during  our  site 
visits,  are  also  performing  more  maintenance  on  these  assets  than  they  have 
in  the  past—for  example,  spending  additional  time  on  maintenance  when  cut-
ters are in port between deployments. These additional maintenance efforts are 
likely  helping  to  prevent  a  more  rapid  decline  in  the  condition  of  these  assets, 
but it is important to note that even so, cutters and aircraft are still losing mis-
sion  capabilities  because  of  equipment  and  system  failures.  The  Coast  Guard’s 
Pacific  Area  Command,  which  is  heavily  dependent  on  deteriorating  378-foot 
cutters,  is  attempting  to  use  new  strategies  to  help  sustain  the  operation  of 
these  cutters  through  2016,  when  they  are  currently  scheduled  to  be  fully  re-
placed with newer cutters. According to the Pacific Area Commander, however, 
doing  so  is  likely  to  require  an  additional  infusion  of  funds—something  the 
Coast  Guard  has  so  far  not  included  in  its  budget  requests  or  plans.  Finally, 
in an effort to address our recommendations for developing a more proactive ap-
proach  for  prioritizing  the  maintenance  and  capability  enhancement  projects 
needed  on  its  legacy  assets,  the  Coast  Guard  is  developing  a  new  system  for 
providing more objective data on where to best spend budget dollars to achieve 
the greatest enhancements in mission capabilities. 
• The  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  of  $966  million  for  the 
Deepwater Program reflects significant revisions to the program’s requirements, 
capabilities,  and  schedule  in  light  of  the  homeland  security  mission.  We  have 
not  yet  analyzed  the  likely  cost  and  schedule  impact  of  these  revisions.  How-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

ever,  if  a  more  aggressive  acquisition  schedule  is  adopted,  the  Coast  Guard 
would likely continue to face a number of management challenges that have al-
ready affected its ability to effectively administer the Deepwater Program. From 
the  outset,  we  have  expressed  concern  about  the  risks  involved  with  the  Coast 
Guard’s  acquisition  strategy,  which  involves  relying  on  a  prime  contractor  (or 
‘‘system  integrator’’)  to  identify  the  assets  needed,  using  tiers  of  subcontractors 
to design and build the actual assets. Last year, we reported that well into the 
contract’s  second  year,  key  components  needed  to  manage  the  program  and 
oversee  the  system  integrator’s  performance  had  not  been  effectively  imple-
mented. We made a number of recommendations in the areas of program man-
agement, contractor accountability, and cost control through competition. While 
the Coast Guard agreed with nearly all of these recommendations and has initi-
ated  actions  to  address  these  problems,  we  remain  concerned  that  the  program 
still  carries  major  and  inherent  risks.  Most  of  our  recommendations  have  not 
been  fully  addressed.  Recent  information  shows  continued  challenges  in  the 
areas  of  overall  system  integration,  cost  and  schedule  management,  and  inte-
grated  product  teams,  which  consist  of  contractor  and  government  personnel 
and are the Coast Guard’s principal tool for managing the Deepwater Program. 
In  our  opinion,  the  uncertainties  associated  with  the  proposed  revisions  to  the 
Deepwater Program only heighten these risks. 

Background 

As  the  lead  Federal  agency  for  maritime  homeland  security  within  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security,  the  Coast  Guard  is  responsible  for  homeland  and  non- 
homeland  security  missions,  including  ensuring  security  in  ports  and  waterways 
and along coastlines, conducting search and rescue missions, interdicting drug ship-
ments and illegal aliens, enforcing fisheries laws, and responding to reports of pollu-
tion.  The  Deepwater  fleet,  which  consists  of  186  aircraft  and  88  cutters  of  various 
sizes and capabilities, plays a critical role in all of these missions. As shown in table 
1,  the  fleet  includes  fixed-wing  aircraft,  helicopters,  and  cutters  of  varying  lengths. 

Table 1: Deepwater Legacy Aircraft and Cutter Fleets 

(as of June 2005) 

Deepwater asset 

Number 

Description 

HC–130 (long-range 

surveillance air-
plane) 

HU–25 (medium- 

range surveillance 
airplane) 

HH–60 (medium- 

range recovery hel-
icopter) 

27 

23 

41 

Aircraft 

This is the largest aircraft in the Coast Guard’s fleet. It has a 
planned crew size of 7, a maximum speed of 290 knots, and 
an operating range of 2,600 nautical miles. The original esti-
mated  service  life  of  the  HC–130  was  30  years  or  40,000 
flight  hours.a The  in-service  fleet  average  age  for  the  Coast 
Guard’s HC–130H aircraft is 21.9 years. 

This is the fastest aircraft in the Coast Guard’s fleet. It has a 
planned crew size of 5, a maximum speed of 410 knots, and 
an operating range of 2,045 nautical miles. The original esti-
mated  service  life  of  the  HU–25  was  20  years  or  20,000 
flights  or  30,000  flight  hours.a The  in-service  fleet  average 
age for the Coast Guard’s HU–25 aircraft is 22.1 years. 

This  helicopter  has  a  planned  crew  size  of  4,  a  maximum 
speed  of  160  knots,  and  a  maximum  range  of  700  nautical 
miles. It is capable of flying 300 miles offshore, remaining on 
scene for 45 minutes, hoisting 6 people on board, and return-
ing  to  its  point  of  origin.  The  original  estimated  service  life 
of  the  HH–60  was  approximately  20  years  or  10,000  flight 
hours.a The  in-service  fleet  average  age  for  the  Coast 
Guard’s HH–60 helicopters is 12.6 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

Table 1: Deepwater Legacy Aircraft and Cutter Fleets—Continued 

(as of June 2005) 

Deepwater asset 

Number 

Description 

HH–65 (short-range 

recovery helicopter) 

95 

378-foot high-endur-

ance cutter 

12 

270-foot medium-en-

durance cutter 

210-foot medium-en-

durance cutter 

13 

14 

110-foot and 123-foot 

patrol boats 

49 

This  helicopter  has  a  planned  crew  size  of  3,  a  maximum 
speed of 165 knots, a maximum range of 400 nautical miles, 
and a maximum endurance of 3.5 hours. It is capable of fly-
ing  150  miles  offshore.  The  original  estimated  service  life  of 
the  HH–65  was  20  years.a The  in-service  fleet  average  age 
for the Coast Guard’s HH–65 helicopters is 17.6 years. 

Cutters 

This is the largest cutter in the Coast Guard’s Deepwater fleet. 
It  has  a  planned  crew  size  of  167,  a  maximum  speed  of  29 
knots,  and  a  cruising  range  of  14,000  nautical  miles.  It  can 
support  helicopter  operations.  The  estimated  service  life  of 
the 378-foot cutter is about 40 years. The average age of the 
Coast Guard’s 378-foot cutters is 35.3 years. 

This cutter has a planned crew size of 98, a maximum speed of 
19.5 knots, and a cruising range of 10,250 nautical miles. It 
can support helicopter operations. The estimated service life 
of  the  270-foot  cutter  is  30  years.  The  average  age  of  the 
Coast Guard’s 270-foot cutters is 17.0 years. 

This cutter has a planned crew size of 75, a maximum speed of 
18 knots, and a cruising range of 6,100 nautical miles. It can 
support short-range recovery helicopter operations. The esti-
mated  service  life  of  the  210-foot  cutter  is  from  43  to  49 
years. The average age of the Coast Guard’s 210-foot cutters 
is 37.3 years. 

The  patrol  boats  have  a  planned  crew  size  of  16  and  a  max-
imum  speed  of  29.5  knots.  The  110-foot  patrol  boat  has  a 
cruising  range  of  between  3,300  and  3,500  nautical  miles, 
and  the  123-foot  patrol  boat  has  a  cruising  range  of  3,180 
nautical  miles,  depending  on  the  class  of  the  patrol  boat. 
The estimated service life of the patrol boats is from 14 to 20 
years.  The  average  age  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  patrol  boats  is 
15.4 years. 

Source: Developed by GAO from U.S. Coast Guard data. 
aBecause  of  scheduled  depot-level  maintenance  and  upgrades  that  the  Deepwater  aircraft  have  received  or 
will  receive,  the  service  lives  can  be  extended  beyond  the  original  estimated  service  lives.  For  the  HH–65  heli-
copter,  a  Coast  Guard  aviation  official  told  us  that  the  aircraft  had  no  original  estimated  service  life  in  terms 
of flight hours, but rather can continue to be operated as long as the structure of the aircraft is sound. 

Some  Coast  Guard  Deepwater  cutters  were  built  in  the  1960s.  Notwithstanding 
extensive  overhauls  and  other  upgrades,  a  number  of  the  cutters  are  nearing  the 
end of their estimated service lives. Similarly, while a number of the Deepwater leg-
acy aircraft have received upgrades in engines, operating systems, and sensor equip-
ment  since  they  were  originally  built,  they  too  have  limitations  in  their  operating 
capabilities. 

In  1996,  the  Coast  Guard  began  developing  what  came  to  be  known  as  the  Inte-
grated Deepwater System acquisition program as its major effort to replace or mod-
ernize  these  aircraft  and  cutters.  This  Deepwater  Program  is  designed  to  replace 
some assets—such as deteriorating cutters—with new cutters and upgrade other as-
sets—such as some types of helicopters—so they can meet new performance require-
ments.7 

The  Deepwater  Program  represents  a  unique  approach  to  a  major  acquisition  in 
that  the  Coast  Guard  is  relying  on  a  prime  contractor—the  system  integrator—to 
identify  and  deliver  the  assets  needed  to  meet  a  set  of  mission  requirements  the 
Coast  Guard  has  specified.8 In  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  awarded  a  contract  to  Inte-
grated  Coast  Guard  Systems  (ICGS)  as  the  system  integrator  for  the  Deepwater 
Program.  ICGS  has  two  main  subcontractors—Lockheed  Martin  and  Northrop 
Grumman—that  in  turn  contract  with  other  subcontractors.  The  resulting  program 
is  designed  to  provide  an  improved,  integrated  system  of  aircraft,  cutters,  and  un-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

manned  aerial  vehicles  to  be  linked  effectively  through  systems  that  provide  com-
mand, control, communications, computer, intelligence, surveillance, reconnaissance, 
and  supporting  logistics.  We  have  been  reviewing  the  Deepwater  Program  for  sev-
eral  years.  In  recent  reports  we  have  pointed  out  difficulties  the  Coast  Guard  has 
been having in managing the Deepwater Program and ensuring that the acquisition 
schedule is up to date and on schedule.9 

The existing schedule calls for acquisition of new assets under the Coast Guard’s 
Deepwater Program to occur over an approximately 20-year period. By 2007, for ex-
ample,  the  Coast  Guard  is  to  receive  the  first  National  Security  Cutter,  which  will 
have the capability to conduct military missions related to homeland security. Plans 
call  for  6  to  8  of  these  cutters  to  replace  the  12  existing  378-foot  cutters.  However, 
in order to carry out its mission effectively, the Coast Guard will also need to keep 
all  of  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  operational  until  they  can  be  replaced  or  up-
graded. 
Deepwater  Legacy  Assets  Show  General  Decline  in  Condition,  but  Current 

Measures Do Not Capture True Extent 

Coast Guard condition measures show that the Deepwater legacy assets generally 
declined  between  2000  and  2004,  but  the  Coast  Guard’s  available  condition  meas-
ures  are  inadequate  to  capture  the  full  extent  of  the  decline  in  the  condition  of 
Deepwater  assets  with  any  degree  of  precision.  Other  evidence  we  gathered,  such 
as  information  from  discussions  with  maintenance  personnel,  point  to  conditions 
that  may  be  more  severe  than  the  available  measures  indicate.  The  Coast  Guard 
acknowledges  that  it  needs  better  condition  measures  but  has  not  yet  finalized  or 
implemented such measures. 
Coast Guard’s Condition Measures Show General Decline in Deepwater Assets, With 

Some Fluctuations 

During  Fiscal  Years  2000  through  2004,  the  Coast  Guard’s  various  condition 
measures show a general decline, although there were year-to-year fluctuations (see 
table  2).  For  Deepwater  legacy  aircraft,  a  key  summary  measure  of  the  condition— 
the availability index (the percentage of time aircraft are available to perform their 
missions)—showed  that  except  for  the  HU–25  medium-range  surveillance  aircraft, 
the  assets  continued  to  perform  close  to  or  above  fleet  availability  standards  over 
the  5-year  period.  In  contrast,  other  condition  measures  for  aircraft,  such  as  cost- 
per-flight-hour  and  labor  hours  per  flight  hour,  generally  reflected  some  deteriora-
tion.  For  cutters,  a  key  summary  measure  of  condition—percent  of  time  free  of 
major casualties 10—fluctuated but generally remained well below target levels. The 
number of major casualties generally rose from Fiscal Years 2000 through 2003, and 
then dropped slightly in Fiscal Year 2004.11 

Table 2: Synopsis of Deepwater Legacy Assets’ Condition 

Deepwater legacy asset 

Synopsis of general asset condition 

HC–130 aircraft 

HU–25 aircraft 

HH–60 aircraft 

HH–65 aircraft 

378-foot high-endur-

ance cutters 

270-foot and 210-foot 
medium-endurance 
cutters 

The  percentage  of  time  the  HC–130  fleet  was  available  to  perform 
missions nearly met or exceeded the Coast Guard’s target level dur-
ing  Fiscal  Years  2000  through  2003,  but  dropped  below  the  target 
level in Fiscal Year 2004. 

The percentage of time the HU–25 fleet was available to perform mis-
sions varied from year to year, but was consistently below the Coast 
Guard’s target level during Fiscal Years 2000 through 2004. 

The percentage of time the HH–60 fleet was available to perform mis-
sions  met  or  was  just  below  the  Coast  Guard’s  target  level  during 
Fiscal Years 2000 though 2004. 

The percentage of time the HH–65 fleet was available to perform mis-
sions  consistently  exceeded  the  Coast  Guard’s  target  level  during 
Fiscal Years 2000 through 2004. 

The  percentage  of  time  the  378-foot  cutter  fleet  has  operated  free  of 
deficiencies  in  mission-essential  equipment  remained  substantially 
below  the  Coast  Guard’s  target  level  during  Fiscal  Years  2000 
through 2004. 

The percentage of time the 210-foot and 270-foot cutter fleets have op-
erated  free  of  deficiencies  in  mission-essential  equipment  was  well 
below  the  Coast  Guard’s  target  level  during  Fiscal  Years  2000 
through 2004, but showed slight improvement in Fiscal Year 2004. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Table 2: Synopsis of Deepwater Legacy Assets’ Condition—Continued 

Deepwater legacy asset 

Synopsis of general asset condition 

110-foot and 123-foot 

patrol boats a 

The percentage of time the patrol boat fleet has operated free of defi-
ciencies  in  mission-essential  equipment  was  below,  but  near  the 
Coast  Guard’s  target  level  during  Fiscal  Years  2000  and  2001,  but 
declined in more recent years. 
Source: GAO analysis of data provided by the U.S. Coast Guard. 
a Data on the 123-foot patrol boats were not compiled until Fiscal Year 2004. That year’s data were added to 

the 110-foot patrol boat data to arrive at totals for the patrol boat fleet. 

Another,  albeit  less  direct,  measure  of  an  asset’s  condition  is  deferred  mainte-
nance—the  amount  of  scheduled  maintenance  that  must  be  postponed  on  an  asset 
in  order  to  pay  for  unscheduled  repairs.  Such  deferrals  can  occur  when  the  Coast 
Guard does not have enough money to absorb unexpected maintenance expenditures 
and  still  perform  all  of  its  scheduled  maintenance,  thus  creating  a  backlog.  For  ex-
ample,  in  Spring  2004,  while  on  a  counter-drug  mission,  the  210-foot  cutter  Active 
experienced  problems  in  the  condition  of  its  flight  deck  that  were  to  be  corrected 
during  its  scheduled  depot-level  maintenance.  However,  because  of  a  shortage  of 
maintenance funds, the maintenance was deferred and the flight deck not repaired. 
As  a  result,  the  cutter  lost  50  percent  of  its  patrol  time,  since  the  required  support 
helicopters could not take off from or land on it. 

As  table  3  shows,  deferred  maintenance  does  not  show  a  clear  pattern  across  all 
classes  of  Deepwater  legacy  assets.  For  the  Deepwater  legacy  aircraft,  the  overall 
amount of estimated deferred maintenance increased each year during Fiscal Years 
2002 through 2004, from $12.3 million to about $24.6 million. However, most of the 
increase  came  for  one  type  of  asset,  the  HH–60  helicopter,  and  the  increase  came 
mainly  from  shortening  the  interval  between  scheduled  depot-level  maintenance 
from 60 months to 48 months—thereby increasing the scheduled maintenance work-
load—and  not  from  having  to  divert  money  to  deal  with  unscheduled  maintenance. 
For the Deepwater cutters, the amount of estimated deferred maintenance increased 
from  Fiscal  Year  2002  to  2003,  but  then  dropped  significantly  in  Fiscal  Year  2004. 
The decrease in Fiscal Year 2004 came mainly because: (1) the Coast Guard ceased 
maintenance on an icebreaker, thus freeing up some maintenance funds; and (2) the 
Coast Guard also received additional operational and maintenance funding, allowing 
it to deal with both scheduled and unscheduled maintenance. Thus, the drop in the 
estimate  of  deferred  maintenance  costs  for  Fiscal  Year  2004  is  not  necessarily  an 
indicator that the condition of the legacy assets was improving; it could result from 
the Coast Guard having more money to address the maintenance needs. 

Table 3: Estimated Costs for Deferred Maintenance of Deepwater Legacy Aircraft and 

Cutters, Fiscal Years 2002–2004 

Deepwater asset 

HC–130 
HU–25 
HH–60 
HH–65 

Fiscal year 

2002 

Fiscal year 

2003 

Fiscal year 

2004 

$4,691,000 
0 
$7,630,000 
0 

$7,016,000 
$201,000 
$9,436,000 
0 

$5,737,000 
0 
$18,824,000 
0 

Subtotal for aircraft 

$12,321,000 

$16,653,000 

$24,561,000 

378-foot cutters 
270-foot cutters 
210-foot cutters 
110-foot patrol boats 

Subtotal for cutters 

$2,556,000 
$2,070,000 
$786,000 
$1,618,000 

$8,135,000 
$870,000 
$1,137,000 
$1,961,000 

$3,000,000 
0 
0 
$500,000 

$7,030,000 

$12,103,000 

$3,500,000 

Total for all Deepwater legacy assets 

$19,351,000 

$28,756,000 

$28,061,000 

Source: U.S. Coast Guard. 
Note:  The  Coast  Guard  estimates  the  cost  for  aircraft  deferred  maintenance  by  multiplying  a  percentage  of 
average  depot  maintenance  costs  by  the  number  of  aircraft  overdue  for  depot  maintenance  overhauls,  plus  the 
annual  cost  for  extension  inspections  each  year.  The  Coast  Guard  generally  does  not  track  deferred  mainte-
nance costs by cutter class, but compiled these data at GAO’s request for Fiscal Years 2002 through 2004. The 
Coast  Guard  estimated  the  costs  of  only  the  planned  cutter  maintenance  that  had  to  be  deferred  to  the  fol-
lowing year and not the amount of maintenance that should have been conducted and was not funded. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Current  Condition  Measures  Not  Robust  Enough  to  Clearly  Link  Condition  With 

Effect on Mission Capabilities 

28 

At  the  time  we  began  our  work,  the  Coast  Guard’s  condition  measures  were  not 
sufficiently  robust  to  systematically  link  assets’  condition  with  degradation  in  mis-
sion capabilities. As we discussed with Coast Guard officials, without such condition 
measures,  the  extent  and  severity  of  the  decline  in  the  existing  Deepwater  legacy 
assets  and  their  true  condition  cannot  be  fully  determined.  As  a  result,  the  picture 
that  emerges  regarding  the  condition  of  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  based  on  cur-
rent  Coast  Guard  condition  measures  should  be  viewed  with  some  caution.  While 
there is no systematic, quantitative evidence sufficient to demonstrate that its Deep-
water  legacy  assets  are  ‘‘failing  at  an  unsustainable  rate’’  as  the  Coast  Guard  has 
asserted,  this  does  not  mean  the  assets  are  in  good  condition  or  have  been  per-
forming  their  missions  safely,  reliably  and  at  levels  that  meet  or  exceed  Coast 
Guard  standards.  We  identified  two  factors  that  need  to  be  considered  to  put  these 
condition measures in proper context. 

The  first  factor  deals  with  limitations  in  the  measures  themselves.  Simply  put, 
the Coast Guard’s measures of asset condition do not fully capture the extent of the 
problems.  As  such,  they  may  understate  the  decline  in  the  legacy  assets’  condition. 
More specifically, Coast Guard measures focus on events, such as flight mishaps or 
equipment casualties, but do not measure the extent to which these and other inci-
dents  degrade  mission  capabilities.  Here  are  two  examples  in  which  the  Coast 
Guard’s  current  measures  are  not  sufficiently  robust  to  systematically  capture  deg-
radation in mission capabilities: 

• The  surface  search  radar  system  on  the  HC–130  long-range  surveillance  air-
craft,  called  the  APS–137  radar,  is  subject  to  frequent  failures  and  is  quickly 
becoming  unsupportable,  according  to  Coast  Guard  staff  with  whom  we  met. 
Flight crews use this radar to search for vessels in trouble and to monitor ships 
for illegal activity, such as transporting illicit drugs or illegal immigrants. When 
the  radar  fails,  flight  crews  are  reduced  to  looking  out  the  window  for  targets, 
greatly  reducing  mission  efficiency  and  effectiveness.  A  flight  crew  in  Kodiak, 
Alaska,  described  this  situation  as  being  ‘‘like  trying  to  locate  a  boat  looking 
through  a  straw.’’  Mission  capability  degradations  such  as  these  are  not  re-
flected in the Coast Guard’s current condition measures. 
• The  378-foot  cutter  JARVIS  recently  experienced  a  failure  in  one  of  its  two 
main  gas  turbines  shortly  after  embarking  on  a  living  marine  resources  and 
search and rescue mission. While JARVIS was able to accomplish its given mis-
sion,  albeit  at  reduced  speeds,  this  casualty  rendered  the  cutter  unable  to  re-
spond  to  any  emergency  request  it  might  have  received—but  did  not  in  this 
case—to undertake a mission requiring higher speeds, such as drug interdiction. 
The  Coast  Guard  condition  measures  are  not  robust  enough  to  capture  these 
distinctions in mission capability. 

The  second  factor  that  needs  to  be  kept  in  mind  is  the  compelling  nature  of  the 
other  evidence  we  gathered  apart  from  the  Coast  Guard’s  condition  measures.  This 
evidence,  gleaned  from  information  collected  during  our  site  visits  and  discussions 
with  maintenance  personnel,  indicated  deteriorating  and  obsolete  systems  and 
equipment  as  a  major  cause  of  the  reduction  in  mission  capabilities  for  a  number 
of Deepwater legacy aircraft and cutters. Such problems, however, are not captured 
by  the  Coast  Guard’s  condition  measures.  One  example  of  this  involves  the  HH–65 
short-range  recovery  helicopter.  While  this  helicopter  consistently  exceeded  avail-
ability  standards  established  by  the  Coast  Guard  over  the  5-year  period  we  exam-
ined, it is currently operating with underpowered engines that have become increas-
ingly  subject  to  power  failures.  As  a  result,  Coast  Guard  pilots  employ  a  number 
of  work-arounds,  such  as  dumping  fuel  or  leaving  the  rescue  swimmer  on  scene  if 
the  load  becomes  too  heavy.  Further,  because  of  increasing  safety  and  reliability 
problems,  the  Coast  Guard  has  also  implemented  a  number  of  operational  restric-
tions—such  as  not  allowing  the  helicopter  to  land  on  helipads—to  safeguard  crew 
and passengers and prevent mishaps until all of the fleet’s engines can be replaced. 
The Coast Guard has recently recognized the need for improved measures to more 
accurately  capture  data  on  the  extent  to  which  its  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  de-
graded  in  their  mission  capabilities,  but  as  of  April  2005,  such  measures  had  not 
yet  been  finalized  or  implemented.  Subsequent  to  our  inquiries  regarding  the  lack 
of condition and mission capability measures, Coast Guard naval engineers reported 
that  they  had  begun  developing  a  ‘‘percent  of  time  fully  mission  capable’’  measure 
to reflect the degree of mission capability, as well as measures to track cutter readi-
ness.  We  agree  that  measures  like  this  are  needed—and  as  soon  as  possible.  Fur-
ther, current plans call for the measure, if approved, to be used for cutters, but not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

for  aircraft.  Consequently,  even  if  this  measure  were  to  be  implemented  across  the 
Coast Guard, there would still be no measure to address degradation in mission ca-
pabilities for aircraft. We will be exploring this issue further in our follow-on report. 
Actions  To  Maintain,  Upgrade,  and  Better  Manage  Deepwater  Legacy  As-

sets Are Under Way, but Condition Issues Remain 

The Coast Guard has taken several actions to maintain, upgrade, and better man-
age  its  Deepwater  legacy  assets.  These  include  establishing  a  compendium  of  infor-
mation for making decisions regarding maintenance and upgrades; performing more 
extensive  maintenance  between  deployments;  applying  new  business  rules  and 
strategies, at the Pacific Area Command, to better sustain the 378-foot high-endur-
ance  cutters  through  2016;  and  exploring  additional  strategies  for  prioritizing  the 
maintenance and capability enhancement projects needed on its legacy assets in an 
effort  to  provide  more  objective  data  on  where  to  best  spend  budget  dollars  to 
achieve  the  greatest  enhancements  in  mission  capabilities.  These  additional  efforts 
are  likely  helping  to  prevent  a  more  rapid  decline  in  the  condition  of  these  assets, 
but condition problems continue, and the efforts will likely involve additional costs. 
Compendium of Needs Is Being Compiled and Used 

Since 2002, the Coast Guard has annually issued a Systems Integrated Near Term 
Support  Strategy  compendium.  Among  other  things,  this  compendium  consolidates 
information  needed  to  make  planning  and  budgeting  decisions  regarding  mainte-
nance  and  upgrades  to  sustain  legacy  assets.  Its  purpose  is  to  serve  as  a  tool  for 
senior  Coast  Guard  management  in  setting  priorities  and  planning  budgets.  From 
this  strategic  document,  the  Coast  Guard  has  identified  a  number  of  upgrades  to 
improve  the  capabilities  of  the  Deepwater  legacy  aircraft  and  cutters.  The  most  re-
cent compendium (for Fiscal Year 2006) lists more than $1 billion worth of upgrades 
to the Deepwater legacy assets. The planned upgrades identified in the compendium 
that have been approved and received initial funding account for an estimated $856 
million the Coast Guard anticipates it will need to complete those projects. The ap-
proved upgrades for Deepwater legacy assets are shown in table 4. 

Table 4: Approved Upgrades for Deepwater Legacy Aircraft and Cutters 

Deepwater asset 

Synopsis of planned upgrades 

HC–130 aircraft 

HH–60 aircraft 

The Coast Guard is beginning to re-
place  aircraft’s  dated  and  difficult 
to  support  surface  search  radar 
system. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  begun  a  serv-
ice  life  extension  plan  and  a  re-
placement of the avionics suite. 

HH–65 aircraft 

Serious  safety  and  reliability  prob-
lems  with  the  engine  led  the 
Coast  Guard  to  place  operational 
restrictions  on  the  HH–65  fleet  in 
October 2003. 

Estimated costs and timeframes of up-

grades 

The  radar  system  replacement  is 
projected  to  cost  $78  million  and 
be  completed  in  Fiscal  Year  2008. 
A total of $9 million has been allo-
cated to date. 

The  service  life  extension  program 
is  estimated  to  cost  $16  million 
and  be  completed  by  Fiscal  Year 
2009.  The  avionics  replacement 
program  is  projected  to  cost  $121 
million  and  be  completed  by  Fis-
cal  Year  2010.  A  total  of  $32.8 
million  has  been  allocated  to  date 
for these upgrades. 

The  Coast  Guard  plans  to  re-engine 
84  HH–65  aircraft  at  a  projected 
cost  of  $349  million,  now  esti-
mated  to  be  completed  by  Feb-
ruary  2007.  A  total  of  $160.7  mil-
lion has been allocated to date. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Table 4: Approved Upgrades for Deepwater Legacy Aircraft and Cutters—Continued 

Deepwater asset 

Synopsis of planned upgrades 

270-foot and 210- 

foot medium- 
endurance cut-
ters 

Total 

During  Fiscal  Year  2005  these  cut-
ters  are  to  enter  a  legacy  asset 
sustainment  project  known  as  the 
Mission  Effectiveness  Program 
(MEP)  aimed  at  increasing  their 
service  lives  until  their  replace-
ment  by  a  new  cutter.  The  MEP 
includes  upgrading  major  engi-
neering  subsystems  such  as  evap-
orators,  sewage  systems,  and  gy-
rocompasses. 

Estimated costs and timeframes of up-

grades 

The MEP is projected to cost a total 
of  $292  million  and  to  be  com-
pleted  by  Fiscal  Year  2015.  The 
medium-endurance cutters will ul-
timately  be  replaced  by  the  off-
shore  patrol  cutter.  A  total  of 
$12.5  million  has  been  allocated 
to date. 

$856  million  total  needed  to  fund 
these  projects,  of  which  $215  mil-
lion has been allocated to date. 

Source: GAO analysis of data provided by the U.S. Coast Guard. 
Note:  While  no  funds  have  been  allocated  for  upgrades  to  the  HU–25  aircraft,  the  378-foot  cutters,  or  the 
110-foot  and  123-foot  patrol  boats,  since  all  of  these  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  scheduled  to  be  replaced, 
each  of  these  assets  has  upgrades  listed  in  the  Systems  Integrated  Near  Term  Support  Strategy  compendium. 
The  HU–25  aircraft  has  an  engine  replacement  project  estimated  to  cost  $78.1  million;  the  378-foot  cutter  has 
an  MEP  estimated  to  cost  $137.8  million;  and  the  patrol  boats  have  three  projects—replacement  of  the  fin  sta-
bilizer  system  that  is  estimated  to  cost  $10.4  million,  an  MEP  that  is  estimated  to  cost  $162  million,  and  re-
placement of the ship service generators that is estimated to cost $20.7 million. If the Coast Guard were to re-
quest funding for all of these sustainment projects, it would cost an additional $409 million. 

Among  the  projects  already  begun  is  the  re-engining  of  the  HH–65  helicopters  to 
increase the helicopter’s power and capabilities. The Coast Guard is also upgrading 
several other aviation systems in an effort to improve aircraft capabilities. Enhance-
ments  are  also  planned  for  certain  classes  of  Deepwater  cutters.  For  example,  dur-
ing this Fiscal Year, the Coast Guard is to begin a maintenance effectiveness project 
on the 210-foot and 270-foot cutters. This project includes replacing major engineer-
ing  subsystems  with  the  goal  of  extending  the  cutters’  service  lives  until  their  re-
placement  by  the  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter.  Of  the  $856  million  total  estimated  costs 
needed  for  the  planned  upgrades  to  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  listed  above,  $215 
million  has  been  allocated  through  Fiscal  Year  2005  and  the  Coast  Guard  has  re-
quested  another  $217.3  million  in  its  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget.  The  remaining  esti-
mated costs of $423.7 million would have to be funded beyond Fiscal Year 2006. 
Increasing  Amounts  of  Maintenance  Are  Being  Performed,  but  Loss  of  Mission 

Capabilities Continues 

Coast  Guard  personnel  consistently  reported  to  us  that  crew  members  have  to 
spend increasingly more time between missions to prepare for the next deployment. 
For example, to prevent further corrosion-related problems, air station maintenance 
personnel at the locations we visited said they have instituted additional measures, 
such  as  washing  and  applying  fluid  film  to  the  aircraft  prior  to  each  deployment. 
Similar  accounts  were  told  by  personnel  working  on  cutters.  For  example,  officers 
of  the  270-foot  cutter  Northland  told  us  that  because  of  dated  equipment  and  the 
deteriorating  condition  of  its  piping  and  other  subsystems,  crew  members  have  to 
spend  increasingly  more  time  and  resources  while  in  port  to  prepare  for  their  next 
deployment. While we could not verify these increases in time and resources because 
the Coast Guard does not capture data on these additional maintenance efforts, the 
need  for  increasing  amounts  of  maintenance  was  a  message  we  consistently  heard 
from the operations and maintenance personnel with whom we met. 

Such  efforts  are  likely  helping  to  prevent  a  more  rapid  decline  in  the  condition 
of these Deepwater legacy assets, but it is important to note that even with the in-
creasing  amounts  of  maintenance,  these  assets  are  still  losing  mission  capabilities 
because of deteriorating equipment and system failures. For example, in Fiscal Year 
2004,  one  378-foot  cutter  lost  98  counterdrug  mission  days  because  of  a  number  of 
patrol-ending  casualties—including  the  loss  of  ability  to  raise  and  lower  boats  and 
run  major  electrical  equipment—requiring  $1.2  million  in  emergency  maintenance. 
Another  378-foot  cutter  lost  27  counterdrug  mission  days  in  the  Fall  of  2004,  when 
it  required  emergency  dry-dock  maintenance  because  of  hydraulic  oil  leaking  into 
the reduction gear. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

New Initiative for Maintaining 378-Foot Cutters Is Under Way 

31 

One  effort  is  under  way  at  the  Coast  Guard’s  Pacific  Area  Command  to  improve 
maintenance  practices  for  the  378-foot  cutters.12 Pacific  Area  Command  officials 
have recognized that a different approach to maintaining and sustaining legacy cut-
ters may be needed and, as a first step, they have undertaken an initiative applying 
what  they  refer  to  as  ‘‘new  business  rules  and  strategies’’  to  better  maintain  the 
378-foot  high-endurance  cutters  through  2016.  Under  the  original  Deepwater  pro-
posal, the final 378-foot cutter was to be decommissioned in 2013, but by 2005, that 
date had slipped to 2016. To help keep these cutters running through this date, Pa-
cific Area Command officials are applying such rules and strategies as: (1) ensuring 
that operations and maintenance staffs work closely together to determine priorities, 
(2) recognizing that maintaining or enhancing cutter capabilities will involve trade- 
off  determinations,  and  (3)  accepting  the  proposition  that  with  limited  funding  not 
all  cutters  will  be  fully  capable  to  perform  all  types  of  missions.  Pacific  Area  Com-
mand officials believe that in combination, these principles and strategies will result 
in  more  cost-effective  maintenance  and  resource  allocation  decisions—recognizing 
that  difficult  decisions  will  still  have  to  be  made  to  balance  maintenance  and  oper-
ations. 

The  Pacific  Area  Command’s  new  initiative  has  the  potential  for  assisting  the 
Coast  Guard  in  making  more  informed  choices  regarding  the  best  use  of  their  re-
sources,  but  the  approach  will  likely  require  that  the  Coast  Guard  allocate  addi-
tional  maintenance  funds.  In  particular,  the  Pacific  Area  Commander  told  us  that 
in  order  for  the  378-foot  cutters  to  be  properly  maintained  until  their  replacements 
become operational; the Coast Guard will have to provide additional funding for sus-
taining  the  378-foot  cutters.  So  far,  the  Coast  Guard’s  budget  plans  or  requests  do 
not address this potential need. 
Coast  Guard  Is  Developing  a  Strategy  To  Better  Prioritize  Upgrades  and  Maximize 

Asset Capabilities 

In  the  past,  we  have  recommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  develop  a  long-term 
strategy  to  set  and  assess  levels  of  mission  performance.13 We  found  this  was  an 
important  step  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  take  because  it  links  mission  performance 
levels  to  measurable  outputs  and  goals  so  that  the  Coast  Guard  can  better  decide 
how  limited  budget  dollars  should  be  spent.  The  Coast  Guard  has  recently  begun 
to  apply  the  principles  behind  such  a  strategy  to  (1)  better  prioritize  the  projects 
needed  to  upgrade  legacy  assets  that  will  be  part  of  the  Deepwater  Program  and 
(2)  obtain  the  greatest  overall  mix  of  capabilities  for  its  assets  within  its  budget  in 
order  to  maximize  mission  performance.  The  tool  it  is  developing  is  called  the  Cap-
ital Asset Management Strategy (CAMS). 

CAMS,  once  fully  implemented,  is  expected  to  help  the  Coast  Guard  to  better 
manage  its  assets  by  linking  funding  decisions  to  asset  condition.  Unlike  the  Coast 
Guard’s  current  compendium,  CAMS  is  designed  to  provide  analyses  on  the  capa-
bility trade-offs for upgrades and maintenance projects across asset classes, thereby 
allowing  the  Coast  Guard  to  determine  which  combination  of  projects  will  provide 
the  most  capability  for  the  dollars  invested.  For  example,  when  trying  to  decide 
among potential project upgrades such as a HC–130 weather radar replacement, an 
HH–65  sliding  cabin  door  replacement,  or  a  110-foot  patrol  boat  fin  stabilizer  re-
placement,  CAMS,  once  fully  implemented,  could  provide  the  program  managers 
with a recommended mix of project upgrades that would achieve the greatest capa-
bility enhancements based on the available budget. 

CAMS  analyses  are  to  be  based  on  legacy  asset  condition  and  readiness  data, 
asset  retirement  and  replacement  timelines,  asset  degradation  estimates,  project 
production  rates,  cost  data,  and  mission  utility  rankings.  Mission  utility  rankings 
will  grade  an  asset’s  importance  to  specific  missions,  such  as  search  and  rescue  or 
counterdrug  operations.  Rankings  may  also  be  assigned  to  an  asset’s  critical  sub-
systems,  or  may  be  altered  based  on  an  asset’s  geographic  location.  For  example, 
a  378-foot  cutter  may  be  critical  to  the  success  of  fisheries  patrols  in  the  Pacific, 
but may not be as important for alien/migrant interdiction operations in the Carib-
bean. In addition, the Coast Guard plans to rank its missions based on their relative 
importance.14 Each  of  these  elements  is  to  form  the  basis  for  recommendations  re-
garding  which  combination  of  upgrade  and  maintenance  projects  will  provide  the 
greatest enhancements to fleet capabilities. 

CAMS  recommendations  are  not  intended  to  be  a  replacement  for  the  budget  de-
velopment process, but rather are to augment the information currently provided to 
decision-makers  and  be  reviewed  by  several  internal  Coast  Guard  officials  before 
final funding decisions are made. Further, in order to prevent user ‘‘gaming’’—mak-
ing  assumptions  in  such  a  way  as  to  assure  a  positive  recommendation  or  outcome 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

for a particular project—the Coast Guard is developing a series of job aids, manuals 
and training courses to ensure data consistency. 

Coast  Guard  officials  expect  to  have  the  CAMS  fully  implemented  by  September 
2005  and  intend  to  use  it  while  developing  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008 
budget  submission.  Although  it  is  too  soon  to  assess  the  effectiveness  of  CAMS,  we 
view this approach as a good faith effort toward knowledge-based budgeting for leg-
acy asset sustainment. 
Management  Challenges  Faced 

in  Acquiring  New  Assets  Remain 

Significant 

Since the inception of the Deepwater Program, we have expressed concerns about 
the degree of risk in the acquisition approach and the Coast Guard’s ability to man-
age  and  oversee  the  program.  Last  year,  we  reported  that,  well  into  the  contract’s 
second year, key components needed to manage the program and oversee the system 
integrator’s  performance  had  not  been  effectively  implemented.15 We  also  reported 
that the degree to which the program was on track could not be determined, because 
the Coast Guard was not updating its schedule.16 We detailed needed improvements 
in  a  number  of  areas,  shown  in  table  5.  These  concerns  have  a  direct  bearing  on 
any  consideration  to  increase  the  program’s  pace.  Because  the  Coast  Guard  was 
having  difficulty  managing  the  Deepwater  Program  at  the  pace  it  had  anticipated, 
increasing  the  pace  by  attempting  to  speed  the  acquisition  would  only  complicate 
the problem. 

The  Coast  Guard  agreed  with  nearly  all  of  our  recommendations  and  has  made 
progress  in  implementing  some  of  them.  In  most  cases,  however,  while  actions  are 
under  way,  management  challenges  remain  that  are  likely  to  take  some  time  to 
fully address. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
h
g
i
r

w

33 

Improvement of Program Management and Contractor Oversight Is Mixed 

We have seen mixed success in the Coast Guard’s efforts to improve management 
of  the  program  and  contractor  oversight.  All  four  areas  of  concern—improving  inte-
grated  project  teams  (IPT),  ensuring  adequate  staff  for  the  program,  planning  for 
human  capital  requirements  for  field  units  receiving  new  assets,  and  updating  the 
program’s schedule—have yet to be fully addressed. 
Strengthening Integrated Product Teams 

Although the Deepwater Program has made some efforts to improve the effective-
ness  of  IPTs,  we  continue  to  see  evidence  that  more  improvements  are  needed  for 
the  teams  to  do  their  jobs  effectively.  These  teams,  the  Coast  Guard’s  primary  tool 
for  managing  the  program  and  overseeing  the  contractor,  are  generally  chaired  by 
a subcontractor representative and consist of members from subcontractors and the 
Coast Guard. The teams are responsible for overall program planning and manage-
ment,  asset  integration,  and  overseeing  delivery  of  specific  Deepwater  assets.  Since 
our March 2004 report, the teams have been restructured, and 20 teams have char-
ters  setting  forth  their  purpose,  authority,  and  performance  goals.  And  new,  entry- 
level training is being provided to team members. 

Despite  this  progress,  however,  the  needed  changes  are  not  yet  sufficiently  in 
place.  A  recent  assessment  by  the  Coast  Guard  of  the  system  integrator’s  perform-
ance found that roles and responsibilities in some teams continue to be unclear. De-
cisionmaking is to a large extent stovepiped, and some teams still lack adequate au-
thority  to  make  decisions  within  their  realm  of  responsibility.  One  source  of  dif-
ficulty  for  some  team  members  has  been  the  fact  that  each  of  the  two  major  sub-
contractors has used its own databases and processes to manage different segments 
of  the  program.  Decisions  on  air  assets  are  made  by  Lockheed  Martin,  while  deci-
sions regarding surface assets are made by Northrop Grumman. This approach can 
lessen  the  likelihood  that  a  ‘‘system  of  systems’’  outcome  will  be  achieved.  Officials 
told us that more attention is being paid to taking a system-wide approach and that 
the Coast Guard has emphasized the need to ensure that the two major subcontrac-
tors integrate their management systems. 
Ensuring Adequate Staffing for the Deepwater Program 

The Coast Guard has taken steps to more fully staff the Deepwater Program, with 
mixed effects. In February 2005, the Deepwater Program executive officer approved 
a  revised  human  capital  plan.  The  plan  emphasizes  workforce  planning,  including 
determining needed knowledge, skills, and abilities and developing ways to leverage 
institutional knowledge as staff rotate out of the program. This analysis is intended 
to  help  determine  what  gaps  exist  between  needed  skills  and  existing  skills  and  to 
develop  a  plan  to  bridge  these  gaps.  The  Coast  Guard  has  also  taken  some  short- 
term steps to improve Deepwater Program staffing, hiring contractors to assist with 
program support functions, shifting some positions from military to civilian to miti-
gate turnover risk, and identifying hard-to-fill positions and developing recruitment 
plans  specifically  for  them.  Finally,  the  Deepwater  Program  and  the  Coast  Guard’s 
acquisition  branch  have  begun  using  an  automated  system  for  forecasting  military 
rotation cycles, a step Deepwater officials believe will help with long-range strategic 
workforce planning and analysis. 

Despite  these  actions,  however,  vacancies  remain  in  the  program,  and  some 
metrics that may have highlighted the need for more stability in the program’s staff 
have been removed from the new human capital plan. As of January 2005, 244 posi-
tions  were  assigned  to  the  program,  but  only  206  of  these  were  filled,  a  16  percent 
vacancy rate. A year ago, 209 staff were assigned to the program. Further, the new 
human  capital  plan  removes  a  performance  goal  that  measured  the  percentage  of 
billets  filled  at  any  given  time.  Coast  Guard  officials  acknowledged  that  the  prior 
plan’s goal of a 95 percent or higher fill rate was unduly optimistic and was a poor 
measure  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  meet  its  hiring  goals.  For  example,  billets 
for  military  personnel  who  plan  to  rotate  into  the  program  in  the  summer  are  cre-
ated at the beginning of the budget year, leading the metric to count those positions 
as  vacant  from  the  beginning  of  the  budget  year  until  summer.  Other  performance 
metrics  that  were  included  in  the  prior  plan  to  measure  progress  in  human  capital 
issues have also been removed. For example, to help ensure that incoming personnel 
received  acquisition  training  and  on-the-job  training,  a  billet  was  included  in  the 
prior  plan  to  serve  as  a  floating  training  position  that  replacement  personnel  could 
use for a year before the departure of military incumbents. This position was never 
funded, and the new plan removes the billet. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

Improving Communication With Personnel Who Will Use the New Assets 

The  Coast  Guard  recognizes  the  critical  need  to  inform  the  operators  who  are  to 
use  the  Deepwater  assets  of  progress  in  the  program,  and  officials  stated  that,  on 
the  basis  of  our  recommendations,  they  have  made  a  number  of  improvements  in 
this  area.  A  November  2004  analysis  of  the  Deepwater  Program’s  communication 
process,  conducted  in  coordination  with  the  National  Graduate  School,  found  that 
the  communication  and  feedback  processes  were  inadequate.  Emphasis  has  now 
been placed on outreach to field personnel, with a multi-pronged approach involving 
customer  surveys,  face-to-face  meetings,  and  presentations.  We  have  not  yet  evalu-
ated the effectiveness of the new approach. 

Human  capital  requirements  for  the  Deepwater  Program—such  as  crew  numbers 
and  schedules,  training,  and  support  personnel—will  have  an  increasing  impact  on 
the  program’s  ability  to  meet  its  goals  as  the  pace  at  which  assets  are  delivered  to 
field  units  picks  up.  Recent  assessments  by  Coast  Guard  performance  monitors 
show  this  to  be  an  area  of  concern.17 Coast  Guard  officials  have  expressed  concern 
about  whether  the  system  integrator  is  appropriately  considering  human  capital  in 
systems engineering decisions. The system integrator is required to develop a work-
force management plan for Deepwater, as well as ‘‘human factors engineering’’ plans 
for  each  Deepwater  asset  and  for  the  overall  system  of  systems.  The  Coast  Guard 
rejected  the  contractor’s  workforce  management  plan  and  several  of  the  proposed 
human  factors  engineering  plans  as  being  inadequate.  The  rejections  were  due,  in 
part, to the lack of an established and integrated system-level engineering approach 
that shows how issues relating to human capabilities and limitations of actually per-
forming  with  the  system  will  be  approached.  One  performance  monitor  noted  that, 
as of late 2004, requirements for staffing and training of maintenance facilities and 
organizations had yet to be determined. According to the Coast Guard, emphasis on 
a  contractor’s  approach  to  addressing  human  capital  considerations  is  necessary  to 
ensure that Deepwater goals are met, especially as they pertain to operational effec-
tiveness and total ownership cost. 
Updating the Acquisition Schedule 

The  Coast  Guard  has  recently  undertaken  efforts  to  update  the  original  2002 
Deepwater  acquisition  schedule—an  action  that  we  suggested  in  our  June  2004  re-
port.18 The  original  schedule  had  milestone  dates  showing  when  work  on  an  asset 
would begin and when delivery would be expected, as well as the integrated sched-
ules of critical linkages between assets, but we found that the Coast Guard was not 
maintaining  an  updated  and  integrated  version  of  the  schedule.19 As  a  result,  the 
Coast Guard could not demonstrate whether individual components and assets were 
being  integrated  and  delivered  on  schedule  and  in  critical  sequence.  As  recently  as 
October 2004, Deepwater performance monitors likewise expressed concern that the 
Coast  Guard  lacked  adequate  visibility  into  the  program’s  status  and  that  lack  of 
visibility into the schedules for component-level items prevented reliable forecasting 
and  risk  analysis.  The  Coast  Guard  has  since  taken  steps  to  update  the  outdated 
schedule  and  has  indicated  that  it  plans  to  continue  to  update  the  schedule  each 
month  for  internal  management  purposes  and  semiannually  to  support  its  budget 
planning  efforts.  We  think  this  is  an  important  step  toward  improving  the  Coast 
Guard’s management of the program because it provides a more tangible picture of 
progress as well as a baseline for holding contractors accountable. We will continue 
to  work  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard  to  ensure  progress  is  made  and  to  monitor 
how risks are mitigated. 
Procedures  for  Ensuring  System  Integrator  Accountability  Are  More  Rigorous,  but 

Concerns Remain 

We  have  seen  progress  in  terms  of  the  rigor  with  which  the  Coast  Guard  is  peri-
odically  assessing  the  system  integrator’s  performance,  but  concerns  remain  about 
the  broader  issues  of  accountability  for  achieving  the  overarching  goals  of  mini-
mizing total ownership costs and maximizing operational effectiveness. 
Improving Criteria for Assessing Performance 

Improvements  continue  to  be  made  to  the  criteria  for  assessing  the  system  inte-
grator’s performance. In March 2004, we reported that the process for assessing per-
formance against specific contract tasks lacked rigor. The criteria for doing so have 
since been revised to more clearly reflect those that are objective, (that is, measured 
through automated tools against established metrics), and those that are subjective, 
meaning  the  narrative  comments  by  Coast  Guard  performance  monitors.  Weights 
have been assigned to each set of evaluation factors, and the Coast Guard continues 
to  refine  the  distribution  of  the  weights  to  reach  an  appropriate  balance  between 
automated  results  and  the  eyewitness  observations  of  the  performance  monitors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

Coast  Guard  officials  told  us  that  they  have  also  provided  additional  guidance  and 
training to performance monitors. We found that efforts have been made to improve 
the consistency of the format used for their input in assessments of the system inte-
grator’s  performance.  Coast  Guard  officials  said  that  they  are  continuing  to  make 
improvements  to  ensure  that  performance  monitors’  relevant  observations  are  ap-
propriately considered in making award fee determinations. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  although  performance  monitor  comments  are  consid-
ered  subjective,  they  are  valuable  inputs  to  assessing  the  system  integrator’s  per-
formance,  particularly  when  they  are  tied  to  measurable  outcomes.  It  will  be  nec-
essary  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  continue  refining  the  award  fee  factors  as  the  pro-
gram  progresses.  In  some  cases,  we  noted  that  the  performance  monitors’  assess-
ments  differed  vastly  from  the  results  of  automated,  data-driven  assessments.  For 
example, while schedule management is discussed in the Coast Guard’s most recent 
assessment of the system integrator’s performance as a major area of challenge and 
risk,  the  objective  measure  showed  100  percent  compliance  in  this  area.  Another 
metric  assesses  the  extent  to  which  integrated  product  teams  consider  the  impact 
of  their  decisions  on  the  overall  cost  and  effectiveness  of  the  Deepwater  Program. 
Performance  monitors  reported  that  because  system-level  guidance  had  not  been 
provided  to  the  teams  responsible  for  specific  assets,  they  had  a  limited  ability  to 
see  the  whole  picture  and  understand  the  impact  of  decisions  on  total  ownership 
costs and operational effectiveness. However, the automated measure was again 100 
percent  compliance.  Coast  Guard  officials  said  that,  in  some  cases,  the  data-driven 
metrics  do  not  accurately  reflect  the  contractor’s  performance.  For  the  next  award 
fee assessment, Deepwater officials plan to revise the metrics and place more weight 
on  the  performance  monitors’  input,  while  ensuring  that  it  is  based  on  measurable 
outcomes. 
Holding the System Integrator Accountable for Effectiveness of Project Teams 

Changes have been made to the award fee metrics that place additional emphasis 
on  the  system  integrator’s  responsibility  for  making  integrated  project  teams  effec-
tive.  Award  fee  criteria  now  incorporate  specific  aspects  of  how  the  integrator  is 
managing  the  program,  including  administration,  management  commitment,  col-
laboration,  training,  and  empowerment  of  these  teams.  However,  as  discussed 
above, concerns remain about whether the teams are effectively accomplishing their 
goals. 
Evaluation of Operational Effectiveness and Total Ownership Cost 

While  the  Coast  Guard  has  developed  models  to  measure  the  system  integrator’s 
performance  in  operational  effectiveness  and  total  ownership  costs,  concrete  results 
have not yet emerged. Minimizing total ownership costs and maximizing operational 
effectiveness  are  two  of  the  overarching  goals  of  the  Deepwater  Program.  The  sys-
tem  integrator’s  performance  in  these  two  areas  will  be  a  critical  piece  of  informa-
tion when the Coast Guard makes a decision about whether to award the contractor 
the  first  contract  option  period  of  5  years.  Initial  decisionmaking  is  to  start  next 
year. 

With regard to the operational effectiveness of the program, measuring the system 
integrator’s impact has yielded limited results to date because few of the new assets 
are  operational.  The  Coast  Guard  has  developed  modeling  capabilities  to  simulate 
the  effect  of  the  new  capabilities  on  its  ability  to  meet  its  missions.  However,  until 
additional  assets  become  operational,  progress  toward  this  goal  will  be  difficult  to 
determine. 

With regard to total ownership costs, the Coast Guard does not plan to implement 
our  recommendation.  It  has  not  adhered  to  its  original  plan,  set  forth  in  the  Deep-
water  Program  management  plan,  of  establishing  as  its  baseline,  a  cost  not  to  ex-
ceed  the  dollar  value  of  replacing  the  assets  under  a  traditional  approach  (e.g.,  on 
an  asset-by-asset  basis  rather  than  a  system-of-systems  approach).  Although  a  cost 
baseline consistent with the program management plan’s approach was initially es-
tablished, this number has not been re-baselined, as has the system integrator’s cost 
estimate  baseline,  and  is  not  being  used  to  evaluate  the  contractor’s  progress  in 
holding total ownership costs down. In practice, the baseline being used to measure 
total  ownership  cost  is  the  system  integrator’s  own  cost  estimate.  As  we  reported 
in March 2004, we believe that measuring the system integrator’s cost growth com-
pared  with  its  own  cost  proposal  will  tell  the  government  nothing  about  whether  it 
is gaining efficiencies by turning to the system of systems concept. 
Establishing Criteria and Documenting Changes to the Baseline 

Coast Guard officials stated that the contract total ownership cost and operational 
effectiveness  baseline  is  adjusted  based  on  approved  decision  memorandums  from 
the Agency Acquisition Executive, the Vice Commandant of the Coast Guard. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Coast  Guard  Has  Taken  Steps  To  Hold  the  System  Integrator  Accountable  for 

Competition 

The  Coast  Guard  reported  taking  steps  to  address  our  recommendations  con-
cerning  cost  control  through  competition.  Our  recommendations  pertained  to  com-
petition among second-tier suppliers and notification of ‘‘make’’ decisions. 20 

• Competition  among  second-tier  suppliers.  Coast  Guard  officials  told  us  that  in 
making  the  decision  about  whether  to  award  the  first  contract  option,  the  gov-
ernment will specifically examine the system integrator’s ability to control costs 
by  assessing  the  degree  to  which  competition  is  fostered  at  the  major  subcon-
tractor  level.  The  evaluation  will  consider  the  subcontractors’  project  manage-
ment  structure  and  processes  to  control  costs,  as  well  as  how  market  surveys 
of  similar  assets  and  major  subsystems  are  implemented.  The  Coast  Guard  is 
focusing  its  attention  on  those  areas  that  were  priced  after  the  initial  competi-
tion for the Deepwater contract was completed, such as the HH–65 re-engining 
and  the  C–130J  missionization. 21 For  example,  a  new  process  implemented  for 
the C–130J missionization was a requirement for competition in subcontracting 
and  government  approval  of  all  subcontracts  exceeding  $2  million  in  order  for 
the Coast Guard to monitor the integrator’s competition efforts. 
• Notification of make decisions. According to the Federal Acquisition Regulation, 
the  prime  contractor  is  responsible  for  managing  contract  performance,  includ-
ing  planning,  placing,  and  administering  subcontracts  as  necessary  to  ensure 
the  lowest  overall  cost  and  technical  risk  to  the  government.  When  ‘‘make-or- 
buy  programs’’  are  required,  the  government  may  reserve  the  right  to  review 
and  agree  on  the  contractor’s  make-or-buy  program  when  necessary  to  ensure 
negotiation of reasonable contract prices, among other things. We recommended 
that  the  Coast  Guard  be  notified  of  make  decisions  over  $5  million  in  order  to 
facilitate  controlling  costs  through  competition.  We  suggested  the  $5  million 
threshold  because  Lockheed  Martin,  one  of  the  major  subcontractors,  considers 
that  amount  to  be  the  threshold  for  considering  its  suppliers  major.  The  Coast 
Guard  has  asked  the  system  integrator,  on  a  voluntary  basis,  to  provide  notifi-
cation  1  week  in  advance  of  a  make  decision  of  $10  million  or  more  based  on 
the  criteria  in  the  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation. 22 According  to  Coast  Guard 
officials,  to  date,  no  make  decision  has  exceeded  $10  million  since  the  request 
was  made.  The  details  implementing  this  recommendation  have  not  yet  been 
worked  out,  such  as  specifically  who  in  the  Coast  Guard  will  monitor  the  sub-
contractors’ make decisions to ensure that the voluntary agreement is complied 
with. 

Concluding Observations 

Our work to date suggests the costly and important Deepwater Program will need 
constant monitoring and management attention to successfully accomplish its goals. 
In this respect, we identified three points that should be kept in mind in considering 
how to proceed with the program. 

• First, the need to replace or upgrade deteriorating legacy assets is considerable. 
While the Coast Guard is making progress on developing (1) measures that bet-
ter  demonstrate  how  the  deteriorating  condition  of  the  legacy  assets  impact  on 
mission  capabilities  and  (2)  a  strategy  to  better  prioritize  upgrades  and  maxi-
mize  capabilities,  it  is  clear  that  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets  are  insufficient 
for meeting all of the Coast Guard’s missions. 
• Second,  although  the  need  to  replace  and  upgrade  assets  is  strong,  there  still 
are  major  risks  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  acquisition  approach.  The  cost  increases 
and  schedule  slippages  that  have  already  occurred  are  warning  signs.  We  will 
continue to work with the Coast Guard to determine how best to manage these 
risks  so  that  the  Deepwater  missions  can  be  accomplished  in  the  most  cost-ef-
fective way. 
• Third,  there  are  signs  that  as  the  Deepwater  Program  moves  ahead,  the  Coast 
Guard will continue to report more problems with sustaining existing assets, to-
gether  with  the  attendant  need  for  additional  infusions  of  funding  to  deal  with 
them.  Some  of  these  problems,  such  as  those  on  the  378-foot  cutters,  are  in-
cluded  in  the  compendium  the  Coast  Guard  uses  to  set  sustainment  priorities 
and  plan  budgets,  but  the  Coast  Guard  has  not  allocated  funds  because  the 
problems  pertain  to  assets  that  are  among  the  first  to  be  replaced.  However, 
projects to address these problems are nevertheless likely to be needed. We will 
continue to work with the Coast Guard to determine if there is a more system-
atic and comprehensive approach to keeping the Congress abreast of the poten-
tial bill for sustaining these assets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  this  completes  my  prepared 
statement. I would be happy to respond to any questions that you or other Members 
of the Subcommittee may have at this time. 
Acknowledgements 

Other  individuals  making  key  contributions  to  this  testimony  include  Steven 
Calvo,  Jerry  Clark,  Christopher  Conrad,  Adam  Couvillion,  Michele  Fejfar,  Geoffrey 
Hamilton,  Julie  Leetch,  Michele  Mackin,  Christopher  Miller,  Stan  Stenersen,  and 
Linda Kay Willard. 
ENDNOTES 

1 For  purposes  of  this  testimony,  we  use  the  term  ‘‘legacy  assets’’  to  refer  to  the 
existing fleet of Deepwater aircraft and cutters. These legacy assets include the HC– 
130H, HU–25, HH–60, and HH–65 aircraft and the 378-foot high-endurance cutters, 
the  210-foot  and  270-foot  medium-endurance  cutters,  and  the  110-foot  and  123-foot 
patrol boats. We did not include the 213-foot ACUSHNET, the 230-foot STORIS, or 
the  282-foot  ALEX  HALEY,  as  part  of  our  analyses  of  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets 
because they are one-of-a-kind vessels. 

2 Intermediate-level  and  depot-level  maintenance  include  repairs  and  upgrades 
that  are  too  time-consuming  or  complicated  to  be  performed  at  the  unit  level.  For 
aircraft, this would include repairing, overhauling, or rebuilding parts, components, 
and  end  items  and  emergency  manufacturing  of  unavailable  parts.  For  cutters, 
intermediate-  and  depot-level  maintenance  would  include  preventive  or  corrective 
maintenance,  as  well  as  a  major  overhaul  or  complete  rebuild  of  parts,  assemblies, 
and end items; as well as major hull repairs, general modifications, and testing. 

3 To  assess  the  reliability  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  data  and  condition  measures,  we 
questioned  knowledgeable  officials  and  reviewed  existing  documentation  about  the 
data  and  the  systems  that  produced  the  data.  We  determined  that  the  data  were 
sufficiently reliable for the purposes of this testimony. 

4 In  assessing  the  condition  of  Deepwater  aircraft  and  cutters  for  this  testimony, 
we  analyzed  what  Coast  Guard  officials  told  us  were  the  best  available  condition 
measures. For Deepwater aircraft, we reviewed the availability index (percentage of 
time  aircraft  were  available  to  complete  missions),  cost  per  flight  hour,  labor  hours 
per  flight  hour,  programmed  flight  hours  per  year,  scheduled  versus  unscheduled 
maintenance expenditures, and estimated deferred maintenance. For cutters, we re-
viewed the number of major casualties, the percent of time free of major casualties, 
scheduled  versus  unscheduled  maintenance,  and  estimated  deferred  maintenance. 
We  also  reviewed  data  on  mishaps  and  the  dispatch  reliability  index  for  aircraft, 
and lost cutter days and unscheduled maintenance days for cutters. We did not use 
data  on  these  measures,  though,  because  the  data  were  either  not  relevant  to  our 
analysis, incomplete, not available for the entire time period covered by our review, 
or not sufficiently reliable for our purposes. 

5 GAO, Contract Management: Coast Guard’s Deepwater Program Needs Increased 
Attention  to  Management  and  Contractor  Oversight,  GAO–04–380  (Washington, 
D.C.: March 9, 2004). 

6 For purposes of this testimony, we use the term ‘‘systems’’ to include all the elec-
trical;  mechanical;  heating,  ventilation,  and  air  conditioning;  and  other  systems  on 
the Deepwater assets. 

7 Current plans call for the Coast Guard to replace all of its Deepwater legacy cut-
ters  and  patrol  boats,  beginning  with  the  378-foot  cutters.  The  Coast  Guard  also 
plans  to  replace  the  HU–25  aircraft,  but  will  upgrade  the  existing  HC–130  aircraft 
and HH–60 and HH–65 helicopters to extend their service lives. 

8 The mission requirements include such things as the ability to (1) respond to 90 
percent  of  all  distress  incidents  within  2  hours;  (2)  detect  and  track  targets  of  any 
material  such  that  the  probability  of  detection  is  at  least  90  percent  for  small  tar-
gets, such as a person in the water or a single-engine civil aircraft; and (3) respond 
to National Emergency Response Operations within 48 hours. 

9 See  GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Deepwater  Program  Acquisition  Schedule  Update  Need-
ed, GAO–04–695 (Washington, D.C.: June 14, 2004); Coast Guard: Key Management 
and  Budget  Challenges  for  Fiscal  Year  2005  and  Beyond,  GAO–04–636T  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: April 7, 2004); and GAO–04–380. 

10 A  casualty  is  a  deficiency  in  mission-essential  equipment;  a  major  casualty 

causes the major degradation or loss of at least one primary mission. 

11 However,  major  casualties  for  the  378-foot  high-endurance  cutters  continued  to 

increase in 2004. 

12 The  Pacific  Area  Command  is  responsible  for  operations  covering  74  million 
square  miles,  ranging  from  South  America,  north  to  the  Arctic  Circle  and  west  to 
the Far East. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

13 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Comprehensive  Blueprint  Needed  to  Balance  and  Monitor 
Resource  Use  and  Measure;  GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Strategy  Needed  for  Setting  and 
Monitoring  Levels  of  Effort  for  All  Missions  (GAO–03–155,  Washington,  D.C.:  No-
vember 12, 2002). 

14 A mission’s relative importance will be determined by Coast Guard operational 
decisionmakers. These determinations will not be static, but rather will be reviewed 
and revised to reflect changing priorities. 

15 GAO–04–380. 
16 GAO–04–695. 
17 Performance  monitors  are  contracting  officers’  technical  representatives,  who 

represent the contracting officer in monitoring the contractor’s performance. 

18 GAO–04–695. 
19 Not  maintaining  a  current  and  integrated  schedule  lessens  the  Coast  Guard’s 
ability  to  monitor  the  system  integrator’s  performance  and  take  early  action  to  re-
solve risks that could become problems later. Maintaining such a schedule is an in-
dustry  best  practice;  the  Department  of  Defense  is  required  to  do  so  in  order  to  be 
able to report any breaches in cost, schedule, or performance targets. 

20 A  ‘‘make  item’’  means  an  item  or  work  effort  to  be  produced  or  performed  by 

the prime contractor or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or divisions. 

21 The  C–130J  missionization,  planned  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  six  C–130J  aircraft, 
is intended to modify and install mission-essential equipment to convert the aircraft 
into C–130J long-range surveillance maritime patrol aircraft. 

22 Federal Acquisition Regulation § 15.407–2, ‘‘Make or Buy Programs.’’ 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you very much, Ms. Wrightson. 
Mr. O’Rourke? Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF RONALD O’ROURKE, SPECIALIST IN 

NATIONAL DEFENSE, CONGRESSIONAL RESEARCH SERVICE 
Mr.  O’ROURKE.  Madam  Chair,  distinguished  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee,  it’s  an  honor  to  be  here  today  to  talk  about  the 
Deepwater Program. 

The  Coast  Guard  believes  the  revised  Deepwater  force  is  the 
highest-performing force that can be acquired for $19 to $24 billion, 
and that it would generate much more performance than the base-
line  force.  The  Coast  Guard  also  states,  however,  that  the  revised 
force might not have enough capacity to perform certain operations 
that  might  be  of  interest  to  policymakers.  Specifically,  the  revised 
force might not have enough capacity to perform certain Level 2 op-
erations,  which  include  achieving  an  increased  degree  of  maritime 
domain  awareness  and  maintaining  two  cutters  in  the  Bering  Sea. 
The revised force almost certainly would not have enough capacity 
to perform certain Level 3 operations, which include operations for 
fully  achieving  long-term  FY  05–FY  09  Government  Performance 
and Results Act goals. And the revised force wouldn’t have enough 
capacity  to  perform  what  can  be  called  Level  4  operations,  which 
include certain fisheries enforcement and counterdrug operations. 

Potential oversight questions include the following: 
First,  Why  was  the  revised  force  optimized  within  a  cost  of  $19 

to $24 billion? 

Second, Why wasn’t it, instead, optimized to fully meet the long- 

term GPRA goals at lowest cost? 

Third,  What  are  the  potential  operational  risks  of  not  having 
enough capacity for doing things like achieving a Level 2 degree of 
maritime-domain  awareness,  or  maintaining  two  cutters  in  the 
Bering Sea, or fully meeting the long-term GPRA goals? 

And,  fourth,  What  would  be  the  composition  and  cost  of  an  opti-
mized  force  that  could  perform  all  operations  up  through  Level  2, 
or Level 3, or Level 4? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Supporters of the two shipyards that build the Navy’s larger sur-
face  combatants  are  concerned  there  might  not  be  enough  work 
over the next several years to adequately support both of them. Ac-
celerating  procurement  of  Deepwater  cutters  could  help  support 
these yards while reducing total Deepwater acquisition costs. Accel-
erating  procurement  of  these  cutters  might  not  increase  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Deepwater  management  burdens,  and  might  actually  re-
duce them, as long as design work is completed before procurement 
is accelerated. Procuring four or five large and medium Deepwater 
cutters  per  year,  rather  than  the  currently  planned  one  to  three 
cutters  per  year,  could  provide  about  as  much  shipyard  work  as 
procuring one of the Navy’s planned DD(X) destroyers per year. 

Some  DOD  officials  have  recently  said  that  the  Navy’s  new  Lit-
toral Combat Ship, or LCS, might be suitable, not just for its origi-
nally  stated  missions,  but  for  homeland  defense  operations  that 
Deepwater  cutters,  in  some  cases,  might  also  be  capable  of  per-
forming.  Although  the  revised  Deepwater  plan  does  not  substan-
tially  increase  the  planned  number  of  cutters,  the  Navy,  this  year, 
has substantially increased the planned number of LCSs. 

This raises a question about whether the Coast Guard and Navy 
have  a  common  view  on  the  division  of  responsibilities  for  con-
ducting  ship-based  homeland  defense  and  homeland  security  oper-
ations,  and  whether  the  two  services  have  adequately  coordinated 
the numerical requirements for the two groups of ships. 

Until April 29 of this year, Deepwater cost and schedule informa-
tion available to Congress appears to have been much less detailed 
than information made available to Congress in February or March 
of each year on comparable Defense acquisition programs. The Con-
gressional defense committees considered not just the delivery, but 
the  timely  delivery,  early  in  the  budget  review  season,  of  detailed 
cost  and  schedule  information,  as  necessary  for  ensuring  adequate 
program oversight. 

This  raises  a  question  of  whether  the  Coast  Guard  should  be 
more explicitly required to provide Congress, in February or March, 
rather  than  late  April  or  late  May,  with  the  same  kind  of  detailed 
cost  and  schedule  information  that  DOD  provides  to  Congress  in 
February or March on its major acquisition programs. 

Last,  the  Deepwater  Program  and  the  Army’s  Future  Combat 
System, or FCS Program, are both large system-of-systems acquisi-
tion  programs  for  acquiring  multiple  types  of  equipment  that  are 
to  operate  in  a  networked  environment.  And  both  programs  are 
being  executed  for  the  government  by  an  industry  entity  acting  as 
lead  integrator.  This  approach  appears  to  be  a  first  for  both  serv-
ices. Due partly to concerns over this approach, the Army program 
has  been  a  recent  focus  of  Congressional  oversight,  and  the  Army 
recently  restructured  the  business  aspects  of  the  FCS  program  to 
strengthen the Army’s arrangements for managing it. 

The  broad  similarities  in  the  Deepwater  and  FCS  acquisitions 
strategies  raise  potential  oversight  questions  regarding  how  the 
Coast Guard’s arrangements for managing the Deepwater Program 
compare  to  the  Army’s  arrangements  for  managing  the  FCS  Pro-
gram,  and  whether  the  two  services  have  instituted  a  process  for 
sharing ideas on how to better manage the two programs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Madam  Chair,  this  concludes  my  opening  statement,  and  I’ll  be 
pleased to respond to any questions the Subcommittee might have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. O’Rourke follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RONALD O’ROURKE, SPECIALIST IN NATIONAL DEFENSE, 

CONGRESSIONAL RESEARCH SERVICE 

Madam  Chair,  Senator  Cantwell,  distinguished  members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
thank you for the opportunity to appear before you to discuss issues relating to the 
Coast  Guard’s  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan.  My  testimony  will  focus  on 
the following: 

vised implementation plan; 

National Security Cutters (NSCs) and Offshore Patrol Cutters (OPCs); 

• the  level  of  overall  mission  performance  that  would  be  achieved  under  the  re-
• the  option  of  accelerating  and  possibly  expanding  procurement  of  Deepwater 
• the  relationship  between  Deepwater  cutters  and  the  Navy’s  planned  Littoral 
• the  timeliness  of  delivery  to  Congress  of  detailed  Deepwater  cost  and  schedule 
information, and potential implications for Congressional oversight of the Deep-
water Program; and 
• the  acquisition  strategy  for  the  Deepwater  Program  and  potential  implications 

Combat Ship (LCS) for homeland security/homeland defense operations; 

for government management of the program. 

Mission Performance Under Revised Implementation Plan 1 
Deepwater Capability and Capacity Levels 

In  discussing  the  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan,  the  Coast  Guard  uses 
‘‘capability’’ to refer to the kinds of tasks that individual Deepwater platforms (ships 
and  aircraft)  will  be  equipped  to  perform,  and  ‘‘capacity’’  to  refer  to  the  numbers 
of platforms that will be available for performing these tasks. The Deepwater force’s 
overall  mission  performance,  the  Coast  Guard  says,  will  be  a  product  of  its  capa-
bility  and  capacity.  Differing  combinations  of  capability  and  capacity,  the  Coast 
Guard says, would result in differing levels of overall mission performance. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  identified  the  following  Deepwater  capability  and  capacity 

levels. 
Capability Levels 

under the original Deepwater plan; 

• Baseline  (or  Increment  0),  which  is  the  capability  of  platforms  as  proposed 
• Increment I, the lowest-cost addition to the baseline, which the Coast Guard de-
scribes  as  the  minimal  additional  capabilities  needed  to  begin  aligning  the 
Deepwater platforms with Department of Homeland Security (DHS) goals; 
• Increment  II,  the  middle-cost  addition  to  the  baseline,  which  the  Coast  Guard 
describes  as  adding  a  larger  amount  of  homeland  security-related  capabilities 
to a larger fraction of the platforms; and 
• Increment III, the highest-cost addition to the baseline, which the Coast Guard 
describes as the changes that would fully align Deepwater platforms with DHS 
goals,  but  would  still  not  meet  the  new  Deepwater  Program  System  Perform-
ance Specifications (SPS v2.0). 

Capacity Levels 

cient to perform Coast Guard missions at 1998 (i.e., pre-Deepwater) levels; 

• Baseline (or Level 0), which the Coast Guard describes as the force levels suffi-
• Level 1, which the Coast Guard describes as the Baseline plus additional forces 
for  performing  the  additional  port,  waterways,  and  coastal  security  operations 
that were added after 9/11; 
• Level  2,  which  the  Coast  Guard  describes  as  Level  1  plus  additional  forces  for: 

—achieving an increased degree of maritime domain awareness (MDA); 
—maintaining continuous presence of two cutters (i.e., 2.0 presence) in the Ber-

ing Sea; and 

—performing additional air interdiction operations; 2 

• Level  3,  which  the  Coast  Guard  describes  as  Level  2  plus  additional  forces  for 
achieving  long-term  (FY  2005–FY  2009)  Government  Performance  and  Results 
Act (GPRA) goals; and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

• Level  4,  which  the  Coast  Guard  describes  as  Level  3  plus  additional  forces  for: 
—conducting fisheries enforcement in certain areas where fisheries enforcement 

is not currently performed; and 

—performing additional counter-drug operations, should the Department of De-
fense (DOD) reduce its efforts in this area so as to make DOD resources avail-
able for other DOD missions.3 

Level  4,  the  Coast  Guard  says,  is  the  level  that  RAND  used  in  its  2004  report 
on  the  Deepwater  Program.  The  RAND  report  calculated  force  levels  that  would  be 
required  for  fully  performing  both  traditional  Deepwater  missions  and  emerging 
(i.e., post-9/11) Deepwater responsibilities.4 
Force Recommended Under Revised Implementation Plan 

Figure 1 below, which was created by CRS on the basis of consultations with the 
Coast  Guard,  depicts  in  graphic  form  the  Coast  Guard’s  view  of  the  combinations 
of  capability  and  capacity  recommended  under  the  revised  implementation  plan, 
under the originally planned Deepwater force, and in the 2004 RAND report. 

As can be seen in the figure, the Coast Guard states that the force recommended 
under  the  revised  implementation  plan  falls  between  Increments  2  and  3  in  terms 
of  capability,  and  between  Levels  1  and  2  in  terms  of  capacity.  In  comparison,  the 
Coast  Guard  states,  the  originally  planned  Deepwater  force  and  the  force  rec-
ommended in the 2004 RAND report used platforms with baseline-level capabilities. 
In  terms  of  capacity,  the  originally  planned  Deepwater  force  was  between  Baseline 
and Level 1, the Coast Guard states, while the force in the force in the 2004 RAND 
report was at Level 4. 

While  the  number  of  platforms  in  the  revised  implementation  plan  is  not  obvi-
ously higher than the number in the originally planned Deepwater force, the Coast 
Guard  believes  that  the  value  of  networking,  superior  knowledge,  and  better  tools 
(i.e., equipment) on the platforms will permit the revised Deepwater force to achieve 
a higher level of capacity per platform than the originally planned Deepwater force. 
In  this  sense,  the  Coast  Guard’s  revised  implementation  plan  is  implicitly  arguing, 
in a reversal of the old force-planning aphorism, that ‘‘quality has a quantity all its 
own.’’ 
A Force Optimized Within a Certain Resource Level 

The  Coast  Guard  believes  that  the  force  recommended  under  the  revised  imple-
mentation plan represents the highest-performing combination of capability and ca-
pacity  with  a  total  acquisition  cost  of  $19  billion  to  $24  billion.  The  recommended 
force, in other words, can be viewed as one that the Coast Guard believes has been 
optimized  for  overall  mission  performance  within  a  total  acquisition  resource  level 
of $19 billion to $24 billion. 

As  shown  by  the  sloped  lines  in  Figure  2  below,  Deepwater  forces  consisting  of 
other  combinations  of  capability  and  capacity  could  be  acquired  for  a  total  acquisi-
tion cost of $19 billion to $24 billion. The slope of the lines in the figure is notional 
and  is  intended  only  to  illustrate  the  general  principle  that,  within  a  certain  total 
acquisition  cost,  capability  and  capacity  can  be  traded  against  one  another.  The 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
s
r
c

42 

Coast Guard believes, based on its analysis, that other capability-capacity combina-
tions lying along these lines would result lower levels of overall mission performance 
than its recommended force. 

Forces  with  total  acquisition  costs  lower  or  higher  than  $19  billion  to  $24  billion 
would lie along sloped lines that would be shifted to the left and right, respectively, 
of the lines in Figure 2. 

Performance of the Revised Force 

Although  the  Coast  Guard  states  that  the  Deepwater  force  recommended  under 
the  revised  implementation  plan  would  generate  much  more  overall  mission  per-
formance than the originally planned force, and would be able to meet certain DHS 
and Coast Guard long-range performance goals, the Coast Guard also stated to CRS 
that the revised Deepwater force: 

• might  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  operations  included  in 

• almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  oper-
ations  included  in  Level  3,  which  includes  operations  for  fully  achieving  long- 
term  (FY  2005–FY  2009)  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act  (GPRA) 
goals; and 

• would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  operations  included  in 

Level 2; 

Level 4. 

Potential Oversight Questions for Congress 

Potential  oversight  questions  for  Congress  arising  out  of  this  discussion  include 

the following: 

• Why was a range of $19 billion to $24 billion, rather than some lower or higher 
figure,  used  as  the  acquisition  cost  range  within  which  to  optimize  the  revised 
Deepwater force? 

• Rather  than  optimizing  the  force  to  achieve  the  highest  possible  performance 
within  an  acquisition  cost  of  $19  billion  to  $24  billion,  why  was  the  force  not 
optimized  to  fully  meet  the  long-term  (FY  2005–FY  2009)  GPRA  goals  at  the 
lowest cost? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
s
r
c

43 

• What  are  the  potential  operational  risks  of  not  having  enough  capacity  for  cer-
tain operations included in Levels 2, 3, and 4? What are the operational poten-
tial risks, in other words, of not having enough capacity to: 
—achieve a Level 2 degree of maritime domain awareness? 
—maintain a 2.0 cutter presence in the Bering Sea? 
—conduct  Level  2  air  interdiction  operations  not  conducted  by  other  agencies? 
—conduct  Level  3  operations  needed  to  fully  meet  the  long-term  (FY  2005–FY 

2009) GPRA goals? 

—conduct Level 4 fisheries enforcement and counter-drug operations? 

• What  would  be  the  most  cost-effective  combination  of  capability  and  capacity 
that could perform all Level 2 operations (or all Level 3 operations, or all Level 
4 operations)? What would be the composition of this force in terms of platform 
types, platform numbers, and platform features? What would be the acquisition 
cost of this force? 

Accelerating and Possibly Expanding NSC/OPC Procurement 
Congressional Interest 

There  has  been  interest  in  Congress  since  2002  in  the  idea  of  accelerating  Deep-
water  procurement  so  as  to  compress  the  program’s  acquisition  period  from  20  or 
more  years  to  as  little  as  10  years.5 Supporters  of  accelerating  Deepwater  procure-
ment argue that it would reduce total Deepwater acquisition costs and more rapidly 
increase Coast Guard capabilities toward post-9/11 requirements. 
Surface Combatant Industrial Base 

As discussed in CRS reports on the Deepwater Program and Navy ship-acquisition 
programs, accelerating procurement of Deepwater National Security Cutters (NSCs) 
and Offshore Patrol Cutters (OPCs) could help support the two shipyards that have 
built the Navy’s larger surface combatants in recent years—General Dynamics’ Bath 
Iron  Works  (GD/BIW)  of  Bath,  ME,  and  Northrop  Grumman’s  Ingalls  Shipyard  of 
Pascagoula, MS, which forms part of Northrop Grumman Ship Systems (NGSS).6 

GD/BIW  and  Ingalls  currently  face  some  uncertainties  regarding  the  amount  of 
Navy  surface  combatant  construction  work  they  will  receive  over  the  next  several 
years.  The  FY  2006–FY  2011  Future  Years  Defense  Plan  (FYDP)  reduces  planned 
DD(X) destroyer procurement to one per year in FY 2007–FY 2011. In addition, the 
Navy  is  interested  in  changing  the  shipyard  portion  of  the  acquisition  strategy  for 
the  DD(X)  program.7 Estimated  DD(X)  procurement  costs,  moreover,  have  recently 
increased significantly, raising questions about the DD(X) program’s prospective af-
fordability  and  cost  effectiveness.  These  developments  have  heightened  concerns 
among  supporters  of  GD/BIW  and  Ingalls  regarding  the  futures  of  the  two  yards. 
Potential Annual Rates and Total Procurement Quantities 

Ship  deliveries  as  shown  in  the  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  suggest 
that  the  plan  would  procure  National  Security  Cutters  (NSCs)  at  a  rate  of  one  per 
year  over  the  next  few  years,  and  Offshore  Patrol  Cutters  (OPCs)  at  a  rate  of  one 
per year starting a few years from now, growing to two or three per year a few years 
after  that.  It  appears  that  a  combined  NSC–OPC  procurement  rate  of  three  ships 
per  year  is  reached  around  the  end  of  this  decade  or  early  in  the  next  decade,  de-
pending  on  which  funding  plan  is  pursued,  and  that  in  almost  all  cases,  the  three 
ships procured each year are all OPCs. 

Although  the  shipyard  skill  mix  for  building  NSCs  and  OPCs  is  somewhat  dif-
ferent from the shipyard skill mix for building DD(X)s, based on their light-ship dis-
placements, procuring a total of four or five NSCs and OPCs per year might provide 
about  as  much  total  shipyard  work  as  procuring  one  DD(X)  per  year.  The  Coast 
Guard currently estimates that, in FY 2002 dollars, NSCs will cost about $277 mil-
lion each to procure (or somewhat more if the design is expanded to include certain 
additional  equipment),  and  that  OPCs  would  cost  an  average  of  about  $200  million 
each  to  procure.  The  Navy  currently  estimates  that  in  FY  2002  dollars,  follow-on 
DD(X)s  would  cost  roughly  $2.1  billion  each  to  procure.  Using  these  figures,  pro-
curing  four  or  five  NSCs  and  OPCs  per  year  would  cost  roughly  half  as  much  as 
procuring one DD(X) per year. 

If  the  scope  of  the  Deepwater  Program  is  expanded  to  include  a  higher  level  of 
capacity,  the  total  number  of  NSCs  and  OPCs  might  increase.  The  2004  RAND  re-
port  recommended  a  Deepwater  Force  with  Level  4  capacity  that  included,  among 
other  things,  44  NSCs  and  46  OPCs.  As  shown  earlier  in  Figure  1,  however,  the 
RAND  analysis  used  Deepwater  platforms  equipped  with  a  Baseline-level  of  capa-
bility.  The  force  levels  recommended  under  the  Coast  Guard’s  revised  implementa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

tion  plan  suggest  that,  if  Deepwater  platforms  are  equipped  with  a  level  of  capa-
bility equivalent to Increment II or III, then a Deepwater force with Level 4 capac-
ity might include substantially fewer than 44 NSCs and 46 OPCs, and that a Level 
3 or Level 2 force would include even smaller numbers. 

Even  so,  an  optimized  Deepwater  force  with  increased  unit  capability  and  Level 
3  or  –4  capacity  would  likely  include  more  than  the  total  of  31  to  33  larger  cutters 
(6  to  8  NSCs  and  25  OPCs)  that  are  included  in  the  revised  implementation  plan. 
Since  differences  in  recommended  ship  numbers  between  the  revised  plan  and  the 
2004 RAND report are more dramatic for NSCs than they are for OPCs, increasing 
the Deepwater Program to an optimized force with Level 3 or Level 4 capacity might 
increase the number of NSCs more dramatically than the number of OPCs. An opti-
mized  Deepwater  force  with  increased  unit  capability  and  Level  2  capacity  might 
include slightly more than 31 to 33 cutters. 
Management Burden of Cutter Acceleration 

Accelerating the entire Deepwater Program could increase the Coast Guard’s bur-
den  in  managing  the  large  and  complex  Deepwater  Program,  and  thereby  increase 
program  risk.  Accelerating  procurement  of  NSCs  and  OPCs  only,  however,  might 
not  materially  increase  the  Coast  Guard’s  management  burden—provided  that  de-
sign  work  on  each  class  of  cutter  was  completed  before  procurement  of  that  class 
was accelerated—because NSCs and OPCs are to incorporate proven rather than de-
velopmental systems and because the Coast Guard already plans to overlap procure-
ment of the two classes. 

Indeed,  accelerating  NSC  and  OPC  procurement  might  actually  reduce  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Deepwater  management  burden  by  eliminating  more  quickly  the  manage-
ment  challenges  associated  with  maintaining  legacy  cutters,  and  by  shortening  the 
period during which the Coast Guard would have to manage NSC and OPC procure-
ment. 
Summary of Potential Advantages and Disadvantages 

Potential Advantages. Potential advantages of accelerating and possibly expanding 

procurement of NSCs and OPCs include the following: 

cutters with the lower O&S costs of new cutters; 

economies of scale (i.e., more economic rates of production); 

• reducing  NSC  and  OPC  unit  procurement  costs  by  achieving  better  production 
• more  quickly  replacing  the  high  operation  and  support  (O&S)  costs  of  legacy 
• more quickly increasing the Coast Guard’s capabilities toward post-9/11 require-
• more quickly eliminating the management burdens associated with maintaining 
• providing additional work for GD/BIW and Ingalls during a period of uncertain 

legacy cutters and supervising procurement of the new cutters; and 

ments; 

Navy surface combatant construction work. 

Potential  Disadvantages.  Potential  disadvantages  of  accelerating  and  possibly  ex-

panding procurement of NSCs and OPCs include the following: 

porate them into cutters that have not yet been built; 

• increased  annual  funding  requirements  for  the  next  several  years  for  procure-
ment  of  NSCs  and  OPCs,  which  could  require,  in  a  situation  of  constrained 
funding, offsetting reductions in annual funding for procurement of other Deep-
water assets, other Coast Guard priorities, or other DHS priorities; 
• a shorter procurement time period to learn about better technologies and incor-
• increased  shipyard  (as  opposed  to  Coast  Guard)  management  burdens  associ-
ated  with  supervising  a  larger  number  of  workers  involved  in  building  NSCs 
and OPCs; 
• increased Coast Guard management burdens associated with training crews for 
• a  more  compressed  cutter  retirement  period  (i.e.,  bloc  obsolescence)  years  from 
now, when the new Deepwater cutters reach the ends of their service lives, pos-
sibly  requiring  a  similarly  compressed  procurement  period  at  that  point  to  re-
place the retiring ships. 

the new cutters; and 

Navy LCSs vs. Coast Guard Cutters for Homeland Defense 

The  Littoral  Combat  Ship  (LCS)  is  a  planned  new  Navy  surface  combatant.  The 
Navy announced the start of the LCS program in November 2001 as part of a larger 
restructuring of its surface combatant acquisition efforts. The LCS is to be a small, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

fast ship that would use modular ‘‘plug-and-fight’’ mission payload packages, includ-
ing unmanned vehicles (UVs). 

The  LCS,  with  a  full  load  displacement  of  2,500  to  3,000  tons,  is  to  be  close  in 
size  to  the  3,200-ton  OPC.  Navy  officials  in  the  early  stages  of  the  LCS  program 
said  that  the  LCS  might  prove  suitable  as  the  basis  for  the  OPC  design,  but  the 
Coast  Guard  did  not  adopt  this  approach,  apparently  in  part  because  of  the  LCS’s 
cost. The Navy wants each LCS to cost no more than $220 million to procure, exclu-
sive of its modular mission packages, while the OPC, as mentioned earlier, is to cost 
an average of about $200 million, including all of its built-in mission equipment. 

The  Navy’s  primary  intended  missions  for  the  LCS  are  countering  enemy  mines, 
submarines,  and  fast  attack  craft  (i.e.,  ‘‘swarm  boats’’)  in  heavily  contested  littoral 
(near-shore)  waters.  Secondary  LCS  missions,  also  to  be  performed  in  littoral 
waters, include intelligence, surveillance, and reconnaissance (ISR); maritime inter-
cept; special operations forces (SOF) support; and logistics support for movement of 
personnel and supplies. 

In  recent  months,  some  DOD  and  Navy  officials  have  stated  that  the  LCS  might 
also  be  suitable  for  homeland  defense  operations.8 Such  missions,  however,  might 
also be performed by NSCs, OPCs, and other Deepwater assets. 

Navy  officials  earlier  spoke  about  building  a  total  of  perhaps  30  to  60  LCSs.  A 
March  2005  report  to  the  Congressional  defense  committees  on  potential  future 
Navy  force  levels,  however,  shows  a  potential  total  force  level  of  63  to  82  LCSs.9 
The  Chief  of  Naval  Operations  has  spoken  of  the  possibility  of  building  a  total  of 
75 to 100 LCSs.10 

Navy  statements  about  the  LCS’s  possible  suitability  for  homeland  defense,  and 
the  recent  apparent  increase  in  the  Navy’s  planned  number  of  LCSs,  raise  several 
potential oversight questions for Congress, including the following: 

• Do  the  Coast  Guard  and  Navy  have  a  common  view  on  the  division  of  respon-
sibilities  between  Navy  LCSs  and  Coast  Guard  NSCs,  OPCs,  and  other  Deep-
water assets for performing homeland defense and homeland security missions? 
Have  the  two  services  adequately  coordinated  their  plans  for  procuring  assets 
that can perform homeland defense and homeland security missions, consistent 
with the Navy-Coast Guard National Fleet policy statement? 11 
• Does the Coast Guard believe that the LCS would be better than NSCs, OPCs, 
or  other  Deepwater  assets  for  performing  certain  homeland  defense  and  home-
land security missions? If so, which ones, and why? If the Coast Guard believes 
the  LCS  would  be  better  for  performing  these  missions,  should  the  revised 
Deepwater  plan  be  amended  to  include  the  procurement  of  LCSs  for  the  Coast 
Guard? 
• Was  the  Coast  Guard’s  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  influenced  by 
an awareness that the Navy might be interested in using the LCS for homeland 
defense missions, and if so, in what way was the plan influenced? 
• What role, if any, did the homeland defense mission play in the Navy’s decision 
to  increase  the  planned  procurement  quantity  of  LCSs  from  a  range  of  30  to 
60, to a range of 63 to 82 (or possibly 75 to 100)? 

Timeliness of Detailed Cost and Schedule Information 

The  Deepwater  Program  is  comparable  in  terms  of  total  acquisition  cost,  com-
plexity, and lengthy period of acquisition to major DOD acquisition programs. Until 
the  submission  to  Congress  on  April  29,  2005,  of  the  Deepwater  supplement  to  the 
Coast Guard’s FY 2006 budget,12 however, information available to Congress on the 
cost and procurement schedule of the Deepwater Program, particularly for years be-
yond FY 2006, appears to have been much less detailed and complete than informa-
tion that is normally made available to Congress in February or March of each year 
on  the  costs  and  procurement  schedules  of  typical  DOD  ship  or  aircraft  acquisition 
programs. 

For  DOD  acquisition  programs,  information  on  the  costs  and  procurement  sched-
ules  of  major  acquisition  programs  for  the  Fiscal  Year  under  consideration  and  the 
next four or 5 years (e.g., FY 2006 and FY 2007–FY 2011, respectively) is presented 
in  detail  in  the  Future  Years  Defense  Plan  (FYDP)  and  extensive  supporting  budg-
et-justification  documents.  This  information  is  usually  submitted  each  year  soon 
after  the  initial  submission  of  the  top-line  DOD  budget  in  early  February.  The  de-
fense  committees  of  Congress  consider  this  detailed  information  on  costs  and  pro-
curement  schedules  necessary,  even  critical,  to  ensuring  adequate  Congressional 
oversight  of  these  programs.  Receiving  this  detailed  information  in  February  or 
March  permits  the  defense  committees  to  review  it  in  depth  in  preparing  for  their 
budget-review  hearings  in  February,  March,  and  early  April.  Receiving  it  in  late 
April,  after  most  or  all  of  these  hearings  are  usually  concluded,  would  significantly 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

reduce its value in supporting the defense committees’ oversight and markup activi-
ties. 

In  past  years,  when  planned  Coast  Guard  acquisition  programs  were  not  of  the 
scale  and  complexity  contemplated  in  the  Deepwater  Program,  the  absence  until 
late  April  of  detailed  future-year  cost  and  procurement  schedule  information  may 
have  had  only  a  limited  effect  on  Congress’  ability  to  conduct  effective  oversight  of 
Coast  Guard  acquisition  efforts.  With  the  advent  of  the  Deepwater  Program,  how-
ever, the absence of this kind of detailed information until late April raises the fol-
lowing potential issues for Congress: 

• If  the  submission  to  Congress  in  February  or  March  of  detailed,  multi-year  in-
formation  on  costs  and  procurement  schedules  of  major  DOD  acquisition  pro-
grams  is  considered  necessary,  even  critical,  to  ensuring  adequate  Congres-
sional oversight of these DOD programs, why would the submission to Congress 
in  February  or  March  of  detailed,  multiyear  information  on  costs  and  procure-
ment schedules of the Deepwater Program or other large Coast Guard (or DHS) 
acquisition  programs  not  be  necessary  or  critical  to  ensure  adequate  oversight 
of these Coast Guard (or DHS) programs? 
• If,  for  the  Deepwater  Program,  Congress  lacks,  until  late  April,  the  kind  of  de-
tailed,  multiyear  information  on  costs  and  procurement  schedules  that  is  typi-
cally made available to Congress in February or March for major DOD acquisi-
tion  programs,  how  might  this  affect  Congress’  ability  to  consider  potential  ad-
justments  to  the  Deepwater  Program  that  could  affect  procurement  schedules 
and funding requirements in future years? 
• Should  the  Coast  Guard  (or  DHS)  be  required,  for  the  Deepwater  Program  or 
other  major  acquisition  efforts,  to  provide  Congress  in  February  or  March  with 
the  same  kind  of  detailed,  multiyear  information  on  costs  and  procurement 
schedules  that  DOD  provides  to  Congress  in  February  or  March  for  its  major 
acquisition programs? 
• Should  the  Coast  Guard  be  given  more  autonomy  to  share  with  Congress  de-
tailed  information  on  costs  and  procurement  schedules  for  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram or other acquisition programs? 

Deepwater Acquisition Strategy 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  has  testified  and  reported  several 
times on the Deepwater Program’s acquisition strategy and the issues this strategy 
raises regarding Coast Guard management of the program. 

In  addition  to  this  work,  it  can  be  noted  that  the  Deepwater  acquisition  strategy 
appears  similar  in  certain  basic  respects  to  the  acquisition  strategy  for  the  Army’s 
Future  Combat  System  (FCS),  which  aims  at  acquiring  an  integrated  collection  of 
manned and unmanned ground vehicles, air vehicles, sensors, and munitions for the 
Army.13 In  particular,  the  Deepwater  and  FCS  programs  are  both  large,  system-of- 
systems  acquisition  programs  for  acquiring  multiple  types  of  equipment  that  are  to 
operate in a networked environment, and both programs are being executed for the 
government  by  an  industry  entity  acting  as  the  prime  contractor  and  system  inte-
grator.  For  the  Deepwater  Program,  the  prime  contractor  and  system  integrator  is 
Integrated  Coast  Guard  Systems  (ICGS),  a  business  entity  jointly  owned  by  Nor-
throp Grumman and Lockheed Martin, while for the FCS program, the lead system 
integrator  (LSI)  is  Boeing  and  Science  Applications  International  Corporation 
(SAIC).  Using  a  private-sector  lead  integrator  to  execute  a  large,  system-of-systems 
acquisition program appears to be a first for both services. 

Using a private-sector lead integrator to execute a large, system-of-systems acqui-
sition  program  offers  potential  advantages  for  the  government  in  terms  of  taking 
full advantage of the lead integrator’s knowledge of available technologies and inte-
gration  approaches,  and  giving  the  lead  integrator  flexibility  to  make  tradeoffs  be-
tween individual systems so as to optimize the government’s investment at the over-
all,  system-of-systems  level.  As  a  consequence  of  these  potential  advantages,  some 
observers  believe  that  the  lead-integrator  approach  may  offer  a  potential  model  for 
future  system-of-systems  acquisition  efforts  by  DHS,  DOD,  or  other  executive 
branch departments. 

Other observers, while acknowledging these potential benefits, are concerned that 
relying  on  a  private-sector  lead  integrator  to  execute  a  large,  system-of-systems  ac-
quisition program can also create one or more of the following risks for the govern-
ment: 

• Cost control and overall system optimization might be reduced because the lead 
integrator,  in  deciding  who  should  provide  various  parts  of  the  system,  might 
not  always  employ  full  and  open  competition  between  potential  supplier  firms, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

or  might  sometimes  face  a  conflict  of  interest  in  assessing  bids  from  its  own 
subsidiaries against those made by other firms. 
• Cost  control  and  innovation  might  be  reduced  because  the  lead  integrator,  as 
the incumbent on a large, complex effort, might face little or no real risk of los-
ing the contract in any subsequent competition, and might reject innovations of-
fered by outside firms that could threaten the lead integrator’s chosen approach 
to the problem. 
• The  government’s  visibility  into  program  costs  and  tradeoffs  might  be  inad-
equate, and the government’s in-house capacity for making independent assess-
ments concerning the program might atrophy, possibly making the government 
overly  dependent  on  information  from  the  lead  integrator  for  tracking,  assess-
ing, or making key decisions about the program. 

Due  in  part  to  concerns  over  its  acquisition  strategy,  the  FCS  program,  in  recent 
months,  has  been  a  matter  of  oversight  concern  in  Congress.14 On  April  5,  2005, 
the Army announced that it was restructuring the business aspects of the FCS pro-
gram.  The  restructuring  included,  among  other  things,  the  following  actions  in-
tended to strengthen the Army’s management of the program: 

all major changes to the program. 

indepth review of the program at least three times a year. 

• The  Secretary  of  the  Army  and  the  Chief  of  Staff  of  the  Army  will  conduct  an 
• The  Secretary  and  the  Chief  of  Staff  will  serve  as  the  lead  Army  officials  for 
• The  Army  will  establish  an  Army  Modular  Force  Integration  Office  to  ensure 
that FCS technologies are incorporated into the Army as soon as they are ready, 
and  to  integrate  and  coordinate  the  FCS  program  with  evolving  Army 
warfighting doctrine and the Army’s emerging global communication and infor-
mation infrastructure. The new office will be overseen by the Acting Under Sec-
retary of the Army and the Vice Chief of Staff of the Army. 
• As an additional oversight measure, the Army Audit Agency, the Army Science 
Board,  and  an  outside  panel  of  advisors  will  conduct  periodic  independent  as-
sessments of program cost, schedule, and technical viability.15 

As points of comparison with the last of the above actions by the Army, the Coast 

Guard, has done, or is doing, the following: 

• During  the  source-selection  phase  of  the  Deepwater  Program,  the  Coast  Guard 
used  an  Independent  Analysis  Government  Contractor  (or  IAGC,  staffed  origi-
nally  by  the  MITRE  Corporation  and  later  by  Booz  Allen  Hamilton)  to  provide 
the  Coast  Guard  with  independent  assessments  of  the  bids  submitted  by  the 
three industry teams that competed for the right to become the Deepwater Pro-
gram  prime  contractor.  The  IAGC  was  stood  down  following  the  completion  of 
source selection.16 
• During  the  source-selection  phase  and  on  two  subsequent  occasions  (including, 
most recently, during the analysis that led to the revised implementation plan), 
the  Coast  Guard  turned  to  the  Logistics  Management  Institute  (LMI)  for  inde-
pendent cost estimates relating to the Deepwater Program.17 
• In early 2004, the Coast Guard used MITRE to perform an independent assess-
ment of the process the Coast Guard had developed for performing the Perform-
ance  Gap  Analysis  (PGA)  that  eventually  led  to  the  revised  Deepwater  Imple-
mentation Plan.18 
• As  of  late-April  2005,  a  third-party  assessment  of  the  use  of  competition  by 

ICGS was in progress.19 

The broad similarities between the Deepwater and FCS acquisition strategies, and 
the  Army’s  recent  actions  to  strengthen  its  management  of  the  FCS  program,  raise 
the following potential oversight questions for Congress: 

• How do the Coast Guard’s arrangements for managing the Deepwater Program 
compare  to  the  Army’s  arrangements,  as  recently  restructured,  for  managing 
the FCS program? 
• Are the Army’s arrangements for managing the FCS program stronger in some 
ways  than  the  Coast  Guard’s  arrangements  for  managing  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram,  and  if  so,  should  the  Coast  Guard  consider  adopting  the  stronger  Army 
measures? 
• How  does  the  Coast  Guard  compare  to  the  Army  in  terms  of  in-house  acquisi-
tion-management and system-integration expertise? Does the Coast Guard have 
enough  in-house  system-integration  expertise  to  conduct  complete  and  fully 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

independent assessments of ICGS decisions and recommendations regarding the 
Deepwater Program’s system-integration approach? 
• Should  the  Coast  Guard  establish  a  standing  independent  organization—per-
haps  similar  to  the  Deepwater  source-selection  IAGC  (but  permanent  in  na-
ture),  or  to  the  Army’s  outside  board  of  advisors  for  the  FCS  program—to  pro-
vide periodic and ongoing assessments of ICGS decisions and recommendations 
regarding the Deepwater Program, including decisions relating to the program’s 
system-integration  approach,  or  to  solicit  and  assess,  on  an  ongoing  basis,  pro-
posed  innovations  for  the  Deepwater  Program,  particularly  from  firms  outside 
the ICGS team? 
• Have the Coast Guard and Army established a regular process for sharing with 
each  other  their  experiences  in  managing  the  Deepwater  and  FCS  programs, 
and  for  trading  ideas  for  improving  their  management  of  the  programs?  If  not, 
would the Coast Guard and Army benefit from establishing such a process? 

Madam  Chair,  Senator  Cantwell,  distinguished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
this  concludes  my  testimony.  Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before 
you to discuss these issues. I will be pleased to respond to any questions you might 
have. 
ENDNOTES 

1 This section is based largely on an April 28, 2005, Coast Guard briefing to CRS 
and  follow-on  April  29,  2005,  telephone  discussion  with  CRS,  on  the  performance 
gap analysis and force structure determination process underlying the revised Deep-
water  Implementation  Plan,  and  on  supporting  documents  provided  by  the  Coast 
Guard to CRS. 

2 Coast  Guard  officials  stated  that  the  Bureau  of  Immigration  and  Customs  En-
forcement  (ICE)  is,  for  the  time  being,  performing  the  fixed-wing  portion  of  these 
operations. 

3 The  briefing  materials  used  by  the  Coast  Guard  for  its  April  28,  2005,  briefing 
to  CRS  show  an  unlabeled  capacity  level  beyond  Level  3  that  fits  the  description 
provided here. Coast Guard officials agreed at the briefing that, for purposes of this 
discussion, this capacity level could be called Level 4. 

4 John Birkler et al., The U.S. Coast Guard’s Deepwater Force Modernization Plan, 
Can  It  Be  Accelerated?  Will  It  Meet  Changing  Security  Needs?  RAND  Corporation, 
Santa Monica (CA), 2004. See especially Table 4–2 on page 70. 

5 For  example,  Section  888(i)  of  H.R.  5005/P.L.  107–296  of  November  25,  5  2002, 
the  bill  that  established  DHS,  required  a  report  to  Congress  on  feasibility  and  po-
tential implications for cost, capability, readiness, and operational efficiency of com-
pressing Deepwater procurement from 20 years to 10 years. 

6 See  CRS  Report  RS21059,  Navy  DD(X)  and  CG(X)  Programs:  Background  and 
Issues for Congress, by Ronald O’Rourke; CRS Report RL32109, Navy DD(X), CG(X), 
and LCS Ship Acquisition Programs: Oversight Issues and Options for Congress, by 
Ronald O’Rourke; and RS21019, Coast Guard Deepwater Program: Background and 
Issues for Congress, by Ronald O’Rourke. 

7 Until recently, the DD(X) was being developed by a national industry team lead 
by NGSS and Raytheon. The team also included GD/BIW as well as Lockheed Mar-
tin, Boeing, and several other companies. Under the Navy’s DD(X) acquisition strat-
egy of record, which was approved by DOD in February 2004, the first DD(X) would 
be  built  by  NGSS,  the  second  DD(X)  would  be  built  GD/BIW,  and  contracts  for 
building the first six DD(X)s would be equally divided between NGSS and GD/BIW. 
In  February  2005,  Navy  officials  announced  that  they  would  seek  approval  from 
DOD  to  instead  hold  a  one-time,  winner-take-all  competition  between  NGSS  and 
GD/BIW to build all DD(X)s. On April 20, 2005, DOD deferred this proposal as pre-
mature,  but  agreed  to  a  Navy  proposal  to  separate  the  DD(X)  system-development 
and  software-development  contracts  from  the  DD(X)  detailed-design  effort.  Section 
1019  of  the  Emergency  Supplemental  Appropriations  Act  for  2005  (H.R.  1268/P.L. 
109–13 of May 11, 2005) effectively prohibits a winner-take-all competition to build 
all  DD(X)s.  The  provision  does  not  prohibit  the  Navy  from  shifting  to  a  new  DD(X) 
acquisition  strategy  that  somehow  involves  a  second  shipyard,  even  if  that  involve-
ment  were  limited,  for  example,  to  building  only  one  ship  in  the  DD(X)  program. 
On  May  25,  2005,  the  Navy  announced  that,  in  light  of  Section  1019,  it  wants  to 
shift  to  a  DD(X)  acquisition  strategy  under  which  two  DD(X)s  would  be  procured 
in FY 2007, with one to be designed and built by NGSS and the other by GD/BIW. 
Each  ship  might  be  split-funded  (i.e.,  incrementally  funded)  in  FY  2007  and  FY 
2008.  The  two  yards  might  then  compete  for  the  right  to  build  all  subsequent 
DD(X)s,  in  which  case  this  strategy  could  be  viewed,  at  that  point,  as  a  ‘‘winner- 
takes-all-remaining-ships’’ approach. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

8 See, for example, John T. Bennett, ‘‘Defense Officials Say Littoral Combat Ships 

Could Defend U.S. Shores,’’ Inside the Pentagon, October 21, 2004. 

9 For more on the LCS program, see RS21305, Navy Littoral Combat Ship (LCS): 
Background  and  Issues  for  Congress,  by  Ronald  O’Rourke,  and  CRS  Report  32109, 
op cit. 

10 A recent press article stated that Admiral Vernon Clark, the Chief of Naval Op-
erations,  is  ‘‘absolutely  convinced’’  there  will  be  ‘‘a  rush  to  [build]  50,’’  and  then  a 
move  to  construct  another  25  or  50  ships.  ‘‘I  think  well  see  more  than’’  just  50  or 
60 of the vessels, he said in an interview. 

(Dave  Ahearn,  ‘‘CNO  Clark  Sees  LCS  Fleet  Of  75–100  Ships,’’  Defense  Today, 
June 3, 2005: 1–3. Bracketed word as in the article.) 

An  earlier  article  stated  that  in  a  January  2005  speech  at  the  annual  Surface 

Navy Association symposium, 

the  CNO  acknowledged  that  ‘‘the  navy  is  not  correctly  balanced  and  optimised 
for the world of the future, and . . . faces a three-decade-long effort to fully re-
form  its  forces  to  accommodate  national  security  needs  such  as  anti-terrorism 
and homeland security.’’ 
‘‘This is going to be a dramatically different navy,’’ Adm Clark concluded. ‘‘I ex-
pect  to  have  50  to  75,  maybe  even  100  LCSs  out  there.  Why?  Because  I  think 
that’s  the  kind  of  platform  you’re  going  to  need  for  the  world  that  we’re  living 
in.’’ 

(Scott  C.  Truver,  ‘‘Transformation:  A  Bridge  Too  Far,’’  Jane’s  Navy  International, 

March 2005: 24–26, 28–31. Ellipsis as in the article.) 

11 The National Fleet policy statement is a joint Navy-Coast Guard document first 
signed  in  1998  and  updated  in  2002  that  commits  the  two  services  to  coordinate 
their activities in several areas, including acquisition. Among other things, the docu-
ment commits each service ‘‘to build a National Fleet of multi-mission surface com-
batants,  major  cutters,  patrol  boats,  and  aircraft  to  maximize  our  effectiveness 
across all naval and maritime missions.’’ 

12 U.S.  Coast  Guard,  Budget  Estimates,  Fiscal  Year  2006,  Integrated  Deepwater 
System.  50  pp.  Page  ii  of  the  document  states  that  it  is  a  supplement  to  the  Coast 
Guard’s  FY  2006  budget  submission.  The  Coast  Guard  submitted  this  document  to 
Congress  on  April  29,  2005,  and  provided  CRS  a  copy  on  May  3,  2005.  The  Coast 
Guard  submitted  to  Congress  another  document  containing  additional  information 
on May 31, 2005, and provided CRS a copy on June 15, 2005. 

13 For  more  on  the  FCS  program,  see  CRS  Report  RL32888,  The  Army’s  Future 

Combat System (FCS): Background and Issues for Congress, by Andrew Feickert. 

14 See,  for  example,  Jen  DiMascio,  ‘‘McCain  Questions  Army  Leaders  About  FCS 
Contracting  Agreement,’’  Inside  the  Army,  March  21,  2004;  Jonathan  Karp  and 
Andy  Pasztor,  ‘‘Army  Program  Run  By  Boeing  Faces  Challenge  By  Sen.  McCain,’’ 
Wall Street Journal, March 15, 2005: 4. See also John Liang, ‘‘Wynne: LSI Concept 
Working Well For Army’s Future Combat System,’’ InsideDefense.com, February 13, 
2005;  Scott  Nance,  ‘‘Army  Likely  To  Increase  Use  Of  Systems  Integration  Contrac-
tors,’’ Defense Today, January 10, 2005: 1, 2; Dave Ahearn, ‘‘Boeing Doesn’t Eclipse 
Army Oversight Of FCS: General,’’ Defense Today, October 27, 2004. 

15 U.S. Army News Release, ‘‘Army Announces Business Restructuring of the FCS 
Program,’’  April 
[http://www4.army.mil/ocpa/print.php?storyl 
idlkey=7125]  See  also  Jen  DiMascio,  ‘‘Army  Announces  Future  Combat  System 
Contract  Restructuring,’’  Inside  the  Army,  April  11,  2005;  and  Jonathan  Karp  and 
Andy  Pasztor,  ‘‘About-Face:  Army’s  Decision  On  Boeing  Changes  Philosophy,’’  Wall 
Street Journal, April 6, 2005. 

16 Source: Telephone consultation with Deepwater Program office, May 3, 2005. 
17 Ibid. 
18 MITRE  Corporation,  Independent  Assessment  of  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Deepwater 
Performance  Gap  Analysis  Process,  McLean  (VA),  2004.  (Version  1.0,  March  30, 
2004, MITRE Center for Enterprise Modernization, McLean, Virginia) A copy of this 
report was provided to CRS by the Coast Guard during the April 28, 2005 briefing. 
19 U.S.  Coast  Guard.  Oversight  and  Management  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Integrated 
Deepwater System, Washington, 2005. (Rear Adm. Patrick M. Stillman, USCG, Pro-
gram  Executive  Officer,  Integrated  Deepwater  System,  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Head-
quarters, Washington, D.C., 27 April 2005) p. 5. 

5, 

2005. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. Thank you all very much. 
Admiral  Collins,  in  just,  you  know,  evaluating  this  plan,  getting 
back  to  the  original  question  as  to  why  the  Coast  Guard  would  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

recommending a decreasing number of ships from the pre-9/11 plan 
to the post-9/11 plan. On what basis is that recommendation made? 
Admiral  COLLINS.  Actually,  it’s—of  course,  the  new  implementa-
tion  plan  is  a  range  that  is  recommended,  and  the  range  from—as 
you  can  see,  the  numbers  are  very,  very  close  to  what  the  pre-9/ 
11  numbers  were.  So,  the—from  my  perspective,  the  default  set-
ting, going in here, is the high-end of the range, and should be tem-
pered  by  actual  performance  that  we  continue  to  examine  and 
model.  We’re  underway  with  the  fourth  level  of  a—or  performance 
gap  analysis  will—the  very—all  the  specific  numbers  now  in  that 
range will be modeled, through the course of this summer and into 
the  fall,  to  simulate  and  gain  detailed  numbers  on  the  operational 
effectiveness  of  the  specific  implementation  plan  in  the  respective 
ranges. 

Our emphasis in 2006 is to get the capability part right, as a pri-
ority. It’s very, very important, in this phase of this systems-of-sys-
tems, to get the lineup correct, and lineup in terms of what—when 
do we introduce what platform, on what set of capabilities? How to 
get  that  right  is  a  matter  of  priority  as  we  go  and  design,  and  so 
forth, the systems. Where we are in time mandates that we do that 
as  a  matter  of  priority.  That’s  where  we  put—that’s  where  we  put 
our priorities this year. And I’m very, very pleased that we did get 
a new mission needs statement approved in the Department, a new 
mission  needs  statement  approved  in  the  White  House,  and  a 
strong receptivity on the Hill, in terms of these capabilities. 

So, that’s been our priority. We will temper the capacity part, the 
numbers  part,  for  the  duration  of  the  project.  And  I  see  that  as  a 
dynamic  process,  not  as  a  static  process.  If  we  find  that  the  prom-
ised  performance  enhancements  of  this  new  enhanced  system-by- 
system  that  we’re  developing  doesn’t  pan  out,  then  we’re  going  to 
have  to  adjust  those  numbers.  But  I  see  it  as  a  dynamic  process, 
not  as  a  point  estimate  in  time,  but  something  you  temper  with 
modeling  and  actual  performance  after  the  systems  get  delivered. 
And we will continue to do that, and that’s our full intent. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, my concern is the fact that, in terms of the 
numbers  here,  that  the  primary  investments  are  made,  and,  obvi-
ously, retrofitting current assets, aging assets, and not really mak-
ing  a  request  for  new  and  additional  assets.  I  do  not  think  that  it 
reflects  reality,  to  be  honest  with  you.  I  have  always  been  told— 
and  I  used  to  chair  the  Sea  Power  Subcommittee,  that  quantity 
was  a  quality  of  its  own.  And  I  know  Mr.  O’Rourke  said  in  his 
statement,  that  this  is  turning  it  on  its  head  here  now,  that  it’s 
quality is a quantity all of its own. And I know in this environment 
and what you are requested to do each and every day, I just do not 
see  how  this  is  going  to  bear  out,  in  terms  of  realistic  demands  on 
the Coast Guard. 

Admiral COLLINS. Let me just make a—if I could, Madam Chair-
man,  just  a  point  in  clarification  on  the  money  invested  in  legacy 
systems.  The  type  of  investment  we’re  making  in  the  legacy  sys-
tem,  the  nature  of  the  investment,  is  crucial  here,  because  if  you 
look  at  the  total  amount  of  money  that  we’re  investing  in  legacy 
systems in 2006, under the President’s request, the vast preponder-
ance of that is not for sustainment. The vast preponderance of that 
is conversion, and it’s to take the assets and make them Deepwater 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

assets.  So,  that’s  a  long-term  investment  that’ll  pay  off  in  the  40- 
year  framework.  The  true  maintenance/sustainment  part  is  only— 
is  mostly  focused  on  the  surface  fleet.  And  in  the  case  of  the  2006 
budget, it’s $37.5 million, what we call a mission-effectiveness pro-
gram.  So,  the  real  focus  put  the  Band-Aids  on  the  systems  and 
keep them running—is $37.5. The enhancement part is all the rest 
of that money, $133 million of which, alone, is for the new engines 
on the helicopter, and that’s the Deepwater investment. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, I am going to disagree on the fundamental 
premise,  on  the  issue  of  capacity  versus  capabilities.  I  just  think 
that the demand is much greater on Coast Guard, and particularly 
in  the  homeland-security  area,  and,  obviously,  in  the  traditional 
missions of the Coast Guard. I understand, on the conversions and 
enhancing  performance—I  mean,  I  think  we  all  understand  that. 
But the fact that you’re diminishing the numbers here is what con-
cerns  me  in  this  environment.  If  you  were  requesting  that  pre-9/ 
11,  and  now  we’re  saying,  ‘‘Well,  we  can  do  more  with  less’’—I 
know  we’re  refitting,  I  know  we’re  converting,  but  you’re  still  sus-
taining  the  legacy  assets  in  maintenance  is  drawing  25  percent  of 
the  Deepwater  Program  currently.  And  that  will  only  get  worse 
over time. 

Ms.  Wrightson—and  I  would  like  to  have  you  address  this,  as 
well,  Admiral  Collins  and  Mr.  O’Rourke—the  issue  of  acceleration. 
You  know,  which  is  worse?  Being  able—you  know,  the  degrading 
readiness of the Coast Guard’s assets or trying to grapple with the 
idea  of  acceleration  that  in—many  of  the  studies  have  indicated  it 
will save taxpayers money. If you go from a 10- to 15-year program, 
it’ll save $4 billion. 

Ms. WRIGHTSON. I knew you’d ask the question, so I prepared my 

response. 

First,  I  want  to  agree  with  the  Commandant  that  the  statistics 
that have been talked about, in terms of how much money is actu-
ally going into sustained legacy assets that are planned for replace-
ment  is  now  3.9  percent  of  the  requested  proposal.  That  is  less 
than  is  going  into  management  of  the  contract.  That’s  important. 
In  terms  of  acceleration,  the  real  issue  here  is  about  balancing 
the  risks.  There  is  no  doubt  that  there  could  be  cost  savings  in  a 
perfect  world,  where  you  could  simply  put  another  asset  on  the 
water,  or  in  the  air.  However,  managing  the  risk,  going  forward, 
is not a simple issue, and it won’t—it doesn’t allow me a simple an-
swer. 

I  want  to  say  one  thing  that  I  think  you  would  like  to  hear, 
which  is  that  if  the  Coast  Guard  were  to—and  if  we’re  able  to— 
see a quick implementation over the year of our recommendations, 
to the point where GAO would be able to close those recommenda-
tions,  then  we  would  think  there  would  be  far  less  risk  to  moving 
forward. That said, it also makes sense for the Coast Guard to con-
sider targeted accelerations of assets that are proven and tested on 
the  water,  rather  than  just  putting  money  into  the  program  and 
pushing every acquisition forward. The former is a much less risky 
approach.  So,  for  example,  it  might  for  the  NSC  versus,  say,  put-
ting  it  into  all  the  other  assets  all  at  once.  So,  that’s  a  less  risky 
approach to the situation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Senator  SNOWE.  Mr.  O’Rourke—thank  you  for  that  comment— 

Mr. O’Rourke, what is your opinion on that? 

Mr. O’ROURKE. My testimony about accelerating is focused on ac-
celerating  the  procurement  of  the  larger  cutters  in  the  program, 
and I have focused on that because there is a linkage between this 
issue and an issue concerning the Navy’s surface combatant indus-
trial base. 

When I testify on Navy shipbuilding issues, I try to sensitize peo-
ple  to  the  option  of  looking  to  the  Deepwater  Program  as  a  way  of 
helping to maintain the surface combatant industrial base. And, in 
my  work  with  people  who  work  on  Coast  Guard  issues,  I  try  and 
sensitize  them  to  the  fact  that  the  Deepwater  Program  can  help 
maintain  the  Navy’s  shipbuilding  capacity  in  that  area.  I  think 
each side needs to be sensitive to how something on the other side 
can link into this. 

My  view  is  that,  because  these  larger  cutters  are  not  revolu-
tionary designs—they are designs that will incorporate well-under-
stood hull forms and technologies—and because the Coast Guard is 
not  attempting  something  tremendously  new  with  these  cutters, 
that  the  risk  in  accelerating  them  would  not  be  great,  as  long  as 
you  locked  down  the  design  of  the  ships  before  you  began  accel-
erating them. 

And, further, it might actually reduce the Coast Guard’s manage-
ment  burdens  over  time  to  accelerate  the  procurement  of  these 
ships, once they’re designs were stabilized, because you would have 
less time involved in managing the procurement of those ships, and 
because you would have a shorter period of time during which you 
would  have  to  devote  management  attention  to  the  sustainment  of 
the older cutters. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Chairman Stevens? 
The  CHAIRMAN.  It  seems  the  CRS  and  GAO  have  the  luxury  of 
accelerating when there’s no money. I don’t know if you realize the 
President  requested  $66  million  for  Deepwater.  The  Senate  appro-
priations  currently  is  at  $906.  The  House  is  at  $466.  And  the 
House  authorization  is  $1.4  billion.  I  think  that  the  responsibility 
for  this  modernization  lies  in  the  Congress,  not  in  the  White 
House, not in the Coast Guard. I do believe so. 

Admiral Collins, have you ever tried to work out a joint procure-
ment  schedule  with  the  Navy?  Why  do  we  have  these  two  ships 
that  are  so  close  together  in  size  and  function,  and  being  built  by 
different  specifications,  different  shipyards?  Industrial  base  is  one 
thing, but do we need two industrial bases? 

Admiral COLLINS. We’ve been closely allied with the Navy on the 
performance  requirements  of  this  whole  program.  When  we  devel-
oped the performance specification for Deepwater, we did it in con-
junction  with  the  Navy.  We  went  to  the  Navy  and  asked  what 
their—we  call  it  Navy—Naval  operational  requirements,  we  need 
to embed in the performance contract. We did that. 

But  they’re  fundamentally  two  different  missions—the  missions 
set.  If  you  take  a  look  at  the  Littoral  Combat  Ship,  for  example, 
that’s  a  premium  on  speed.  It’s  a  premium  on  speed,  in  modular 
approach  to  their  mission.  We’re—we  have  a  different  mission  dy-
namic.  Ours  is  persistent  presence  for  interdiction,  apprehension, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

prosecution,  arrest.  And  we  get  the  speed,  not  through  the  plat-
form;  we  get  the  speed  through  a—of  the  system—the  fast  small 
boat,  the  fast  helicopter,  with  the  ship.  And  we  think  that’s  a—for 
us, it’s a better-value proposition. 

Speed  costs  a  bunch  of  money.  You  buy  a  45-knot  ship,  and  it’s 
a  very  expensive  ship.  Our—the  comparable  ship  to  the  Littoral 
Combat Ship is our medium ship, the offshore patrol cutter. It will 
be a much more affordable ship for the United States Coast Guard, 
designed  to  cost  $200  million.  The  Littoral  Combat  Ship  is  a  $200 
to  $300  million  ship,  before  you  put  one  mission  module  on  there. 
That’s going to be pushing upward to $400 million by the time it’s 
through. 

So, I think it’s a better-value proposition for us. It’s built-in Navy 
requirements  into  it,  so  it  can—it’s  interoperable  with  the  Navy. 
And  we  have,  of  course,  a  national  fleet  policy  statement  that  en-
sures  that  we  manage  and  deploy  our  ships  synergistically.  So,  I 
think  we’ve  got  the  best  balance,  Senator,  on  the  mission,  the  re-
quirement,  and  the  collaboration  with  the  Navy  under  the  present 
approach. 

The CHAIRMAN. Good. I appreciate your answer. That clarifies it. 
Ms. Wrightson, what do you say about that answer? 
Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  I’m  going  to  defer  to  the  Coast  Guard  on  that. 
We  haven’t  done  an  analysis  of  the  relationship  between  the  Navy 
acquisition and the Coast Guard acquisition. Perhaps Mr. O’Rourke 
wants to comment. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. O’Rourke? 
Mr.  O’ROURKE.  I  guess  what  I  would  say  is  that,  on  the  indus-
trial  base,  the  linkage  is  not  with  the  Littoral  Combat  Ship;  it’s 
with  the  Navy’s  DD(X)  destroyer  program.  The  Navy  has  reduced 
planned procurement of that ship to one per year, and there’s con-
cern about whether a one-per-year rate would be enough to sustain 
the  two  yards  that  build  the  Navy’s  larger  surface  combatant.  So, 
from an industrial-base perspective, you look at the DD(X) program 
and  what  might  happen  to  that,  and  use  that  to  inform  a  decision 
on  how  Coast  Guard  procurement  of  larger  cutters  might  be  able 
to help that situation. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, did CRS and GAO look at the problem the 
Coast Guard has, in terms of the increasing cost of maintenance of 
aging vessels, when there is no funding for replacement? 

Mr.  O’ROURKE.  I  understand  that  in  a  situation  of  constrained 
resources,  if  you  were  to  accelerate  cutter  procurement,  you’re 
going to have to get that money from somewhere, and you’re going 
to have to reduce something else to do it. In the longer run, if you 
accelerate cutter procurement, you will reduce the cost of those cut-
ters  through  better  economies  of  scale,  and  you’ll  also  reduce  the 
legacy  costs  associated  with  maintaining  the  older  cutters  sooner. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Are  you  implying  that  Congress  ought  to  have  a 
BRAC  process  to  tell  the  Coast  Guard  to  shut  down  some  of  these 
aging ships? 

Mr. O’ROURKE. I guess what I’m saying is that, in a constrained 
funding  environment,  Congress  will  have  to  make  difficult  choices, 
but they should at least understand what some of their options are, 
and what the tradeoffs are involved in those options. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

The CHAIRMAN. Is one of the options to shut down some of these 

old vessels that cost so much to maintain? 

Mr. O’ROURKE. The option I’m suggesting, that people at least be 
aware  of,  is  purchasing  the  cutters  sooner,  once  their  design  was 
locked  down,  getting  a  better  price  on  them,  and  saving  money 
there, and also possibly saving money because you’re getting rid of 
the  older  cutters  sooner,  as  a  consequence  of  getting  the  new  cut-
ters into service sooner. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Wrightson? 
Ms. WRIGHTSON. Yes, we attempted to do an analysis of whether 
or  not  there  would  be  cost  savings  to  accelerate  the  program,  but 
it  was—in  the  end  of  the  day,  the  Coast  Guard  really  didn’t  have 
the data that we would need to look at it from a systems-of-systems 
perspective.  From  an  asset-by-asset  procurement,  you  probably 
could  do  that  analysis,  although  it  still  is  an  open  question  as  to 
whether we would have the data for it. 

I  want  to  make  two  points  about  the  acceleration.  You  can’t— 
when you think about whether or not you should accelerate, it’s not 
just  about  the  impact  on  the  industrial  base,  although  that  cer-
tainly is important. You also ask—have to ask about risks. And one 
that  hasn’t  been  mentioned  is  human  systems  engineering.  You 
know,  we  already  recognize  that  as  a  major  risk,  and  that’s  the 
people  aspect  of  Deepwater.  So,  there’s  training,  operations,  and 
maintenance—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Stop right there, ma’am. I want to hear Admiral 

Collins—— 

ters. 

Ms. WRIGHTSON. Sure. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—and  my  time’s  already  up.  What  do  you  say 

about that, Admiral? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Sir,  about—of  course,  I  bristle  at  the  thought 
of  laying  up  ships  without  replacement,  Senator,  because  that  just 
exacerbates  further  our  capacity  issue.  I  mean,  we  have  ships 
that—particularly  up  in  your  great  State  of  Alaska,  elderly  ships 
holding up the—— 

The CHAIRMAN. They’re almost as old as I am, Admiral. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  Sir,  they’re  mature.  We  call  them  mature  cut-

[Laughter.] 
Admiral  COLLINS.  But  to  retire  them  without  replacement  is— 
would  be  a  huge  impact  on  our  readiness  and  our  mission  accom-
plishment, so—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That’s  the  answer  I  expected.  You  don’t  have 

that option. 

Admiral COLLINS. No, sir. I think the—what we’re doing is trying 
to  invest  prudently  in  the  current  systems  to  keep  them  at  the 
readiness  level  they  are,  and  then  to  move  as  quickly  as  afford-
ability  issues  and  budget  constraints  and  everything  else  would 
allow us to do. 

Example: the Fast Response Cutter. We—— 
The CHAIRMAN. I’m out of time. Thanks. 
Admiral COLLINS. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes, go ahead. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  Sir,  we’ve  advanced  that  from—that’s  origi-
nally  a  2017  entry  into  the  fleet—we’ve  moved  that  up  from—to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

2007. That is—because why? Because that is one of the legacy sys-
tems  that  are  old  and  tired,  wearing  out,  and  we’ve  got  to  get  on 
with that. We also advanced, by 5 years, the design of the medium 
cutter—originally,  like,  a  2012  type  of  thing,  and  we’re  designing 
that  as  we  speak.  So,  we’ve  taken  an  asset-by-asset  look,  and  say, 
‘‘What  are  the  old  tired  ones?  What  are  the  ones  we  have  to  ad-
vance?’’ So, we—part of the implementation plan was moving those 
two  systems  forward,  and  we  had  to  make  some  tradeoffs  because 
of affordability and budget constraint. We had to move some of the 
aircraft  to  the  right,  to  keep  it  in  balance.  So,  that’s  our  dilemma, 
Senator. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  In  view  of  the  generosity  of  the  Chairman,  do 

you want to finish, Ms. Wrightson? 

Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  If  I  could.  The—I  agree  with  what  the  Com-
mandant  has  said  about  the  cutters,  the  decision  to  take  a  look  at 
those  and  to,  sort  of,  target  your  risks  in  order  to  make  sure  that 
the assets that you’re investing in are the ones you need the most. 
That makes sense. 

The human systems engineering point I was going to make is an 
important  one,  because,  right  now,  what  we’re  seeing,  that  is  a 
growing risk in the Deepwater Program. It’s the people side of this 
program. And, currently, even the Coast Guard is dissatisfied with 
ICGS there. So, going forward, when we look at the mission needs 
statement  in  this  coming  year,  and  analyze  it,  and  when  we  look 
at  the  management  of  the  program,  we’re  going  to  focus  on  this 
issue,  as  well  as  others  related  to  the  adequacy  and  sufficiency  of 
the  MNS  plan  to  see  if  it  really  does  the  things  the  Coast  Guard’s 
going to need. So—and you’ve requested us to do that. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Co-Chair Inouye? 
Senator  INOUYE.  Admiral  Collins,  at  the  present  time  you  have 

in your inventory 91 legacy cutters, is that correct? 

Admiral COLLINS. Depending on—it’s over 200 if you include pa-

trol boats and the whole fleet, Senator. 

Senator INOUYE. But the big ones? 
Admiral COLLINS. The big ones, the—yes, that’s the approximate 

number. Yes. 

Senator INOUYE. How many did you have on 9/11? 
Admiral  COLLINS.  I  think  that  a  side-by-side  comparison,  I’ll 

have to provide for the record. It—— 

Senator INOUYE. About the same, isn’t it? No increase. 
Admiral COLLINS. No, we’re not increasing over the pre-9/11 lev-
els.  There  are  even  less  assets  than  the  pre-9/11  levels.  And  our 
whole  acquisition  strategy  is  not  a  one-for-one  replacement;  it’s 
looking at the performance of the system, is our approach. 

Senator  INOUYE.  And  your  legacy  cutters  are  the  oldest  vessels 

now floating? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Of  41  nations,  Senator,  that  have  comparable 
coast  guards  or  navies,  we  rank  39th  oldest  out  of  41.  Philippines 
and Mexico are the only nations that have older fleets. 

Senator INOUYE. Should we be proud of that? 
Admiral COLLINS. No, sir. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

Senator  INOUYE.  Now,  as  to  legacy  aircraft,  do  we  have  more 

since 9/11, or do we have less? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Our  implementation  plan,  if  you  look  at  the 
numbers  prior  to  9/11—this  is  the  HU–25,  the  C–130,  the  heli-
copter, the two helicopters we have—it’s about the same in our re-
vised  plan,  at  the  upper  limit—about  the  same  number,  and  we’re 
just replacing some with a different type. And including—if I might 
add—and  including  unmanned  airborne  vehicles  to  the  mix,  so  it 
actually enhances the overall surveillance capability of the fleet. 

Senator INOUYE. So, you have some of the oldest vessels floating 
on  this  globe,  plus  no  increase  in  aircraft,  but  yet  you’ve  had  an 
increase in assignments, your wartime assignments in the Gulf and 
surrounding waters have not diminished? 

Admiral COLLINS. Yes, sir. 
Senator INOUYE. Do you still think you can do it? 
Admiral COLLINS. I think that we’re going to have to keep evalu-
ating the numbers. And I think it’ll be—as I mentioned before, it’ll 
be a dynamic process, year by year. We’ll keep modeling. We’ll look 
at  the  performance.  This  should  be  a  performance-driven  budget 
evolution  that  will  allocate  budget  based  upon  performance  of  the 
system.  And,  if  it’s  inadequate—they  will  continue  to  model,  and 
we  look  forward  to  the  GAO’s  participation  in  that—continue  to 
model,  and  if  the  performance  isn’t  right,  I’ll  be  the  first  one  to 
push  that  up—that  range  up  to  the  right—you  know,  increase 
that—based upon what we find, over time. 

Senator  INOUYE.  My  last  question.  You’ve  added  40,000  officers 

since 9/11. Is that correct? 

Admiral COLLINS. No, we’ve added about—we’ve gone about 12.5 
percent to a 47,000 total workforce, including about 7,000 civilians. 
Senator  INOUYE.  What  are  you  doing  with  the  increased  per-

sonnel if you have no ships? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Sir,  the  number—part  of  those—that  work-
force growth was to go to new units that we’ve created. Their focus 
is  security.  Example:  maritime  safety  and  security  teams.  We  cre-
ated  13  of  these  teams  around  the  country—70-person  active-duty, 
augmented  with  reservists.  And  they  went—the  additional  folks 
that  we’ve  got—the  12.5  percent  force-structure  growth—went  to 
building those units, brand-new units, to give enhanced security ca-
pability  to  the  Nation.  And  we  also  added  people  to  oversee  the 
new port and vessel security code that we put—regulation that the 
Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  called  for.  And  we  added 
over—close  to  500  people,  if  I  have  my  numbers  correct,  to  ensure 
compliance  with  those  new  standards—security  standards.  So, 
those are a couple of examples of where the new resource, the new 
force structure, has gone. 

Senator  INOUYE.  At  the  rate  we’re  progressing,  when  do  you 

think we’ll have the tenth newest fleet in the world? 
Admiral COLLINS. Again, sir, what will be the—— 
Senator INOUYE. You said our fleet is the third oldest fleet in the 

world. When will we have the tenth newest? 

Admiral COLLINS. I don’t know. I’ll give you a—it depends on the 
funding.  I’ll—this  all  revolves  on  the  funding.  And  we  talk  about 
the—my  biggest  challenge—take  a  look  at  the  2006  budget.  Sen-
ator Stevens mentioned it. It’s a reflection of the cash-flow and sta-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

ble  funding.  Right  now,  I  have  a  House  mark  that  lopped  off  $466 
million  out  of  the  President’s  request.  The  President  and  OMB 
were—very strongly supported our revised plan, to the tune of $966 
million,  substantial  growth  over  prior  years.  My  challenge  is  sup-
port in the Hill. I’ve got—when I get a mark like that in the House, 
and I—we didn’t get the President’s request on the Senate side, ei-
ther, although a great—very favorable consideration on the Senate 
side;  it’s  much  closer  to  the  target.  But  that’s  the  challenge,  Sen-
ator. I need to have at least the President’s request. Prior to, even, 
the  implementation  plan  being  changed,  up  and  through,  like, 
2005,  we  were,  cumulatively,  down  over  $200  million  from  what 
the baseline capital funding for Deepwater was. 

So,  we’ve  been  continually  shorted  in  this  program.  The  marks 
that we have currently for 2006, both in the House and the Senate, 
cause  me  great  concern  that  this  project,  if  we  don’t  recover  from 
those kind of marks, will implode. This acquisition strategy in this 
project will implode. 

So,  I  guess  it’s—you  know,  you—first,  you  keep  the  ship  from 
sinking,  you  know,  in  terms  of  a  damage  control,  and  we’ve  got  to 
stop  the  hemorrhaging  here,  from  the  budget  perspective—that’s 
my greatest challenge, sir. 

Capacity  issue  certainly  is  a  relevant  issue.  We’ve  got  to  keep 
hammering  away  what  the  right  number  is.  Capacity  is  high—ca-
pability—getting  the  capability  right—that  means  getting  the  ship 
designs  right—is  a  real  priority.  But,  also,  getting  the  budget  flow 
right. And that’s what I’m really concerned about, sir. 

Senator INOUYE. I thank you very much, Admiral. 
Thank you, Madam Chair. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator Cantwell? 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  I  know  there’s  a 

vote on, so I will try to be brief. 

Admiral,  the  Coast  Guard  did  a  series  of  analyses  of  different 
levels of performance and capability based on different levels of in-
vestment.  But  I  think  those  were  all  done  prior  to  submitting  this 
particular plan. Is that correct? This plan doesn’t have an accurate 
assessment of what these capabilities will actually produce? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  We  did—we’ve  done  a  series  of—phases  of 
studies  in  modeling—phase  one,  two,  and  three.  And  they  first 
looked  at  gaps,  and  they  ranked  gaps,  and  they  did—we’ve  done 
risk analysis. The last phase, or the fourth performance gap assess-
ment  work—that’s  what  we  call  it—will  take  a  look  at—model  the 
specific  numbers  in  ranges  that  are  reflected  in  the  current  imple-
mentation  plan.  But  all  that  work  was  supportive  of  that  imple-
mentation plan. It’s just doing a simulation in modeling on the spe-
cific  numbers.  Because  those  numbers  have  danced  around.  As 
we’ve  gone  through  the  budget  process,  they’ve  danced  a  bit,  you 
know,  upon  review  after  review.  And  now  we’ve,  in  the  terms  of 
this  implementation  plan,  fixed  them,  and  we’ll  do  with—the  last 
refined  operational  effectiveness  modeling  here  with  the  specific 
numbers. 

Senator CANTWELL. And when can we expect that? Because, obvi-
ously, our challenge here is to debate, with less resources, what our 
capabilities really are and what capacity we will get with this par-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

ticular proposal. So, how can we get that information so we can do 
a better job at oversight? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Let  me  ask  Admiral  Stillman,  who  is  the  guy 
in  the  hot-seat  managing  the  project,  in  the  specifics  on  what  the 
timeline is on that last phase of the assessment. 

Admiral  STILLMAN.  Senator,  that  will  be  done  in  August  of  this 
year,  as  far  as  the  campaign-level  modeling.  But  I  would  also  add 
that  there  are  different  types  of  analysis  models  that  we’re  using. 
If  you  look  at  this  particular  system,  and  assess  the  capability  of 
the national security cutter, the ship in production right now, com-
pared to the 378-foot cutter that sails out of Washington and other 
states,  we  will  quadruple  our  surveillance  capability  with  respect 
to those platforms. 

Senator CANTWELL. I think what we want is an accurate assess-

ment, so we’re all looking at the same set of numbers. 

Admiral STILLMAN. You bet. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  We  need  accurate  data,  so  that  we  can  then 
discuss  whether  we  think  issues  of  acceleration  need  to  be  further 
considered,  or  whether  we  don’t  think  they’re  wise.  I  think  that’s 
the  big  mystery  here,  right?  We  want  to  see  the  actual  analysis  of 
capability  that  goes  with  this  particular  proposal  that’s  been  sub-
mitted. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  But  we  would  anticipate,  Senator,  by  the  end 
of  the  summer,  that,  you  know,  we’d  be  able  to  provide  you  that 
information.  And,  as  I  mentioned  earlier  in  my  testimony,  we  see 
this as not a done deal. We’ll continue to evaluate and evaluate as 
this  project  matures  and  as  we  actually  deliver  the  asset  and  it’s 
in actual operation. So, it’s—I think this is a never-ending journey. 
We  continue  to  refine  the  information  and  make  the  best  assess-
ments we possibly can. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Can  I  ask  another  question?  Because  then 
we’re  going  to  be  out  of  time.  The  lead-system  integrator  ap-
proach—which  seems  like  the  Army  is  the  only  other  Armed  Serv-
ice that uses that—is that really the best way to keep cost controls 
in  the  system?  And  since  the  Army  is  backing  away  from  that  ap-
proach,  shouldn’t  the  Coast  Guard  look  differently  on  that  par-
ticular model of controlling costs? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Well,  I—it’s  interesting.  It’s  a  common  ques-
tion we get. I think, when we were initially going into this, and we 
looked at the risks—and I think you’ve got to look at risk and cost 
schedule  and  performance,  all  three  of  those,  and  what  are  the 
greatest  risks—we  felt,  after  extensive  study  and  third-party  over-
sight—we  brought  in  acquisition  specialists—third-party  private 
firms  in  to  look  at  it—the  biggest—the  most  powerful  risk  miti-
gator—although  it’s  still  high  risk,  this  project—the  biggest  risk 
mitigator was the systems integration. I can’t imagine us trying to 
tie  all  these  assets  together  and  do—be  our  own  integrator.  The 
risks  will  go  up  dramatically,  in  terms  of  cost  schedule  and  per-
formance.  And  every  way  we’ve  looked  at  that,  we’ve  come  to  that 
conclusion. 

The early estimate would be another 15 percent, at least, in cost 
that  it  would  cost  us  to  do  individual  procurements.  And  then  we 
wouldn’t end up with a system of systems; we’ve end up with indi-
vidual things that may or may not be tied together. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

So, we’ve looked at this since the mid-1990s, every which way to 
Sunday. We’ve come back to the same conclusion, that the systems 
integrator is the most—— 

Senator  CANTWELL.  What  would  you  say,  Admiral,  is  unique 
about  the  Coast  Guard,  then,  juxtaposed  to  other  parts  of  our 
Armed Services, with respect to this approach? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  I  think  one  of  the  things  that  was  unique, 
that, Senator, all these assets were coming at the end of their serv-
ice  life—i.e.,  reaching  technological  obsolescence  at  the  same  time. 
And  I  don’t  think  any  other  service  had  a  full  range  of  its  assets 
expiring  at  the  same  time.  And  so,  this  lent  itself,  clearly,  to  that 
approach. And our capacity to manage, you know, 15–16 individual 
contracts was beyond the scope of our organization. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Admiral. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Cantwell. 
And I’ll just ask a final question, and then I’ll close out the hear-

ing, because we have a luncheon at the White House at 11:30. 

But I just want to follow up on this issue, because obviously, the 
Congress  bears  responsibility,  as  well,  in  terms  of  the  funding. 
And, obviously, the House has its issues, seeking more information 
from  the  Coast  Guard  with  respect  to  the  recent  cut,  at  least  from 
what I’ve read. I hope that that will be honored so that we can get 
that squared away and bring it back up to a higher level. But, sec-
ond, what is driving this process? In the end, I think we all under-
stand,  it’s  being  driven  on  a  theoretical  budgetary  model  that  is 
being,  obviously,  galvanized  by  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget.  And  that’s  what  we  have  to  deal  with  here  today.  I  have 
no  doubt  that  if  we  were  to  put  forward  a  proposal  that  provides 
significantly  more  funding,  we  would  still  be  facing  and  discussing 
the  same  challenges  that  we  are  here  today.  It’s  the  focus  of  this 
hearing.  Because  I  know  all  of  the  analysis  that’s  been  done, 
whether  it’s  the  RAND  study  or  the  Center  for  Naval  Analysis, 
even  your  own  internal  performance-gap  analysis,  when  I  look  at 
the  contrasting  plans  internally,  and  the  numbers,  you  obviously 
were  proposing  a  higher  number.  I  don’t  have  any  doubt  that  you 
would  have  proposed  a  higher  number,  given  what  your  service  is 
facing in the challenges each and every day. 

So, that’s what we’re dealing with here. It’s a number that’s driv-
en  by  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget.  And,  obviously,  Con-
gress  has  contributed  to  that  with  the  erratic  nature  and  incon-
sistent  levels  of  funding  year  to  year.  But  it  is  a  problem  that  we 
must  address  and  grapple  with,  both  on  our  end,  as  well  as,  obvi-
ously,  down  at  the  other  end,  as  well.  Pennsylvania  Avenue,  when 
it  comes  to  these  issues—I  mean,  this  is  the  reality.  We  can  post-
pone  the  reality,  but  the  reality  is  going  to  continue  to  exist,  at 
great  cost  to  this  country,  and  great  cost  to  the  men  and  women 
who  have  to  serve  in  these  aging  assets.  It  speaks  volumes.  The 
Coast Guard is 40 out of 42 of the oldest naval fleets in the world. 
That  is  not  going  to  get  better  over  time;  it’s  going  to  get  worse. 
And so, we obviously have our part to do, in our role and our re-
sponsibility, but I just think that it would be a major omission here 
if  we  didn’t  discuss  what’s  driving  this,  as  well.  Because  I  don’t 
know  that  anybody  has  asked,  ultimately,  in  all  the  bases,  all  the 
studies—internally,  externally,  and  otherwise—suggesting  that  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

should  have  a  decreased  number  of  assets  in  this  moment  in  time 
in our Nation’s history. 

So, I hope we all understand that. I look at the numbers of your 
own  Deepwater  force-structure  studies  and  the  issues  that  Ron 
O’Rourke  raised,  as  well,  in  his  analysis,  where  you  should  be  in 
that  spectrum,  and  what  will  happen  as  a  result  of  not  being  in 
that spectrum—and so, that’s what we have to grapple with. We’re 
all  going  to  play  this  numbers  game.  And  unfortunately,  you  bear 
the  brunt,  as  well,  and  that’s  what  we—I  think,  we  have  to  deal 
with  here.  What  can  we  do?  My  colleagues  have  to  recognize  that 
responsibility,  as  well.  So,  I  think,  the  Office  of  Management  and 
Budget,  that  is  what  is  really  driving  this  revised  implementation 
plan. And I think we all have to know what the consequences are. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  Clearly,  the  President’s  request  was—coming 
forward in 2006, was a function of our participation in the Depart-
ment of Homeland Security, participation in OMB. We all have per-
spective  on  this  requirement,  and,  obviously,  it  was  a  joint  effort 
to come to the conclusions we did, relative to the level. 

Let  me  say—let  me  say  this,  that  I’m  extraordinarily  pleased 
that we were able to submit a budget at a $966 million level. That 
was a huge breakthrough for us. And, I tell you—— 

Senator SNOWE. It could have been worse—— 
Admiral COLLINS.—it—— 
Senator SNOWE.—I understand that. 
Admiral COLLINS.—it took a lot of work—— 
Senator SNOWE. I understand. 
Admiral COLLINS.—to get to that level. 
Senator SNOWE. I understand that. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  And  the  other  thing  that—so,  that’s—that  re-
flects  even—you  know,  it’s  strong  support  by  OMB  to  support  that 
level.  That  was  a  huge  thing  for  them  to  bite  off  on  and  support 
that level for us. And it reflects their interest in this program. 

The  other  thing  that  was  a  major  win,  I  think—and  I  know 
you’re  as  much  interested  in  the  capacity  part  as  the  capability 
part; it’s very, very obvious—but the—but to get our capability en-
hancements  reviewed  and  approved  at  the  departmental  level  and 
at OMB, I think, is a major, major victory. That is a significant up- 
tick in the acquisitions costs—you know, in terms of the range, the 
20—up to $24 billion—$19 to $24—— 

Senator SNOWE. Yes, 20 years from now, though. 
Admiral COLLINS. Yes, I—well, everything—we’ll—— 
Senator SNOWE. I know. 
Admiral  COLLINS.—tackle  one  challenge  at  a  time.  But  that  was 

a huge, huge—— 

Senator SNOWE. Really. 
Admiral  COLLINS.—advance  for  this  program.  So,  I’m  very 
pleased with the $966 million. I’m very pleased that we got the ca-
pability part approved. And I hope—my next-biggest challenge is to 
get  the  support  in  Congress  for  the  President’s  request.  If  we 
don’t—I mean, that’s challenge number uno right now—if we don’t, 
then all of these things are going to set back. For example, just one 
example, one of the things in both the House mark and the Senate 
mark  was  that  they  rescinded  the  money—patrol-boat  money.  If 
that  stays,  then  all  the  progress  we’ve  made  on  replacing  the  Fast 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Response  Cutter,  advancing  that  from  2017  to  the  current  time,  is 
going  to  go  right  down  the  tube.  So,  again,  the  priority  is  to  get 
the  capability  right  and  get  the  President’s  request,  and  then  we 
can  continue  to  examine  and  evaluate  the  capacity  part,  and  con-
tinue to get that right, over time. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  appreciate  it.  I  wish  we  could  continue 
on this whole discussion, but I have to depart. My time has expired 
in the vote. And so, lucky for you. 

But, in any event, I appreciate that. We’re going to have a num-
ber  of  follow-up  questions.  And,  also,  on  the  whole  issue  of  tar-
geting  the  acceleration  and  some  of  the  assets  that  both  Ms. 
Wrightson  and  Mr.  O’Rourke  have  also  raised,  I’d  like  to  evaluate 
that. And also, Mr. O’Rourke, what you’re talking about in the Lit-
toral  Combat  Ship  and  the  Deepwater  assets,  what  can  we  do,  in 
that  respect,  to,  sort  of,  integrate—complement  these  programs, 
and  so  on?  I  think  that’s  an  interesting  question  that  we  ought  to 
continue  to  explore.  And  I  will  work  with  Chairman  Stevens,  as 
well, on these issues. 

But,  suffice  it  to  say  we  have  significant  challenges,  and,  obvi-
ously,  we  assume  responsibility,  as  well,  you  know,  for  what  we 
haven’t done. But I just think that it requires both branches of gov-
ernment to understand the enormous ramifications if we defer this 
so  far  out  into  the  future  that  will  invite,  exponentially  greater 
problems,  without  question.  And  we  know  the  anecdotal  evidence 
that  comes  in,  as  you  well  do,  Admiral  Collins,  and  our  inability, 
because  of  these  failing  assets,  and  what  that  does  to  jeopardize 
the  men  and  women  who  have  to  use  these  assets  on  a  daily,  life- 
threatening circumstance. 

So, I thank you all. I thank you for your contributions. I’m going 
to follow up with a number of questions on a number of the issues 
that you have raised. 

This hearing stands adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Question  1.  How  will  the  Coast  Guard  maintain  heightened  operation  levels  as 

well as surge response with fewer available assets as this plan indicates? 

Answer.  The  25-year,  $24  billion  Revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  gives 
the  Coast  Guard  greater  capability  than  that  planned  in  the  original  Deepwater 
baseline  plan.  The  end-state  asset  numbers  reflected  in  the  revised  plan  represent 
a  net  increase  in  total  force  strength  above  the  original  Deepwater  baseline  level 
with  an  additional  17  fixed-wing  aircraft  and  8  helicopters.  Moreover,  the  revised 
plan  leverages  improved  capabilities  on  all  assets  to  increase  system-wide  surveil-
lance, detection, identification, classification, and prosecution. These capabilities en-
hance  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  maintain  heightened  levels  of  operations  and 
meet  surge  needs  with  fewer  assets  than  the  Legacy  system  being  retired.  For  ex-
ample, a force package composed of 1 National Security Cutter (NSC), 1 Multi-Mis-
sion  Cutter  Helicopter  (MCH),  and  2  Vertical  Unmanned  Aerial  Vehicles  (VUAVs) 
will be able to conduct surveillance over 56,000 square miles compared to a current 
378′ High Endurance Cutter (WHEC) force package which only covers about 13,500 
square  miles  on  a  daily  basis.  Furthermore,  the  NSC  force  package  will  be  pro-
grammed to operate 230 days/year compared to 185 days/year for a 378′ WHEC. 

Question 2. Do you believe that acceleration of Deepwater is not necessary, or sim-

ply not possible due to the amount of funding you receive? 

Answer.  The  Fiscal  Year  2006  President’s  request  of  $966  million  for  Deepwater 
makes a strong statement regarding the urgency of this program by advancing crit-
ical elements such as HH–65 re-engining by 5 years, Fast Response Cutter develop-
ment  by  10  years,  and  OPC  design  and  materials  procurement  by  5  years  while 
keeping essential NSC construction on schedule. 

Implementing  the  revised  Deepwater  plan,  as  submitted  by  the  Administration, 
will recapitalize and modernize the Coast Guard with enhanced maritime safety and 
security  capabilities  necessary  to  ensure  operational  success  across  all  of  our  mis-
sions at a rate that balances risk and affordability. 

Question  3.  What  level  of  funding  would  have  to  be  provided  in  Fiscal  Year  2006 
to accelerate the revised Deepwater Program to a 15-year completion date? Can you 
estimate  what  savings  would  be  achieved  by  accelerating  the  program  to  a  10-year 
timeline? 15-year? 

Answer. Accelerating Deepwater to a 15-year completion date (from the 2002 con-
tract  award)  would  require  completion  of  the  program  funding  by  2016.  Currently, 
the $24 billion acquisition cost is spread out over 25 years. Approximately $2.18 bil-
lion has been expended in the first 4 years of the acquisition. Spreading the remain-
ing  $21.8  billion  dollars  over  the  period  from  Fiscal  Year  2006  through  2016  would 
require  an  average  annual  investment  of  $1.98  billion  dollars  beginning  in  Fiscal 
Year  2006.  Completion  of  the  Deepwater  Program  on  a  10-year  timeline  would  re-
quire its funding be completed by Fiscal Year 2011. Given the complexity and num-
ber  of  assets  involved  in  the  Deepwater  system  of  systems  acquisition,  the  Coast 
Guard does not believe the program could be executed by 2011. Completing the sys-
tem by 2016 (a 15-year timeline) could be executed and would potentially yield sav-
ings. The Coast Guard has conducted some informal assessments as to the potential 
cost  savings  and  cost  avoidance  if  the  acquisition  was  completed  sooner.  To  date, 
our assessments have identified the following potential savings: 

• Contract  Performance  Management:  If  Deepwater  were  to  be  completed  sooner, 
total  project  cost  of  system  integrator  and  government  contract  management 
personnel  would  be  reduced.  Additionally,  a  shorter  contract  term  will  lessen 
the  number  of  performance  award  fee  determinations  paid  out  contributing  to 
further future years savings. These award fees typically average approximately 
$5  million,  minus  10  percent,  and  will  undoubtedly  grow  with  inflation  and 
asset delivery in future years. 

(63) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

• Legacy Cutter Maintenance Costs: Legacy cutters could be retired much sooner. 
Due  to  increasing  age  and  continued  high-op  tempo,  legacy  cutter  maintenance 
costs have been increasing at a rate much greater than estimated in our Deep-
water pre-9/11 baseline planning. The early retirement of these assets will stop 
these  increasing  costs  sooner.  It  will  also  reverse  the  trend  of  increasing  lost 
days due to unscheduled maintenance to repair casualties. 
• Legacy  Asset  Modernization  and  Service  Life  Extension:  If  replacement  assets 
were  provided  sooner,  currently  anticipated  service  life  extension  projects  such 
as 210-foot Medium Endurance Cutter (WMEC) sustainment projects or aircraft 
avionics upgrades would no longer be required. 

Question 4. What are the cost estimates for legacy asset sustainment in the com-
ing years? Will it be more than 25 percent of the Deepwater budget that is now re-
quested? 

Answer.  The  cost  estimates  for  out-year  legacy  asset  projects  have  been  provided 
to Congress in the Deepwater Fiscal Year 2006 Capital Investment plan. The Coast 
Guard  places  Deepwater  legacy  asset  Acquisition,  Construction,  and  Improvement 
(AC&I)  maintenance  projects  into  three  categories:  sustainment,  enhancement,  and 
conversion.  These  projects  will  amount  to  $1.945  billion,  less  than  8.25  percent  of 
the overall Deepwater acquisition cost and are further described below. 

• Sustainment projects are designed to maintain existing legacy asset capabilities 
and ensure the reliability of these assets until they are replaced by their Deep-
water  counterparts.  An  example  of  a  sustainment  project  is  the  Mission  Effec-
tiveness  Project  planned  for  Coast  Guard’s  210-foot  and  270-foot  WMEC  fleet, 
where  obsolete  and  failing  engineering  subsystems  are  being  renewed.  The 
Coast  Guard’s  legacy  asset  maintenance  plan  includes  $338  million  in 
sustainment  projects,  or  approximately  1.5  percent  of  the  total  Deepwater  ac-
quisition cost. 
• Enhancement  projects  are  designed  to  improve  capabilities  onboard  legacy  as-
sets in the interim before these assets are replaced by their Deepwater counter-
part,  per  the  Revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan.  An  example  of  an  en-
hancement project is the upgrade of Command, Control, Communications, Com-
puter,  Intelligence,  Surveillance,  and  Reconnaissance  (C4ISR)  equipment  on-
board  WMECs  and  WHECs.  The  Coast  Guard’s  legacy  asset  maintenance  plan 
includes  $103  million  in  enhancement  projects,  or  less  than  half  of  1  percent 
of the total Deepwater acquisition cost. 
• Conversion projects are designed to renovate and upgrade existing legacy assets 
to  the  point  where  they  are  incorporated  as  part  of  the  final  Integrated  Deep-
water  Solution  (IDS)  force  structure.  An  example  of  a  conversion  project  is  the 
ongoing HH–60J avionics modernization project. The Coast Guard’s legacy asset 
maintenance plan includes $1.504 billion in conversion projects. Legacy conver-
sions total approximately 6.25 percent of the overall Deepwater acquisition cost. 
Question  5.  How  do  you  explain  moving  forward  with  Deepwater  under  the  onus 

of ‘‘more capable’’ versus ‘‘more capacity’’? 

Answer.  The  answer  is  in  the  post-9/11  capabilities  added  to  the  Deepwater  Sys-
tem in the revised implementation plan. They include the improved C4ISR, greater 
speed  and  stopping  power,  airborne  use-of-force,  and  intelligence  capabilities  Deep-
water delivers. These capabilities will enable the Coast Guard to put the right asset 
in the right place at the right time for years to come. The Coast Guard has already 
seen  results  with  the  use  of  these  new  capabilities  recently  installed  on  legacy  as-
sets.  For  example,  enhanced  C4ISR  capabilities  enable  better  use  of  intelligence, 
which  when  combined  with  airborne  use-of-force  capabilities,  is  the  primary  reason 
the  Coast  Guard  has  shattered  drug  interdiction  records  in  recent  years.  These  are 
revised  Deepwater  capabilities  in  action;  once  they  are  installed  in  the  new  Deep-
water  assets  the  Coast  Guard  will  see  similar  performance  across  all  its  mission 
areas. Having more capable assets is the first step to increased performance. 

More  capable  assets  will  be  able  to  do  a  great  deal  more  than  those  reflected  in 
the pre-9/11 Deepwater construct—just as modern power tools and materials enable 
a  carpenter  to  build  a  home  in  a  shorter  amount  of  time  than  the  days  when  hand 
saws and hammers were the norm. 

Furthermore,  our  risk  analysis  indicates  that  the  same  capabilities  added  for  in-
creased  performance  across  all  the  missions  are  essential  for  lowering  the  risk  for 
a variety of the most consequential maritime terrorist threat scenarios. 

Question  6.  When  the  110-foot  patrol  boats  were  being  delivered  to  the  Coast 
Guard, the Coast Guard established a pre-commissioning facility in New Orleans to 
support  the  pre-commissioning  crew  during  its  familiarization  period  prior  to  deliv-
ery  of  each  cutter,  as  well  as  after  delivery  of  each  cutter  as  each  crew  developed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

proficiency  in  operating  the  cutter  before  transiting  to  homeport.  The  facility  was 
located  relatively  close  to  the  construction  shipyard  so  that  warranty  items  identi-
fied  by  the  crew  could  be  quickly  resolved  prior  to  the  cutter’s  departure  for  home-
port. Naval Station Pascagoula seems ideally situated to serve as such a facility for 
the  Deepwater  cutters  being  constructed  in  Mississippi.  Does  the  Coast  Guard  in-
tend  to  establish  a  similar  facility  for  those  cutters,  and  if  so,  would  the  Coast 
Guard consider locating it at Naval Station Pascagoula? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  is  establishing  a  Gulf  Coast  Primary  Crew  Assembly 
Facility  (PCAF)  to  support  the  training  and  on-site  logistics  demands  of  the  NSC 
and  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter  (OPC)  pre-commissioning  crews.  The  initial  PCAF  crew 
of  6  military  personnel  will  be  operating  from  contractor-provided  spaces  at  Nor-
throp-Grumman  Ship  Systems  Ingalls  Shipyard  in  Pascagoula,  MS,  to  support  the 
NSC and OPC. 

Question  7.  Admiral  Collins,  in  a  previous  response,  you  indicated  that  the  HH– 
65  helicopter  re-engining  program  would  send  two  helos  to  Columbus,  MS  in  FY05 
and  six  helos  there  in  FY06.  However,  Columbus  has  the  capacity  to  perform  more 
conversions  during  those  2  years  and  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  deliver  10  helos  to 
ARSC  during  FY07.  Additionally,  the  total  number  of  helos  delivered  to  ARSC  and 
Columbus  combined  is  planned  to  be  29  in  FY05  and  51  in  FY06.  It  seems  to  me 
that the re-engining project could be completed faster if more helos were sent to Co-
lumbus, especially in FY05. Why is this not being done? 

Answer.  In  December  2004,  to  accelerate  the  HH–65  re-engining  project,  the 
Coast  Guard  delivered  a  helicopter  to  Columbus,  MS.  With  its  Deepwater  con-
tractor, Integrated Coast Guard Systems (ICGS), the Coast Guard is examining the 
quality  and  suitability  of  this  second  re-engining  facility.  The  Columbus  facility 
projects  completing  this  first  re-engining  in  September  2005.  This  first  job  is  cur-
rently  80  percent  complete.  If  the  Columbus  facility  meets  quality  and  suitability 
requirements,  the  Coast  Guard  plans  to  fund  a  total  of  five  helicopters  for  conver-
sion in Columbus with Fiscal Year 2005 funds and seven in Fiscal Year 2006. 

Along  with  awaiting  the  completion  and  assessment  of  the  first  aircraft  to  be  re- 
engined  in  Columbus,  there  are  two  other  factors  that  limit  the  rate  at  which  re- 
engining  can  be  accomplished.  First,  the  schedule  for  conversions  is  dependent  on 
the  availability  of  engines  and  airframe  kits.  The  manufacturer  is  producing  these 
items  as  quickly  as  possible.  Second,  removing  more  helicopters  from  service  than 
called  for  in  the  current  schedule  could  jeopardize  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  re-
spond  to  operational  missions.  These  two  factors  have  been  carefully  considered  in 
developing  an  ambitious  schedule  to  re-engine  all  operational  aircraft  by  February 
2007. 

Question 8. Admiral Collins, the Coast Guard and MariTEL Inc. have been strug-
gling  to  find  a  resolution  to  their  seemingly  conflicting  concerns:  the  Coast  Guard 
wants  to  use  the  VHF–FM  spectrum  differently  than  originally  envisioned  and 
MariTEL  wants  to  retain  enough  useable  VHF–FM  spectrum  to  develop  a  viable 
business.  The  difficulty  in  achieving  both  objectives  seems  to  be  technological,  in 
that  their  respective  uses  of  the  VHF–FM  spectrum  present  potential  interference 
problems with each other. MariTEL believes that a technological solution to this in-
terference  problem  that  would  enable  both  the  Coast  Guard  and  MariTEL  to  fully 
develop this spectrum for their respective purposes does not currently exist, but may 
be possible to develop. Does the Coast Guard agree with this assessment? 

Answer. The Coast Guard does not concur with this assessment. 
The  Coast  Guard  is  not  using  the  VHF–FM  spectrum  differently  than  originally 
envisioned  as  the  question  assumes.  The  use  of  the  VHF–FM  maritime  spectrum 
has  not  changed  since  the  Coast  Guard  originally  supported  the  designation  of  two 
VHF–FM  channels  for  an  Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS)  by  the  Inter-
national  Telecommunications  Union  World  Radio  Conference  in  1997.  Additionally, 
the Federal Communications Commission set aside frequencies for AIS in 1998, be-
fore  MariTEL  purchased  VHF–FM  frequencies  at  auction.  While  the  Coast  Guard’s 
designed  use  of  the  VHF–FM  spectrum  has  not  changed,  the  events  of  September 
11  and  the  subsequent  adoption  of  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  of 
2002  (MTSA)  expedited  the  implementation  of  AIS  and  expanded  AIS  carriage  re-
quirements. 

With  regard  to  a  technological  solution  to  potential  interference  problems  within 
the  VHF–FM  spectrum,  confirmed  by  a  study  conducted  by  the  Department  of  De-
fense Joint Spectrum Center in February 2004, the Coast Guard has identified read-
ily available interference mitigation techniques that would permit: (1) the mandated 
nationwide implementation of AIS operations in accordance with the MTSA for mar-
itime safety and homeland security communications; and (2) the development of the 
rest  of  the  spectrum  by  MariTEL  for  commercial  maritime  communication  services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Question  1.  The  revised  Deepwater  plan  lists  a  number  of  enhanced  capabilities 
that will be provided to the Coast Guard. Understandably, most of these capabilities 
are  aimed  at  the  Coast  Guard’s  security  mission.  How  will  these  new  capabilities 
also help the Coast Guard fulfill its non-security related missions, such as fisheries 
enforcement? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is acquiring a future fleet that is made up of a balanced 
system  consisting  of  the  right  blend  of  capability  (the  individual  ability  of  each 
asset)  and  capacity  (the  total  number  and  mix  of  assets).  These  capabilities  are  de-
signed  to  enhance  multi-mission  performance.  Although  our  re-baselining  effort  fo-
cused on homeland security missions, the capabilities selected for inclusion into the 
system enhance performance in other critical mission areas such as search and res-
cue,  fisheries  enforcement,  and  drug  and  migrant  interdiction.  Fisheries  enforce-
ment, for example, will benefit from the enhanced surveillance, detection, and classi-
fication  capability  built  into  the  NSC  and  OPC  which  will  extend  about  four  times 
the number of square miles that a WHEC provides today. 

Question  2.  I  am  a  bit  concerned  that  the  new  plan  reduces  the  total  number  of 
assets, especially given the need for physical presence in areas like the Western and 
Central  Pacific.  Being  able  to  see  and  to  identify  an  illegal  foreign  fishing  vessel 
with this cutting-edge technology is all well and good, but how will the Coast Guard 
catch them unless a cutter is out there too? 

Answer.  Though  the  Revised  Deepwater  Implementation  plan  provides  fewer 
major  cutters  than  the  current  legacy  Coast  Guard  fleet,  it  provides  97  percent  of 
the  total  number  of  current  patrol  days  due  to  increased  operational  efficiencies. 
The  revised  Deepwater  plan  also  provides  21  percent  more  fixed-wing  aircraft  and 
18  percent  more  patrol  boats.  Under  this  more  efficient  force  structure,  the  in-
creased numbers of patrol boats assume more duties in the littoral waters and free 
major cutters to patrol further offshore, such as in the Western and Central Pacific. 
Significantly improved intelligence gained from the new Deepwater system includ-
ing  the  use  of  Unmanned  Aerial  Vehicles  (UAV),  Automatic  Identification  Systems 
(AIS) and common operation picture will enable our new Deepwater assets to patrol 
much  more  efficiently  and  effectively.  These  capabilities  are  true  force  multipliers 
and will allow us to leverage our assets for far beyond the current fleet’s ability and 
capacity. 

System 

Patrol Days/Hrs 

Legacy Major Cutters 
Deepwater Major Cutters 
Legacy Patrol Boats 
Deepwater Patrol Boats 
Legacy Fixed-Wing 
Deepwater Fixed-Wing 

185 Days 
230 Days 
1900 Hrs 
3000 Hrs 
800 Hrs 
800/1200 Hrs 

Number 
Assets 

Total 

42 
33 
49 
58 
48 
58 

7,770 
7,590 
93,100 
174,000 
38,400 
60,800 

Question 3. Given all of the problems that the Coast Guard has experienced with 
its  two  major  legacy  programs  thus  far,  the  HH–65  helicopters  and  the  110′  cutter 
conversions,  I  am  surprised  to  see  that  the  new  plan  would  upgrade  rather  than 
replace  22  of  your  C–130  aircraft,  and  all  of  your  HH–60  helicopters.  (1)  Why  did 
the Coast Guard make this significant change in the plan? (2) Is this really the best 
decision in your opinion, in terms of long-term performance? 

Answer. (1) The Coast Guard is confident that conversion of legacy aviation assets 
to  meet  post-9/11  mission  requirements  today  and  in  the  future  will  be  the  most 
operationally  effective  and  affordable  final  Deepwater  solution.  The  Coast  Guard 
agrees that the 123′ project has had problems, but would disagree with the charac-
terization  of  HH–65s  as  problematic.  The  HH–65  power  and  reliability  has  been  a 
significant  problem  in  the  past,  but  the  HH–65  re-engining  project  is  very  much  a 
success. It is consistent with the original Deepwater MCH conversion plan and has 
given  the  Coast  Guard  positive  insight  into  successful  strategies  for  other  aviation 
conversion projects. The first re-engined HH–65 was flying within 8 months of initi-
ation of the project. The seven HH–65s delivered to date are performing as required 
and  the  project  is  scheduled  to  be  complete  in  February  2007  instead  of  the  pro-
jected date of July 2007. The success of the HH–65 re-engining was one input used 
to  make  the  decision  to  upgrade  and  convert  C–130  and  HH–60  aircraft  into  Deep-
water  end-state  assets.  The  123′  conversion  was  a  very  different  kind  of  project. 
Cutters  and  aircraft  are  designed  to  different  standards  and  specifications  and  are 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

maintained  in  an  entirely  different  manner.  Aircraft  are  enrolled  in  a  very  specific 
and  systematic  maintenance  program  while  cutters  have  a  more  flexible,  ‘‘on-condi-
tion’’ based maintenance schedule. The 123′ conversion project involved major struc-
tural  alterations  with  the  addition  of  13  feet  to  the  hull.  The  MCH,  like  the  other 
legacy aviation conversions, is not receiving major structural alterations but will in-
corporate more reliable, commercially available off-the-shelf engines, upgraded main 
transmission, sensors, and avionics. 

(2)  Yes.  The  Coast  Guard  is  confident  that  conversion  of  legacy  aviation  assets 
will  assure  their  long-term  performance.  The  revised  Deepwater  Implementation 
Plan calls for extending the service life of Coast Guard HC–130s, HH–60s, and HH– 
65s in order to keep them in service for 20+ more years. This service life extension 
is  possible  due  to  the  sound  depot-level  maintenance  practices  employed  by  the 
Coast  Guard’s  Aircraft  Repair  and  Supply  Center  in  Elizabeth  City,  NC.  The  air-
craft  are  taken  down  to  bare  metal  and  re-built  every  4–6  years,  giving  the  air-
frames and many aircraft subsystems renewed service life. Extended aircraft service 
life  is  not  unique  to  the  Coast  Guard.  The  Air  Force  fleet  of  B–52s  began  service 
in  the  1940s  and  is  currently  projected  to  remain  in  service  through  at  least  2015. 
Question 4. How can we be sure that the HH–60 and C–130 aircraft will not have 
problems  in  the  long  run?  The  Air  Force  has  found  that  the  older  C–130J  aircraft 
have  cracks  in  the  wing-boxes.  And  in  December  2004,  during  an  attempted  search 
and  rescue  of  the  fishing  vessel,  the  NORTHERN  EDGE,  3  out  of  4  of  the  Coast 
Guard’s  HH–60  helicopters  were  forced  to  return  to  Cape  Cod  Air  Station  due  to 
mechanical  problems.  Five  of  the  NORTHERN  EDGE  crew  member  died.  Did  the 
Coast  Guard  inspect  its  entire  C–130  fleet  prior  to  deciding  to  keep  them  in  use? 
Has the Coast Guard fully inspected all of its HH–60s recently? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard’s  Aircraft  Repair  and  Supply  Center  (ARSC)  performs 
routine  Programmed  Depot  Maintenance  (PDM)  on  all  HH–65s,  HH–60s,  and  HU– 
25s.  PDM  is  an  intrusive  corrosion  inspection/structural  repair  done  every  48 
months.  The  Coast  Guard  has  also  established  original  equipment  manufacturer 
support for all legacy airframes well into the future. 

As  seen  in  the  photos  below,  this  ‘‘routine’’  aircraft  maintenance  is  extensive,  in-
volving  stripping  each  aircraft  to  the  ‘‘green’’  frame  and  rebuilding  it.  Currently, 
contractor support is used to provide PDM on the Service’s HC–130Hs. ARSC is es-
tablishing organic HC–130H PDM capability by Fiscal Year 2006. 

In  March  2005,  the  C–130  manufacturer,  Lockheed  Martin  Aero  (LMA),  changed 
the inspection guidelines for C–130 wing-boxes based on cracking found in Air Force 
C–130s of about the same age as Coast Guard C–130s. The wing-box problem is not 
unique to the Coast Guard, but applies to all C–130s worldwide. As a result of flight 
hour  limitations/restrictions  identified  in  LMA  Service  Bulletin  (SB1),  the  5  Coast 
Guard 1500 series airframes are limited to restricted operations until they are prop-
erly  inspected  over  the  next  6  months.  The  second  service  bulletin,  overdue  from 
LMA,  will  provide  the  non-destructive  inspection  procedures  for  determining  the 
condition  of  the  wing-box.  The  decision  to  keep  HC–130Hs  in  use  was  made  prior 
to LMA SB1 notification. If the 1500 series center wing-boxes are found undamaged, 
operating restrictions will likely be lifted. If serious structural cracking is found dur-
ing  inspections,  the  Coast  Guard  will  have  to  make  a  decision  on  whether  to  refur-
bish the affected aircraft at an approximate cost of $10M per aircraft to keep them 
in service for another 25 years or remove them from service. 

The  HH–60J  failed  sorties  on  the  NORTHERN  EDGE  search  and  rescue  case 
were associated with component failures. Each HH–60J failed sortie was caused by 
a  different  component,  and  these  specific  component  failures  are  rare  in  the  HH– 
60J  fleet.  One  failure,  a  frozen  fuel  selector,  was  the  first  time  that  problem  had 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
m
e
d

68 

ever  been  encountered.  The  entire  HH–60J  fleet  is  inspected  daily  through  pre- 
flight/thru-flight/post-flight  inspections  and  preventive  maintenance.  The  pre-flight 
inspection  is  accomplished  prior  to  the  first  flight  of  the  day  and  remains  effective 
for  24  hours,  provided  no  subsequent  maintenance  has  been  performed.  The  pre- 
flight  inspection  consists  of  checking  the  aircraft  for  flight  preparedness  by  per-
forming  visual  examinations  and  operational  tests  to  discover  defects  and  mal-
adjustments  which,  if  not  corrected,  could  adversely  affect  safety  or  mission  accom-
plishment. 

Question  5.  Why  did  the  Coast  Guard  submit  not  one,  but  two  different  funding 

scenarios for its revised Deepwater plan? Which one do you really want? 

Plan (CIP). 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  is  going  to  use  the  $24B/25-Year  Capital  Investment 

The  asset  deployment  schedule  (a.k.a.  table  runner)  for  this  plan  is  attached.  It 
shows the delivery timeline of the assets in the plan. The delivery timeline lags be-
hind  the  funding  timeline  shown  in  the  Capital  Investment  Plan  based  on  design/ 
construction  schedules  of  the  individual  assets.  The  table  runner  is  a  graphic  de-
scription of the current notional plan. The actual out-year delivery schedule is predi-
cated on funding availability and Coast Guard priorities. Future Coast Guard budg-
et  submissions  may  include  additional  sustainment,  enhancement,  and  conversion 
projects  within  the  AC&I  account.  This  account  is  subject  to  yearly  availability  of 
appropriations. 

Question 6. Does the fact that the Coast Guard submitted a $24 billion plan mean 
that  the  $19  billion  plan  will  not  in  fact  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  achieve  its  per-
formance goals for all of its many missions? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is going to use the $24 billion/25-year CIP plan. 
Previously,  the  Coast  Guard  submitted  a  plan  that  delivered  a  range  of  assets 
funded at between $19 billion and $24 billion. The $19 billion force level would only 
achieve Coast Guard performance goals if the system actually out-performed projec-
tions.  The  $24  billion  force  level  assures  a  minimum  threshold  of  performance  as 
projected by models used in the planning process. 

Question 7. Why are both of the plans significantly more expensive than the origi-
nal  projection  of  $17  billion  for  completion  of  the  program?  Are  all  of  the  costs  at-
tributable to the new capabilities Coast Guard would acquire? 

Answer. The new plan is more expensive because it buys enhanced post-9/11 capa-
bilities.  In  addition,  legacy  asset  sustainment  projects  are  funded  in  this  plan  at  a 
higher rate than in the original plan, but still amount to less than half of 1 percent 
of the overall acquisition cost. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Question  1.  Will  the  new  mix  of  capability  and  capacity  of  assets  ensure  that  the 
Coast  Guard  will  be  able  to  meet  its  performance  goals  for  all  of  its  security  and 
non-security missions? 

Answer.  Yes.  The  new  mix  of  assets  in  our  revised  Deepwater  Implementation 
plan  will  enable  the  Coast  Guard  to  meet  its  pre-  and  post-9/11  mission  require-
ments. Post-9/11 mission capabilities added include: 

• Network-Centric C4ISR Interoperability 
• Maritime Security Capability 
• Helicopter Airborne Use of Force and Vertical Insertion and Delivery 
• Additional Fixed-wing Aircraft 
• Anti-Terrorism/Force Protection 
• Chemical, Biological, Radiological (CBR) Detection and Defense 
Optimizing  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission  performance  outcomes  across  all  the  long- 
term goals was a key driver for selection of these particular homeland security capa-
bility enhancements. Each capability contributes across multiple missions. 

Question  2.  Which  level  of  funding—$19  billion  or  $24  billion—is  needed  for  the 
Coast  Guard  to  implement  all  of  its  missions?  Does  the  inclusion  of  a  $24  billion 
plan  mean  that  the  $19  billion  plan—$2  billion  higher  than  the  original  cost  esti-
mate for Deepwater—will somehow fall short? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is going to use the $24 billion/25-year CIP. 
Previously,  the  Coast  Guard  submitted  a  plan  that  delivered  a  range  of  assets 
funded  at  between  $19  and  $24  billion.  The  $19  billion  force  level  would  achieve 
Coast  Guard  performance  goals  if  the  system  actually  out-performed  projections. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

The $24 billion force level assures a minimum threshold of performance as projected 
by models used in the planning process. 

Question 3. What steps has the Coast Guard or ICGS taken to examine other as-
sets  such  as  the  Littoral  Combat  Ship  that  Navy  is  acquiring,  as  an  alternative  to 
the  cutters  in  the  Deepwater  Program?  Could  you  describe  what  kind  of  analysis 
was  done  to  evaluate  the  benefits  of  such  alternatives  as  part  of  this  revised  plan? 
Answer.  There  is  a  limited  amount  of  operational  overlap  between  the  Littoral 
Combat  Ship  (LCS)  and  the  Deepwater  Program.  The  Coast  Guard  cutters  in  the 
Deepwater Program are multi-mission assets designed to meet all the Coast Guard’s 
homeland  security  and  non-homeland  security  missions.  Just  as  the  Coast  Guard’s 
statutory  authority  differs  greatly  from  the  Navy’s,  so  too  do  the  tasks  required  of 
the Deepwater cutters differ from LCS tasking. The diagram below highlights some 
of these differences. 

There  is  an  overlap  between  Homeland  Security  (HLS)  and  Homeland  Defense 
(HLD)  mission  tasking  that  the  Coast  Guard  fills  because  of  its  law  enforcement 
and  military  authority.  The  Coast  Guard  is  uniquely  suited  to  ensure  a  seamless 
hand-off  when  necessary  between  HLS  and  HLD  tasking.  To  achieve  this  hand-off, 
all  the  Deepwater  assets  are  designed  to  be  interoperable  with  DOD  assets,  and 
where  appropriate,  have  similar  technologies  to  accomplish  this  tasking.  As  appro-
priate, Deepwater assets are taking advantage of LCS design work. 

To achieve this, the Coast Guard has been closely engaged with the LCS program 
since  its  inception.  Admiral  Stillman,  the  Deepwater  Program  Executive  Officer, 
was  a  member  of  the  evaluation  board  for  the  LCS  and  the  Coast  Guard  has  a 
Memorandum  of  Understanding  with  the  LCS  program  office.  The  Coast  Guard  is 
partnering  with  the  LCS  where  it  makes  sense  to  do  so.  For  example,  Deepwater 
and the LCS project are both contracting with Lockheed Martin for integration, and 
command and control technology. 

The Deepwater cutters are being designed with the requirements to be interoper-
able with all Navy ships, not just the LCS. The Deepwater Program has been jointly 
developing the MK110 57MM gun with the Navy’s LCS and DD(X) programs. Deep-
water  cutters  are  also  expected  to  share  a  common  integrated  combat  management 
system  with  LCS.  Additionally,  both  programs  are  using  vertical  take-off  and  land-
ing  UAVs  with  a  common  landing  system,  and  are  relying  upon  similar  small  boat 
stern launch technology. 

Question 4. Since you haven’t yet completed the Performance Gap Analysis on the 
fleet  mixture  contained  in  the  revised  Deepwater  plan,  how  can  you  be  confident 
that you have achieved the proper mix of capabilities and quantities of assets? 

Answer.  Though  Part  IV  of  the  Performance  Gap  Analysis  (PAG)  study  has  not 
been completed, sufficient information was provided by Parts I through III to make 
a reasoned determination of the fleet mixture needed in the revised Deepwater plan. 
Part  I  of  the  PGA  involved  40  operations,  C4ISR  and  logistics  experts  from 
around  the  Coast  Guard,  supported  by  Coast  Guard  and  industry  operations  re-
search analysts. The team incorporated previous bodies of work including the Deep-
water studies from CNA and the aviation studies, research from Brookings, and oth-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
m
e
d

70 

ers.  Using  a  variety  of  force  structure  projection  models,  the  PGA  I  team  captured 
the capability and capacity gaps of the 2002 baseline Deepwater proposal, proposed 
a  revised  System  Performance  Specification  that  closed  capability  gaps,  and  pro-
jected three candidate force structures to close capacity gaps. 

Part  II  of  the  PGA  study  assessed  the  Operational  Effectiveness  (OpEff)  of  the 
three  force  structures  developed  by  the  PGA  I  process  using  the  Coast  Guard’s 
Deepwater  Maritime  Operational  Effectiveness  Simulation  (DMOES)  campaign 
model. This modeling effort simulated PGA I force structures with the same baseline 
capabilities  as  the  2002  baseline  Deepwater  proposal.  The  study  concluded  that, 
though the larger force resulted in increased OpEff, capacity alone would not maxi-
mize system-wide performance and that a proper balance of capability and capacity 
would  be  required  to  ensure  alignment  of  the  IDS  with  post-9/11  mission  demand. 
Concurrent  with  the  PGA  II  process,  the  PGA  team  initiated  an  effort  to  deter-
mine  the  new  asset  capabilities  that  would  be  required  to  meet  post-9/11  mission 
requirements. These capabilities have been grouped into the following functional ca-
pabilities: 

1.  Network-Centric  Command,  Control,  Communications,  Computer,  Intel-
ligence, Surveillance, and Reconnaissance (C4ISR) Interoperability 
2. Maritime Security Capabilities 
3. Helicopter Airborne Use of Force and Vertical Insertion and Delivery 
4. Fixed-Wing Aircraft 
5. Anti-Terrorism/Force Protection 
6. CBR Detection and Defense 

Part  III  of  the  PGA  assessed  and  prioritized  the  application  of  these  capabilities 
on  the  Deepwater  system.  The  PGA  III  effort  developed  three  increments  of  capa-
bility application and assessed their impact on the system. The PGA III also devel-
oped a qualitative description of the return on investment for the improved capabili-
ties  across  all  mission  sets.  For  example,  the  airborne  use-of-force  capability  yields 
significant positive results not only for the homeland security mission but for tradi-
tional counter-drug and law enforcement missions. 

PGA  I  provided  a  force  structure  framework  that  PGA  II  and  III  enhanced  with 
the needed capabilities. These studies provided modeled parameters from which the 
final force structure and capabilities in the revised Deepwater Implementation Plan 
were  interpolated.  The  PGA,  like  any  modeling  analysis,  is  simply  a  tool  for  sea-
soned,  experienced  decisionmakers.  Leaders  use  models,  but  are  not  led  by  them 
alone.  The  Coast  Guard  is  confident  that  PGA  IV,  which  will  model  the  final  force 
structure with the final enhanced capabilities, will support the decisions it made in 
the revised Deepwater Implementation Plan. 

Question 5. Is it possible, given the needs for shore-based facilities and personnel 
training,  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  implement  its  entire  Deepwater  plan  in  a  shorter 
time frame? 

Answer. The Office of Management and Budget, the Department of Homeland Se-
curity,  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO),  non-governmental  third  party 
reviewers like the RAND Corporation, and the Coast Guard have reviewed the time 
to  implement  the  Deepwater  project.  There  are  various  factors  that  limit  the  speed 
of  build-out  including  those  noted  in  the  question.  The  Coast  Guard  has  concluded 
that the $24 billion over 25 years is the most appropriate time period. 

Question  6.  What  new  assets  would  be  easiest  to  accelerate  and  could  be  acceler-

terms of program management. Do you share those concerns? 

Answer.  GAO’s  concerns  were  that  accelerating  several  platforms  would  require 
design  and  development  efforts.  These  multiple,  simultaneous  development  efforts 

ated with the least risks in terms of the GAO concerns? 

Answer.  GAO’s  concerns  were  that  accelerating  several  platforms  would  require 
design  and  development  efforts.  These  multiple,  simultaneous  development  efforts 
were  assessed  as  overly  risky.  The  Coast  Guard  has  advanced  the  scheduled  deliv-
ery  of  the  Fast  Response  Cutter  by  10  years  and  the  OPC  by  5  years.  Selectively 
accelerating one asset over another is not the most efficient implementing tactic for 
Deepwater,  and  in  fact,  would  not  deliver  the  operating  benefits  derived  from 
Deepwater’s System of systems design. To achieve improved operations, assets must 
be acquired in concert with each other in order to achieve the desired level of oper-
ational  results  and  interoperability  of  the  IDS.  For  example,  accelerating  the  NSC 
ahead of the VUAV and MCH would result in delivery of an incomplete ‘‘Force Pack-
age’’  and  a  NSC  with  decreased  operational  capability.  This  would  also  result  in  a 
decrease to system performance. 

Question  7.  GAO  has  raised  concerns  about  what  acceleration  would  mean  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

were  assessed  as  overly  risky.  The  Coast  Guard  has  advanced  the  scheduled  deliv-
ery  of  the  Fast  Response  Cutter  by  10  years  and  the  OPC  by  5  years.  Developing 
these new major assets while also developing and building the NSC and other assets 
currently  in  development,  is  a  major  challenge  and  no  doubt  presents  risks.  How-
ever,  there  are  also  significant  risks  to  continuing  to  watch  the  readiness  of  Coast 
Guard assets decline. The Coast guard will continue making every effort to exercise 
due diligence and mitigate any and all contracted risks. 

Question  8.  I’d  like  for  all  the  witnesses  to  elaborate  on  this  question  I  posed  to 
Admiral Collins during the hearing. The Army—the only other Armed Service to use 
the ‘‘Lead Systems Integrator’’ approach—recently backed away from that approach 
in their Future Combat Systems procurement due to concerns over lack of cost con-
trol. These are similar to the concerns that GAO raised on the Deepwater Program. 
(1)  Are  the  Army’s  new  arrangements  for  managing  this  contract  similar  to  those 
that  the  Coast  Guard  has  in  place?  (2)  Should  the  Coast  Guard  use  this  approach 
to ensure that the costs are kept down? 

Answer. (1) Currently, the Coast Guard relies upon ICGS for both system integra-
tion  and  the  supplier  function.  Were  the  Coast  Guard  to  serve  as  its  own  general 
contractor for the system, the work and the risk for the Coast Guard would increase 
significantly.  The  Coast  Guard  would  not  only  have  to  ensure  cost,  schedule,  and 
performance  of  the  integrator  for  multiple  contracts,  the  Coast  Guard  would  also 
have to resolve differences between those contractors in order to achieve systems in-
tegration.  ICGS  can  leverage  its  industrial  position  and  long-standing  relationships 
to  shape  the  integrated  solution  and  derive  savings  in  ways  that  the  Coast  Guard 
simply could not. ICGS manages both the system integrator and general contractor 
role, effectively reducing risk and making the overall acquisition more efficient. The 
risk  GAO  refers  to  would  not  be  resolved  by  a  change  in  approach.  That  risk  can 
best be mitigated by meeting the challenge to shape the existing partnership. 

(2) The Coast Guard had a study conducted by an independent Federally Funded 
Research and Development Center (FFRDC), Logistics Management Institute (LMI) 
on  pursuing  Deepwater  as  a  traditional  asset  replacement  acquisition  where  each 
asset was stove-piped. These are the ten major projects I discussed. LMI found that 
in using a traditional acquisition approach the projected government cost goal would 
be  $62.9B  in  FY  1998  dollars  to  replace  Deepwater  assets  and  that  there  would  be 
an  estimated  15  percent  cost  avoidance  by  using  the  Deepwater  system  of  systems 
approach  with  a  systems  integrator.  Even  if  the  cost  avoidance  is  only  5  percent, 
the  Coast  Guard  can  put  these  savings  to  better  use  in  performing  the  mission  in-
stead  of  using  the  funds  to  hire  a  large  number  of  Federal  employees  to  acquire 
Deepwater. 

Question 9. Should the Coast Guard conduct an analysis of alternatives to ensure 

the Deepwater Program is on the right track? 

Answer.  Consistent  with  departmental  major  acquisition  guidance,  the  Coast 
Guard  conducted  an  assessment  of  alternatives  prior  to  awarding  the  contract  to 
ICGS.  This  assessment  was  at  the  asset  and  system  levels.  At  the  same  time,  the 
Coast  Guard  organized  its  oversight  of  the  Deepwater  acquisition  into  three  parts. 
The  interplay  of  these  three  organizational  elements  obviates  the  need  for  an  addi-
tional assessment of alternatives at this time. 

The first element is the program organization, the Deepwater Directorate, headed 
by the Program Executive Officer (PEO). The PEO is the acquirer and is responsible 
for ensuring that the Deepwater contract is efficiently ensuring that all cost, sched-
ule  and  performance  parameters  are  being  achieved.  The  PEO  is  also  responsible 
for  the  process  by  which  ICGS  is  regularly  evaluated  and  will  be  evaluated  for  the 
award  term  recommendation  of  whether  or  not  to  retain  ICGS  as  the  Deepwater 
contractor in future years. 

The second Coast Guard organization element charged with overseeing the Deep-
water  acquisition  is  the  Deepwater  sponsor  organization.  The  sponsor  organization 
is  independent  of  the  PEO  and  represents  the  operational  customer  who  will  ulti-
mately  use  the  Deepwater  system  to  achieve  Coast  Guard  mission  performance  re-
quirements.  The  sponsor  organization  participates  in  the  Deepwater  enterprise  at 
the  asset  and  system  development  level.  At  the  asset  level,  the  sponsor  is  rep-
resented  in  the  Integrated  Product  Teams,  delivering  operational  expertise  to  the 
shaping  of  each  asset.  At  the  system  level,  the  sponsor  is  represented  in  the  over-
arching  matrix  team  and  other  flag-level  Deepwater  decisionmaking  events.  The 
sponsor  prepared  the  Deepwater  Performance  Gap  Analysis  and  revised  Mission 
Need  Statement  reflecting  post-9/11  mission  requirements.  At  both  the  asset  and 
the  system  level,  the  sponsor  challenges  ICGS’  proposed  solutions  and  offers  alter-
natives to meet operational requirements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

The third Coast Guard organizational element that shapes Deepwater acquisition 
is  the  Agency  Acquisition  Executive  (AAE).  The  role  of  the  AAE  is  played  by  the 
Vice Commandant of the Coast Guard, the number two person in the Coast Guard. 
The  AAE  reviews  any  major  changes  to  the  Deepwater  acquisition,  like  the  exten-
sive  modification  to  the  NSC,  and  exercises  senior  leadership  by  serving  as  a  final 
appeal authority when the program and sponsor organizations differ over ICGS’ pro-
posed asset and system level solutions. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  actively  engaged  in  the  critical  oversight  of  ICGS  from  both 
a  contract  performance  and  an  alternative  solution  perspective.  No  ICGS  decision 
is beyond scrutiny. 

Question  10.  How  many  of  the  issues  GAO  raised  have  been  successfully  dealt 
with  or  ‘‘Closed’’?  Why  is  it  taking  so  long  to  proceed  with  the  other  recommenda-
tions? 

Answer.  It  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  intent  to  close  out  all  eleven  items  in  the  GAO 
report.  Three  have  been  closed  to  date  and  significant  action  has  started  on  the 
other eight. The Coast Guard feels that all the GAO findings and recommendations 
related  to  improving  the  Deepwater  Program  are  important  and  will  continue  to 
first  resolve  each  issue  and  mitigate  the  risk  and  then  work  with  GAO  to  reach 
agreement  that  the  issue  has  been  resolved  and  the  identified  risk  has  been  suffi-
ciently mitigated. 

Question  11.  Should  the  Coast  Guard  use  an  independent  entity  to  help  evaluate 
the  decisions  by  the  prime  contractor,  ICGS,  (1)  such  as  decisions  to  purchase  cer-
tain  assets,  or  (2)  decisions  to  build  such  assets  in-house  rather  than  subcontract 
them to another company? 

Answer.  As  the  largest  acquisition  ever  undertaken  by  the  Coast  Guard,  every 
dollar spent by the Deepwater acquisition is rigorously overseen and internally chal-
lenged.  Three  internal  Coast  Guard  organizational  elements  exercise  this  govern-
ance and reflect the tight-fisted ethos. 

The first element is the program organization, the Deepwater Directorate, headed 
by the PEO. The PEO is the acquirer and is responsible for ensuring that the Deep-
water  contract  is  efficiently  executed  by  ensuring  that  all  cost,  schedule,  and  per-
formance  parameters  are  being  achieved,  and  that  appropriate  make-buy  decisions 
are made. This began early at the proposal development phase, when the ICGS pro-
posal  was  accepted  with  several  major  components  (e.g.,  123′  WPB  conversions, 
CASA MPA, and VUAVs) of the ICGS solution were not made by the ICGS’ partners 
Lockheed Martin and Northrop Grumman. During the execution phase the PEO has 
acted to ensure that ICGS’ make or buy decisions deliver the best value while meet-
ing  the  performance  requirements.  PEO  oversight  has  been  shaped  by  GAO  best 
practices as well as GAO audit recommendations. 

The second Coast Guard organization element charged with overseeing the Deep-
water  acquisition  is  the  Deepwater  sponsor  organization.  The  Sponsor  organization 
is  independent  of  the  PEO  and  represents  the  operational  customer  who  will  ulti-
mately  use  the  Deepwater  system  to  achieve  Coast  Guard  mission  performance  re-
quirements.  The  sponsor  organization  participates  in  the  Deepwater  enterprise  at 
the  asset  and  system  development  level.  At  the  asset  level,  the  sponsor  is  rep-
resented  in  the  integrated  product  teams  delivering  operational  expertise  to  the 
shaping  of  each  asset.  At  the  system  level,  the  sponsor  is  represented  in  the  Over-
arching Matrix Team and other flag-level Deepwater decisionmaking events. As the 
final  customer,  the  sponsor  is  an  active  watchdog  of  the  Deepwater  procurement 
interjecting best-value judgments in each decision. 

The third Coast Guard organizational element that shapes Deepwater acquisition 
is  the  AAE.  The  role  of  the  AAE  is  played  by  the  Vice  Commandant  of  the  Coast 
Guard, the number two person in the Coast Guard. The AAE ensures that the funds 
appropriated  for  all  Coast  Guard  major  acquisitions  are  spent  wisely  and  exercises 
senior  leadership  by  serving  as  a  final  appeal  authority  when  the  program  and 
sponsor  organizations  differ  over  ICGS’  proposed  asset  and  system  level  solutions. 
The interplay of the PEO, the Sponsor, and the AAE bolstered by GAO’s construc-
tive  engagement  ensure  that  limited  Deepwater  dollars  are  wisely  spent.  It  would 
be an unnecessary additional expense to hire an independent entity to review ICGS’ 
make-buy decisions. 

Question  12.  What  is  being  done  by  ICGS  and  the  Coast  Guard  to  improve  com-

petition for subcontracts? 

Answer.  Competition  for  subcontractors  below  the  first  tier  of  the  Integrated 
Coast  Guard  System  partners,  Lockheed-Martin  and  Northrop  Grumman,  was  pro-
vided  during  the  award  process  of  the  Deepwater  prime  contract.  The  principle  of 
competition has been central to the Deepwater Program since inception. The initial 
competition  started  with  four  industry  teams.  From  these  four  teams,  there  was  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

down-select to three teams. Their proposals included who was designated to actually 
do the task orders such as ICGS partners or the next level subcontractors, with full 
cost  and  pricing  data,  for  the  first  5  years.  Based  on  that  background,  the  GAO 
agreed  with  the  Coast  Guard  that  any  deliveries  planned  for  the  first  5  years  met 
the  criteria  for  full  and  open  competition.  These  included  the  123′  conversion,  the 
NSC,  the  short  range  prosecutor  small  boat,  the  long  range  interceptor  small  boat, 
the HH–65 conversion to the MCH, VUAV, and maritime patrol aircraft. 

The  post-9/11  revised  Deepwater  Implementation  Plan  retains  all  of  those  assets 
with the exception of the VRS helicopter; the functionality of the VRS will be filled 
by  the  current  HH–60  being  converted  to  a  Deepwater  end-state  asset.  Effectively, 
there  are  really  only  three  major  assets  where  new  competition  will  make  a  dif-
ference: the OPC, FRC, and eventually the high altitude/high endurance UAV. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  made  provisions  for  ensuring  that  it  manages  cost  aggres-
sively by using third-party independent cost estimates for the OPC and FRC to en-
sure  that  cost  remains  paramount  as  these  assets  are  acquired.  Given  the  phe-
nomenal  rate  of  technical  advancements,  the  Coast  Guard  will  ensure  that  a  full 
and open competition is conducted to obtain high altitude/high endurance UAV serv-
ices.  Subcomponents  of  the  VUAV,  such  as  the  control  system  and  radar,  will  also 
be competed. 

The Coast Guard also recently conducted a third-party competition review that in-
cluded  a  review  of  the  competitive  procedures  of  the  purchasing  and/or  contracting 
departments  both  contractors  had  in  place  and  determined  that  these  procedures 
were  being  followed.  The  Coast  Guard  plans  to  conduct  this  review  on  a  recurring 
basis.  This  review  is  in  addition  to  the  regularly  scheduled  Defense  Contract  Audit 
Agency  monitoring  of  both  major  contractors  purchasing  and/or  contracting  depart-
ments. 

Given  this  background  and  Coast  Guard  actions  to  date,  adequate  competition 
was  ensured  for  the  first  5  years  and  will  be  achieved  in  the  future  for  any  Deep-
water subcontracts. 

Question 13. GAO recommended in its 2004 report last year, that the Coast Guard 
should  compare  the  growing  total  ownership  costs  of  the  prime  contractor’s  Deep-
water solution against a neutral baseline of what the costs would be in a traditional 
procurement.  Instead,  the  Coast  Guard  is  measuring  the  actual  costs  against  the 
prime contractor’s own original cost estimates. GAO states that ‘‘measuring the sys-
tem  integrator’s  cost  growth  compared  with  its  own  cost  proposal  will  tell  the  gov-
ernment  nothing  about  whether  it  is  gaining  efficiencies  by  turning  to  the  ‘system 
of systems’ concept.’’ Why isn’t the Coast Guard following GAO’s advice on this mat-
ter? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  had  a  study  conducted  by  an  independent  Federally 
Funded  Research  and  Development  Center  (FFRDC),  Logistics  Management  Insti-
tute  (LMI)  on  pursuing  Deepwater  as  a  traditional  asset  replacement  acquisition 
where each asset was obtained by a separate major acquisition project and then tra-
ditional Coast Guard efforts were employed to integrate these separate acquisitions. 
LMI  reported  that  using  a  traditional  acquisition  approach  would  have  projected  a 
government  cost  of  $62.9  billion  in  Fiscal  Year  1998  dollars  to  replace  Deepwater 
assets. The system integrator’s projected baseline for the same period was $50.4 bil-
lion in Fiscal Year 1998 dollars. 

Since  the  system  integrator’s  cost  was  lower  than  a  traditional  acquisition  ap-
proach  cost,  the  Coast  Guard  used  it  as  a  baseline.  From  this  baseline  the  Coast 
Guard  projected  the  annual  amount  of  Total  Ownership  Cost  (TOC)  from  2002  to 
2041  in  Then-Year  dollars.  Along  with  projecting  the  TOC,  the  Coast  Guard  meas-
ured  the  actual  2002  and  2003  TOC  using  a  standard,  repeatable  methodology  and 
the  results  are  shown  below.  The  current  trend  is  positive  with  the  actual  TOC 
being $200 million lower than the annual baseline amount in Fiscal Year 2002, and 
$280 million lower in Fiscal Year 2003. 

Total Ownership Cost 

Annual Baseline 
Actual 

Variation from Annual Baseline 

2002 

2003 

$1.82 
$1.62 

$2.13 
$1.85 

$0.20 

$0.28 

In Billion ‘‘Then-Year’’ dollars 
The Fiscal Year 2004 actual data is being prepared and will be available by Octo-

It  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  position  that  given  the  significantly  lower  cost,  $50.4B  v. 
$62.9B,  delivered  by  the  LMI  study  that  any  updated  study  of  the  same  question 

ber 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

would  deliver  a  similar  lower  cost  for  a  system  acquisition.  Any  further  study  of 
comparative  TOC  projections  would  not  be  a  good  investment.  Instead  the  Coast 
Guard focuses on monitoring actual TOC. 

Question 14. What kind of impacts are the maintenance issues on the 378-foot cut-
ters having on mission performance and time at sea? What is Coast Guard is doing 
to  address  these  problems?  If  this  issue  is  as  serious  as  it  sounds,  why  did  the  re-
placement date slip from 2013 to 2016? 

Answer. WHEC 378 maintenance issues are having an increasing negative impact 
on  mission  performance.  The  percent  of  time  free  from  a  deficiency  in  mission  crit-
ical  equipment  which  causes  a  major  degradation  or  loss  of  a  primary  mission  de-
creased from 26 percent in Fiscal Year 2003, to 7 percent in Fiscal Year 2004. Addi-
tionally,  unscheduled  maintenance  days  (lost  underway  days)  for  the  WHEC  fleet 
have increased from 49 in Fiscal Year 2003, to 229 in Fiscal Year 2004. 

The Coast Guard has identified the top ten maintenance issues for the WHEC 378 
class. Repair strategies have been developed and funded for six of these issues. Im-
plementation plans are proceeding. 

The original plan reflected the desire to decommission 378s as rapidly as possible. 
The  new  plan  reflects  the  desire  to  decommission  the  210s  and  378s.  The  material 
condition  of  the  different  cutters  in  a  class  varies.  Effectively,  the  new  plan  saves 
the ‘‘best’’ of the 378s for a couple years so that the ‘‘worst’’ of the 210 can be decom-
missioned. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON 

Question  1.  Have  you  investigated  the  progress  that  the  Coast  Guard  has  made 
in addressing and implementing GAO’s recommendations since the release of the re-
port? 

Answer. In 2004, we reported that well into the contract’s second year, key compo-
nents  needed  to  manage  the  program  and  oversee  the  system  integrator’s  perform-
ance  had  not  been  effectively  implemented.1 We  also  reported  that  the  degree  to 
which  the  program  was  on  track  could  not  be  determined  because  the  Coast  Guard 
was not updating its schedule.2 They are depicted in Table 5 of my prepared state-
ment (pg. 32 of this hearing). 

As  of  July  2005,  we  have  seen  mixed  success  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  effort  to  im-
prove  management  of  the  program  and  contractor  oversight.  Three  of  the  rec-
ommendations—updating  the  Deepwater  Integrated  Master  Schedule,  developing 
measurable  award  fee  criteria  consistent  with  guidance  from  the  Office  of  Federal 
Procurement  Policy  and  subcontractor  notification  to  the  Coast  Guard  of  decisions 
over $5 million—have been fully addressed. The Coast Guard has made progress on 
implementing  most  of  the  remaining  recommendations,  though  we  continue  to  see 
evidence that more improvements are needed. 

Although the Coast Guard has been responsive to our concerns over the past year, 
three  issues  remain  highly  significant  and,  notwithstanding  the  progress  we  have 
seen  thus  far,  likely  will  take  some  time  to  resolve.  These  are:  (1)  the  effectiveness 
of  the  Coast  Guard’s  primary  tool  for  overseeing  the  system  integrator  (integrated 
product  teams);  (2)  the  attention  paid  to  the  affect  of  programmatic  decisions  on 
overall  costs  and  capabilities  (operational  effectiveness  and  total  ownership  cost); 
and  (3)  proper  planning  for  transitioning  Coast  Guard  personnel  to  the  new  assets 
in terms of operations, training, and logistics (human systems engineering). 

Assessing  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  in  implementing  the  remaining  rec-
ommendations  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  review  of  the  Deepwater  revised  im-
plementation plan that is to commence in August 2005. To that end, we are working 
on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has  made  and 
will  report  the  results  on  a  timely  basis  to  this  Subcommittee  and  to  the  Coast 
Guard. 

Question 2. Has the Coast Guard taken steps to hold the systems integrator more 

accountable for the performance of and costs incurred by subcontractors? 

Answer. In 2004 we (GAO) made several recommendations to improve procedures 
to  hold  the  contractor  more  accountable  for  the  performance  of  and  costs  incurred 
by  subcontractors.  Of  these,  one  recommendation  has  been  fully  addressed—devel-
oping  measurable  award  fee  criteria—and  progress  has  been  made  on  most  of  the 

1 GAO,  Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program  Needs  Increased  Attention 

to Management and Contractor Oversight, GAO–04–380 (Washington, D.C.). 

2 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Deepwater  Program  Acquisition  Schedule  Update  Needed,  GAO–04–695 

(Washington, D.C.: June 14, 2004). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

remaining  recommendations,  such  as  holding  the  contractor  accountable  for  im-
proved  integrated  product  team  effectiveness  and  establishing  criteria  and  docu-
menting change to the program baseline. 

In  terms  of  improving  criteria  for  assessing  performance,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
fully  addressed  our  recommendation  by  providing  additional  rigor  to  the  perform-
ance criteria used to measure contractor performance to reflect those measures that 
are clearly objective and those that are subjective, meaning the narrative comments 
by  Coast  Guard  performance  monitors.  Weights  have  been  assigned  to  each  set  of 
evaluation  factors,  and  the  Coast  Guard  continues  to  refine  the  distribution  of  the 
weights  to  achieve  an  appropriate  balance  between  automated  results  and  the  eye-
witness observations of the performance monitors. 

With regard to holding the system integrator accountable for effectiveness of prod-
uct teams, the Coast Guard has also made changes to the award fee measures that 
place additional emphasis on the system integrator’s responsibility for making inte-
grated  product  teams  effective.  Award  fee  criteria  now  incorporate  specific  aspects 
of  how  the  integrator  is  managing  the  program,  including  administration,  manage-
ment  commitment,  collaboration,  training,  and  empowerment  of  these  teams.  How-
ever,  concerns  remain  about  whether  the  teams  are  effectively  accomplishing  their 
goals. 

Further, concerns remain about the broader issues of accountability for achieving 
the  overarching  goals  of  minimizing  total  ownership  cost  and  maximizing  oper-
ational  effectiveness.  While  the  Coast  Guard  has  developed  models  to  measure  the 
system  integrator’s  performance  in  operational  effectiveness  and  total  ownership 
cost,  concrete  results  have  not  yet  emerged.  In  terms  of  modeling  operational  effec-
tiveness,  the  Coast  Guard’s  models  are  capable  of  simulating  the  effect  of  the  new 
asset  capabilities  on  its  ability  to  meets  its  missions;  however,  until  additional  as-
sets become operational, progress toward this goal will be difficult to determine. 

With regard to total ownership cost, the Coast Guard does not plan to implement 
our  recommendation.  Despite  concurring  with  it  at  the  time  of  our  March  2004  re-
port,  the  Coast  Guard  has  not  adhered  to  its  original  plan,  set  forth  in  the  Deep-
water Program management plan, of establishing as its baseline a cost not to exceed 
the  dollar  value  of  replacing  the  assets  under  a  traditional  approach  (e.g.,  on  an 
asset-by-asset basis rather than a system of systems approach). Although the Coast 
Guard initially established a cost baseline consistent with the program management 
plan’s approach, the Coast Guard has not updated it to reflect changes made to the 
system integrator’s cost estimate baseline, and therefore, is not being used to evalu-
ate  the  contractor’s  progress  in  holding  down  total  ownership  cost.  As  a  result,  the 
cost  baseline  being  used  to  measure  total  ownership  cost  is  not  the  Coast  Guard’s, 
but  rather  is  the  system  integrator’s  own  cost  estimate.  As  we  reported  in  March 
2004,3 we believe that measuring the system integrator’s cost growth compared with 
its  own  cost  proposal  will  tell  the  government  nothing  about  whether  it  is  gaining 
efficiencies  by  turning  to  the  system  of  systems  concept  rather  than  the  traditional 
asset-by-asset approach. Although the Deepwater Program has undergone a number 
of  alterations  since  the  contract  was  awarded  in  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  has  not 
studied  whether  the  system  of  systems  approach  is  still  more  cost  effective  as  op-
posed to a traditional acquisition approach. Thus, the Coast Guard will lack this in-
formation as it prepares to decide whether to award the first contract option begin-
ning in June 2006. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  made  progress  in  implementing  our  recommendation  to  es-
tablish  criteria  and  document  changes  to  the  Deepwater  Program  baseline.  Coast 
Guard  officials  stated  that  the  contract  total  ownership  cost  and  operational  effec-
tiveness  baseline  is  adjusted  based  on  approved  decision  memorandums  from  the 
Agency  Acquisition  Executive,  the  Vice  Commandant  of  the  Coast  Guard.  Such 
memorandums  were  originally  approved  by  the  Program  Executive  Officer  on  a 
case-by-case  basis.  As  we  reported  in  March  2004,4 establishing  a  solid  baseline 
against  which  to  measure  progress  in  lowering  total  ownership  cost  is  critical  to 
holding the contractor accountable. 

Assessing  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  in  continuing  to  implement  these  rec-
ommendations  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  review  of  the  Deepwater  revised  im-
plementation plan that is to commence in August 2005. To that end, we are working 
on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has  made  and 
will  report  the  results  on  a  timely  basis  to  this  Subcommittee  and  to  the  Coast 
Guard. 

3 GAO–04–380. 
4 GAO–04–380. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

Question  3.  Is  the  systems  integrator  awarding  subcontracts  on  a  competitive 

basis? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  made  progress  in  implementing  our  recommenda-
tions  aimed  at  ensuring  adequate  competition  among  subcontractors.  To  that  end, 
the  Coast  Guard  reported  that  it  is  taking  steps  concerning  cost  control  through 
competition among second-tier suppliers and notification of ‘‘make’’ decisions.5 While 
we  have  not  assessed  the  effectiveness  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  actions  regarding  com-
petition among second-tier suppliers, we are satisfied with its efforts regarding noti-
fication  of  make  decisions.  It  should  be  noted,  though,  that  we  have  not  assessed 
the effectiveness of the following actions. 

Coast Guard officials told us that in making the decision about whether to award 
the  first  contract  option,  the  government  will  specifically  examine  the  system  inte-
grator’s  ability  to  control  costs  by  assessing  the  degree  to  which  competition  is  fos-
tered at the major subcontractor level. The evaluation will consider the subcontrac-
tors’  project  management  structure  and  processes  to  control  costs,  as  well  as  how 
market surveys of similar assets and major subsystems are implemented. The Coast 
Guard is focusing its attention on those areas that were priced after the initial com-
petition  for  the  Deepwater  contract  was  completed,  such  as  the  HH–65  re-engining 
and  the  C–130J  missionization.6 For  example,  a  new  process  implemented  for  the 
C–130  missionzation  was  a  requirement  for  competition  in  subcontracting  and  gov-
ernment  approval  of  all  subcontracts  exceeding  $2  million  in  order  for  the  Coast 
Guard to monitor the integrator’s competition efforts. 

According  to  the  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation,  the  prime  contractor  is  respon-
sible  for  managing  contract  performance,  including  planning,  placing,  and  admin-
istering  subcontracts  as  necessary  to  ensure  the  lowest  overall  cost  and  technical 
risk  to  the  government.  The  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation  further  provides  that 
when  ‘‘make-or-buy  programs’’  are  required,  the  government  may  reserve  the  right 
to review and agree on the contractor’s make-or-buy program when necessary to en-
sure  negotiation  or  reasonable  contract  prices,  among  other  things.  We  rec-
ommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  be  notified  of  make-or-buy  decisions  over  $5  mil-
lion  in  order  to  facilitate  controlling  costs  through  competition.  We  suggested  the 
$5 million threshold because Lockheed Martin, one of the major subcontractors, con-
siders  that  amount  to  be  the  threshold  for  considering  its  suppliers  major.  The 
Coast Guard has asked the system integrator, on a voluntary basis, to provide noti-
fication  1  week  in  advance  of  a  make  decision  of  $10  million  or  more  based  on  the 
criteria  in  the  make-or-buy  program  provisions  of  the  Federal  Acquisition  Regula-
tion. According to Coast Guard officials, to date, no make decision has exceeded $10 
million  since  the  request  was  made.  While  we  are  satisfied  with  the  Coast  Guard’s 
progress on this issue thus far, the details implementing this recommendation have 
not  yet  been  worked  out,  such  as  specifically  who  in  the  Coast  Guard  will  monitor 
the  subcontractors’  make  decisions  to  ensure  that  the  voluntary  agreement  is  com-
plied with. 

While  these  are  important  improvements  in  internal  controls,  it  is  too  soon  to 
know whether they have resulted in adequate competition or whether other actions 
may  be  needed.  We  will  continue  to  monitor  the  Coast  Guard’s  progress  in  imple-
menting  this  recommendation  during  our  pending  review  of  the  revised  Deepwater 
Implementation  Plan  that  is  to  commence  in  August  2005.  To  that  end,  we  are 
working  on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has 
made and will report the results on a timely basis to this Subcommittee and to the 
Coast Guard. 

Question 4. In GAO’s opinion, which is the greater problem, the documented rapid 
degradation  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  assets,  or  the  potential  management  problems 
with an accelerated Deepwater acquisition schedule? 

Answer.  The  question  as  posed  is  difficult  to  answer  in  general  because  (1)  the 
asset  conditions  vary  with  some  being  worse  off  than  others,  (2)  some  new  assets 
are further along on the acquisition timeframe than others, and (3) acceleration does 
not  necessarily  translate  into  a  more  efficient  replacement  strategy,  particularly  if 
it results in performance problems or assets that when fielded do not meet require-
ments. GAO would be far more comfortable with an accelerated acquisition schedule 
if  and  when  our  recommendations  are  implemented;  we  will  review  the  Coast 
Guard’s  progress  in  implementing  these  recommendations  in  the  upcoming  year. 
Perhaps  the  Coast  Guard  could  consider  a  less  risky  acceleration  strategy  using  a 

5 A ‘‘make item’’ means an item or work effort to be produced or performed by the prime con-

tractor or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or divisions. 

6 The  C–130J  missionization,  planned  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  six  C–130J  aircraft,  is  intended 
to modify and install mission-essential equipment to convert the aircraft into C–130J long-range 
surveillance maritime patrol aircraft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

targeted approach that considers both the condition of particular assets and the ac-
quisition  schedule  for  their  replacements  on  a  more  integrated  schedule,  as  dis-
cussed below. 

The  current  Deepwater  fleet  faces  a  number  of  well-documented  logistical  and 
maintenance  challenges,  such  as  accelerated  aging  through  accumulated  wear  and 
tear and systems obsolescence, though the extent of degradation varies among asset 
types. Much of the critical equipment on many cutters, for example, is highly main-
tenance  intensive  in  the  event  of  failure  and  becoming  unsupportable.  Potentially 
compounding  this  problem  is  the  fact  that  AC&I  funding  typically  used  for  major 
asset sustainment projects is now grouped in the same funding stream as new Deep-
water asset acquisition dollars, which forces these legacy asset sustainment projects 
to  ‘‘compete’’  with  new  Deepwater  acquisitions  (or  conversion  into  new  Deepwater 
assets)  for  funding.  In  addition,  a  substantial  portion  of  legacy  asset  sustainment 
AC&I  funds  in  recent  years  have  gone  toward  the  re-engining  of  the  HH–65  heli-
copter,  leaving  fewer  funds  available  for  other  legacy  asset  sustainment  projects 
that might be needed. 

Acceleration  of  the  Deepwater  acquisition  schedule,  of  course,  poses  its  own  set 
of  challenges.  Testing  of  the  new  assets  is  a  critical  factor  when  considering  accel-
eration; we feel that bringing a few new assets online and having them fielded and 
tested  before  considering  accelerating  their  production  would  carry  far  less  risk  to 
the  program  than  accelerating  untested,  unproven  assets.  Also,  though  the  Coast 
Guard has made progress in implementing a number of our prior recommendations 
regarding program management, GAO would feel more confident about any possible 
acceleration  if  our  recommendations  were  implemented  in  full.  We  plan  to  engage 
in  a  constructive  review  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  progress  in  fully  implementing  our 
recommendations in the upcoming year. 

If  the  Coast  Guard  does  consider  accelerating  its  acquisition  of  new  assets,  it 
could  perhaps  consider  a  less  risky  strategy  using  a  targeted  approach  that  con-
siders  both  the  condition  of  particular  assets  and  the  acquisition  schedule  for  their 
replacements  on  a  more  integrated  schedule.  For  example,  the  National  Security 
Cutter  (NSC)  could  be  a  target  of  opportunity  for  acceleration,  since  the  condition 
of  the  378-foot  high  endurance  cutter  (which  it  is  replacing)  has  been  particularly 
problematic.  Once  the  first  NSC  is  fully  tested,  accelerating  production  of  the  re-
maining NSCs would pose little risk. 

Question 5. In your opinion, does the Coast Guard have the performance measures 
necessary to prioritize legacy asset maintenance/repair needs and to weigh the costs 
and  benefits  of  performing  continued  maintenance  versus  the  acceleration  of  new 
asset production? 

Answer. We do not believe the Coast Guard currently has the performance meas-
ures  it  needs  to  effectively  weigh  the  costs  and  benefits  of  performing  continued 
maintenance  versus  the  acceleration  of  new  asset  production,  but  it  is  making 
progress  in  this  area.  Our  recent  review  of  Coast  Guard  Deepwater  legacy  assets 
found that the Coast Guard’s available measures are inadequate to capture the full 
extent of the decline in the condition of Deepwater assets with any degree of preci-
sion  and  are  insufficient  for  determining  the  impact  on  mission  capabilities.  More 
specifically,  the  Coast  Guard  measures  we  assessed  focus  on  events,  such  as  flight 
mishaps or equipment casualties, but do not measure the extent to which these and 
other  incidents  degrade  mission  capabilities.  On  the  basis  of  our  inquiries  and  dis-
cussions,  the  Coast  Guard  has  begun  developing  improved  measures  to  more  accu-
rately capture data on the extent to which its Deepwater legacy assets’ deteriorating 
condition  affects  mission  capabilities.  In  addition,  the  Coast  Guard  is  developing  a 
knowledge-based model to provide more objective data on where to best spend budg-
et dollars to achieve the greatest enhancements in mission capabilities. These Coast 
Guard efforts are described below. 

To improve the performance measures for its Deepwater legacy aircraft, the Coast 
Guard  is  working  to  improve  its  dispatch  reliability  index  measure,  which  provides 
causal  information  on  delayed,  aborted,  or  canceled  missions.  The  Coast  Guard  can 
use  the  dispatch  reliability  index—in  conjunction  with  data  captured  by  unit-level 
and depot-level maintenance staff—to determine which components and systems are 
failing  most  frequently,  and  thus,  causing  degradation  in  aircraft  availability  and 
mission  performance.  For  its  cutters,  Coast  Guard  naval  engineers  are  finalizing  a 
‘‘percent of time fully mission capable’’ measure. As part of this measure, the Coast 
Guard is developing mission criticality codes, which would rank the degree of impor-
tance of each piece of a cutter’s equipment to each mission that the cutter performs. 
These  codes  would  then  be  linked  to  electronic  casualty  reports  for  each  cutter  to 
provide the engineers and operators with information on the impact that the equip-
ment  casualties  would  have  on  each  type  of  mission.  This  casualty  report/mission 
criticality  linkage  will  then  be  factored  into  the  calculation  of  the  percent  of  time 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

fully  mission  capable  measure  for  each  cutter  class  and  mission  type.  Coast  Guard 
officials could then review this measure to determine, for example, the degree of ca-
pability  that  its  270-foot  medium  endurance  cutter  fleet  has  to  conduct  search  and 
rescue missions at any given time. Because these measures have not been finalized 
or  fully  implemented,  we  were  unable  to  assess  their  effectiveness.  However,  we 
view  these  tools  as  a  positive  step  toward  providing  Coast  Guard  decisionmakers 
with  more  detailed  information  on  the  primary  factors  leading  to  mission  degrada-
tion. 

In addition to improving its performance measures, the Coast Guard is also devel-
oping  a  knowledge-based  model  to  (1)  better  prioritize  the  projects  needed  to  up-
grade  legacy  assets  that  will  be  part  of  the  Deepwater  Program  and  (2)  obtain  the 
greatest overall mix of capabilities for its assets within its budget in order to maxi-
mize mission performance. The tool it is developing is called the Capital Asset Man-
agement  Strategy  (CAMS).  Once  fully  implemented,  CAMS  is  designed  to  provide 
analyses  on  the  capability  trade-offs  for  upgrades  and  maintenance  projects  across 
asset  classes,  thereby  allowing  the  Coast  Guard  to  determine  which  combination  of 
projects will provide the most capability for the dollars invested. For example, when 
Coast Guard officials are trying to decide among potential project upgrades such as 
a  HC–130  weather  radar  replacement,  an  HH–65  sliding  cabin  door  replacement, 
or a 110-foot patrol boat fin stabilizer replacement, CAMS, once fully implemented, 
could  provide  the  officials  with  a  recommended  mix  of  project  upgrades  that  would 
achieve the greatest capability enhancements based on the available budget. 

CAMS  analyses  are  to  be  based  on  legacy  asset  condition  and  readiness  data, 
asset  retirement  and  replacement  timelines,  asset  degradation  estimates,  project 
production  rates,  cost  data,  and  mission  utility  rankings.  Mission  utility  rankings 
will  grade  an  asset’s  importance  to  specific  missions,  such  as  search  and  rescue  or 
counterdrug  operations.  Rankings  may  also  be  assigned  to  an  asset’s  critical  sub-
systems  or  may  be  altered  based  on  an  asset’s  geographic  location.  Each  of  these 
elements  is  to  form  the  basis  for  recommendations  regarding  which  combination  of 
upgrade  and  maintenance  projects  will  provide  the  greatest  enhancements  to  fleet 
capabilities. 

According  to  Coast  Guard  staff,  CAMS  recommendations  are  not  a  replacement 
for  the  existing  budget  development  process,  but  rather  are  to  augment  and  make 
more  consistent  the  information  currently  provided  to  decisionmakers.  Because  the 
recommendations  are  to  be  based,  in  part,  on  user  assumptions,  CAMS  rec-
ommendations  are  to  be  reviewed  by  several  internal  Coast  Guard  officials  before 
any  final  funding  requests  are  made.  Further,  in  order  to  prevent  user  ‘‘gaming’’— 
making  assumptions  in  such  a  way  as  to  ensure  a  positive  recommendation  or  out-
come  for  a  particular  project—the  Coast  Guard  is  developing  a  series  of  job  aids, 
manuals, and training courses to ensure data integrity and consistency. 

Coast  Guard  officials  expect  to  have  the  CAMS  fully  implemented  by  September 
2005  and  intend  to  use  it  while  developing  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2008 
budget  submission.  Although  it  is  too  soon  to  assess  the  effectiveness  of  CAMS,  we 
view this approach as a good faith effort toward knowledge-based budgeting for leg-
acy asset sustainment. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON 

Question  1.  The  revised  Deepwater  plan  lists  a  number  of  enhanced  capabilities 
that will be provided to the Coast Guard. Understandably, most of these capabilities 
are aimed at the Cost Guard’s security mission. How will these new capabilities also 
help  the  Coast  Guard  to  fulfill  its  non-security  related  missions,  such  as  fisheries 
enforcement? 

Answer.  GAO  has  not  performed  the  audit  work  necessary  to  examine  the  poten-
tial impact of the new asset requirements and capabilities as outlined in the mission 
needs statement and revised implementation plan. On the face of it, it is clear that 
many  of  these  enhancements  are  designed  to  provide  the  Coast  Guard  with  in-
creased capabilities for its law enforcement and ports, waterways, and coastal secu-
rity  (PWCS)  missions.  However,  other  enhancements,  such  as  command,  control, 
communications,  computer,  intelligence,  surveillance,  reconnaissance  (C4ISR),  and 
supporting  logistics  equipment  would  appear  to  also  benefit  non-homeland  security 
missions.  Without  a  more  detailed  analysis,  it  would  be  impossible  for  us  to  draw 
firm conclusions as to how these new capabilities will differentially affect the Coast 
Guard’s various missions. 

Question  2.  I  am  a  bit  concerned  that  the  new  plan  reduces  the  total  number  of 
assets, especially given the need for physical presence in areas like the Western and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

Central  Pacific.  Being  able  to  see  and  it  identify  an  illegal  foreign  fishing  vessel 
with this cutting-edge technology is all well and good, but how will the Coast Guard 
catch them unless a cutter is out there too? 

Answer. As the Coast Guard has asserted, under the Deepwater plan, the system 
of  assets  will  have  greater  technological  and  surveillance  capabilities,  which  should 
result  in  greater  performance  of  the  system  as  a  whole.  On  the  other  hand,  your 
point  is  a  good  one—in  the  final  analysis,  getting  ‘‘steel  on  target’’  is  a  necessary 
component of the Coast Guard’s various enforcement missions. Ultimately, it will be 
difficult to tell what synergies will be realized by improved system capabilities with-
out seeing these new assets in operation. 

Question 3. Given all of the problems that the Coast Guard has experienced with 
its two major legacy programs thus far, the HH–65 helicopters and the 110-ft cutter 
conversions,  I  am  surprised  to  see  that  the  new  plan  would  upgrade  rather  than 
replace  22  of  your  C–130  aircraft,  and  all  of  your  HH–60  helicopters.  Why  did  the 
Coast  Guard  make  this  significant  change  in  the  plan?  Is  this  really  the  best  deci-
sion in your opinion, in terms of long-term performance? 

Answer. We have not examined the Coast Guard’s rationale for the changes it has 
made  to  the  program.  As  you  know,  as  part  of  the  review  we  will  conduct  at  the 
request of this Subcommittee, we will examine capability and capacity issues under 
the  revised  implementation  plan.  However,  even  after  conducting  such  an  analysis, 
the  performance-based  ‘‘system  of  systems’’  approach  used  in  implementing  the 
Deepwater  plan  make  it  very  difficult  to  draw  conclusions  regarding  whether  spe-
cific  assets  provide  the  best  value  to  the  government.  Since  Deepwater  is  not  in-
tended to be an asset-by-asset replacement, it is difficult if not impossible to address 
the advisability of the replacement of each asset type, since the performance of one 
would affect the performance of all. 

Question 4. How can we be sure that the HH–60 and C–130 aircraft will not have 
problems  in  the  long-run?  The  Air  Force  has  found  that  the  older  C–130J  aircraft 
have cracks in their wing-boxes. And in December 2004, during an attempted search 
and  rescue  of  the  fishing  vessel,  the  NORTHERN  EDGE,  3  out  of  4  of  the  Coast 
Guard’s  HH–60  helicopters  were  forced  to  return  to  Cape  Cod  Air  Station  due  to 
mechanical  problems.  Five  of  the  NORTHERN  EDGE  crew  members  died.  Did  the 
Coast  Guard  inspect  its  entire  C–130  fleet  prior  to  deciding  to  keep  them  in  use? 
Has the Coast Guard fully inspected all of its HH–60s recently? 

Answer.  It  would  be  impossible  to  know  with  complete  assurance  whether  these 
assets  will  encounter  problems  in  the  long  run,  although  the  Air  Force’s  findings 
are  indeed  troubling.  Neither  GAO  nor  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Of-
fice of Inspector General has reviewed the incident in question. 

We  defer  to  the  Coast  Guard  regarding  their  inspection  procedures  for  HC–130 

and HH–60 aircraft. 

Question 5. Does the fact that the Coast Guard submitted a $24 billion plan mean 
that  the  $19  billion  plan  will  not  in  fact  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  achieve  its  per-
formance goals for all of its many missions? 

Answer. While we have not assessed the Deepwater revised implementation plan, 
according  to  Coast  Guard  documents,  the  two  cost  estimates  reflect  potential  dif-
ferences  in  funding  streams,  time-lines  (20  to  25  years),  and  potentially  capacity. 
According to the Coast Guard, they are modeling the plans to determine their affect 
on  potential  performance.  They  intend  to  refine  their  models  and  update  perform-
ance  projections  based  on  the  lessons  learned  from  real  world  operations  as  Deep-
water assets and capabilities are introduced. 

The  Deepwater  revised  implementation  plan  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  re-
view that is to commence in August 2005. To that end, we are working on an audit 
plan  that  will  assess  the  revised  implementation  plan  and  will  report  the  results 
on a timely basis to this subcommittee and to the Coast Guard. 

Question 6. Why are both of the plans significantly more expensive than the origi-
nal  projection  of  $17  billion  for  completion  of  the  program?  Are  all  of  the  costs  at-
tributable to the new capabilities Coast Guard would acquire? 

Answer. We have not conducted the work needed to properly respond to this ques-
tion. That said, this will be a focus of our upcoming review of the revised implemen-
tation  plan  scheduled  to  commence  in  August  2005.  We  are  currently  working  on 
an  audit  plan  that  will  assess  the  revised  implementation  plan  and  will  report  the 
results on a timely basis to this subcommittee and to the Coast Guard. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON 

Question  1.  Will  the  new  mix  of  capability  and  capacity  of  assets  ensure  that  the 
Coast  Guard  will  be  able  to  meet  its  performance  goals  for  all  of  its  security  and 
non-security missions? 

Answer. We have not yet performed the audit work necessary to answer this ques-
tion. However, this question will be a focus of our follow-on review of the Deepwater 
revised  implementation  plan  that  is  to  commence  in  August  2005.  To  that  end,  we 
will  report  the  results  of  our  work  on  a  timely  basis  to  this  Subcommittee  and  to 
the Coast Guard. 

Question  2.  Which  level  of  funding—$19  billion  or  $24  billion—is  needed  for  the 
Coast  Guard  to  implement  all  of  its  missions?  Does  the  inclusion  of  a  $24  billion 
plan  mean  that  the  $19  billion  plan—$2  billion  higher  than  the  original  cost  esti-
mate for Deepwater—will somehow fall short? 

Answer. While we have not assessed the Deepwater revised implementation plan, 
according  to  Coast  Guard  documents,  the  two  cost  estimates  reflect  potential  dif-
ferences  in  funding  streams,  time-lines  (20  to  25  years),  and  potentially  capacity. 
According to the Coast Guard, they are modeling the plans to determine their affect 
on  potential  performance.  They  intend  to  refine  their  models  and  update  perform-
ance  projections  based  on  the  lessons  learned  from  real  world  operations  as  Deep-
water assets and capabilities are introduced. 

The  Deepwater  revised  implementation  plan  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  re-
view that is to commence in August 2005. To that end, we are working on an audit 
plan  that  will  assess  the  revised  implementation  plan  and  will  report  the  results 
on a timely basis to this subcommittee and to the Coast Guard. 

Question 3. What steps, if any, should the Coast Guard or ICGS take to examine 
other  assets  such  as  the  Littoral  Combat  Ship  that  Navy  is  acquiring,  as  an  alter-
native to the cutters in the Deepwater Program? 

Answer.  Certainly,  as  we  have  said  in  other  GAO  reports,  the  Coast  Guard  will 
need to exploit its partnerships with other Federal agencies in order to fulfill is mis-
sions  as  efficiently  and  economically  as  possible.  To  that  end,  according  to  Coast 
Guard documents, the Navy and the Coast Guard have formed a working group spe-
cifically designed to ensure close coordination and cooperation between the two pro-
grams. Specifically, the working group is intended to identify common technologies, 
systems,  and  processes  critical  to  both  the  Navy’s  Littoral  Combat  Ship  (LCS)  and 
the Deepwater Program’s National Security Cutter (NSC), medium endurance cutter 
(MEC), and patrol boat developments, and to recommend those areas that will ben-
efit  both  programs  through  a  cooperative  organization,  business,  and/or  technical 
approach to the program sponsors. 

While  we  have  not  examined  the  extent  of  the  coordination  or  cooperation  be-
tween the two programs, the Coast Guard will need to exploit its partnerships with 
other Federal agencies in order to fulfill its missions as efficiently and economically 
as  possible.  Certainly,  as  we  have  said  in  the  past,  it  makes  eminent  good  sense 
to engage in such efforts. 

Question 4. Is it possible, given the needs for shore-based facilities and personnel 
training,  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  implement  its  entire  Deepwater  plan  in  a  shorter 
time frame? 

Answer.  The  question  is  not  whether  it  is  possible,  but  how  well  an  acceleration 
of  the  program  could  be  executed.  Increasing  the  pace  of  the  acceleration  does  not 
increase  its  likelihood  of  success  and  can  inject  a  great  deal  of  additional  risk  into 
the program. As stated in testimony, although the Coast Guard is making progress 
on a number of our recommendations, some recommendations, will take time to re-
solve.  The  least  well-developed  aspect  of  the  Deepwater  Program  may  be  its  plan-
ning  for  the  transition  of  Coast  Guard  personnel  to  the  new  assets,  particularly  in 
terms  of  operations,  training,  and  logistics.  The  risk  of  a  measured,  targeted  accel-
eration  could  lessen  the  risk  were  the  Coast  Guard  to  demonstrate  full  and  appro-
priate  integration  between  this  aspect  of  the  Deepwater  Program  coupled  with  the 
stable acquisition of hard assets. 

Question 5. What new assets would be easiest to accelerate, and could be acceler-

ated with the least risks in terms of the GAO concerns? 

Answer.  If  the  Coast  Guard  does  consider  accelerating  its  acquisition  of  new  as-
sets,  it  could  perhaps  consider  a  less  risky  strategy  using  a  targeted  approach  that 
considers both the condition of particular legacy assets and the acquisition schedule 
for their replacements on a more integrated schedule. For example, the National Se-
curity Cutter (NSC) could be a target of opportunity for acceleration, since the con-
dition of the 378-foot high endurance cutter (which it is replacing) has been particu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

larly  problematic.  Once  the  first  NSC  has  been  delivered  and  is  fully  tested,  accel-
erating production of the remaining NSCs could pose little risk. That said, in order 
to avoid injecting additional risk into a targeted acceleration plan, the Coast Guard 
would  have  to  ensure  that  proper  planning  and  necessary  actions  for  transitioning 
personnel to the new assets on an accelerated scale are implemented. 

Question  6.  I’d  like  for  all  the  witnesses  to  elaborate  on  this  question  I  posed  to 
Admiral Collins during the hearing. The Army—the only other Armed Service to use 
the ‘‘Lead Systems Integrator’’ approach—recently backed away from that approach 
in their Future Combat Systems procurement due to concerns over lack of cost con-
trol. These are similar to the concerns that GAO raised on the Deepwater Program. 
Are  the  Army’s  new  arrangements  for  managing  this  contract  similar  to  those  that 
the Coast Guard has in place? Should the Coast Guard use this approach to ensure 
that the costs are kept down? 

Answer.  We  have  not  carried  out  the  analysis  on  the  developments  within  the 
Army’s  Future  Combat  Systems  program,  and  how  similar  actions  may  be  applied 
to the Coast Guard’s Deepwater Program, required to answer this question. 

We  are  continuing  to  monitor  and  assess  the  Coast  Guard’s  progress  on  imple-
menting our recommendations from our recent reports pertaining to Deepwater Pro-
gram  management  issues,  as  it  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  review  of  the  Deep-
water  revised  implementation  plan  that  is  to  commence  in  August  2005.1 To  that 
end,  we  are  working  on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast 
Guard has made and will report the results on a timely basis to this subcommittee 
and to the Coast Guard. 

Question 7. Should the Coast Guard conduct an analysis of alternatives to ensure 

the Deepwater Program is on the right track? 

Answer. The Department of Defense requires an analysis of alternatives at major 
milestone  decisions  for  all  major  defense  acquisition  programs.  Analyses  of  alter-
natives (AOA) are an important element of the defense acquisition process. An AOA 
is an analytical comparison of the operational effectiveness, suitability, and life-cycle 
cost  of  alternatives  that  satisfy  established  capability  needs.  While  an  AOA  is  usu-
ally required at Milestone B (which usually represents the first major funding com-
mitment  to  the  acquisition  program),  the  AOA  is  used  to  justify  the  rationale  for 
formal  initiation  of  the  acquisition  program.  An  AOA  normally  is  not  required  at 
Milestone  C  (prior  to  low-rate  initial  production)  unless  significant  changes  to 
threats, costs, or technology have occurred, or the analysis is otherwise deemed nec-
essary by the Milestone Decision Authority. 

We have not performed the audit work necessary to adequately answer this ques-
tion  as  it  pertains  specifically  to  the  Deepwater  Program.  That  said,  this  will  be  a 
focus of our follow-on review that is to commence in August 2005. 

Question 8. How many of the issues GAO raised has been successfully dealt with 
or  ‘‘Closed’’?  Why  is  it  taking  so  long  to  proceed  with  the  other  recommendations? 
Answer. In 2004, we reported that well into the contract’s second year, key compo-
nents  needed  to  manage  the  program  and  oversee  the  system  integrator’s  perform-
ance  had  not  been  effectively  implemented.2 We  also  reported  that  the  degree  to 
which  the  program  was  on  track  could  not  be  determined  because  the  Coast  Guard 
was  not  updating  its  schedule.3 We  made  a  series  of  recommendations  that  are  de-
picted in Table 5 of my prepared statement (pg. 32 of this hearing). 

As  of  July  2005,  we  have  seen  mixed  success  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  effort  to  im-
prove  management  of  the  program  and  contractor  oversight.  Three  of  the  rec-
ommendations—updating  the  Deepwater  Integrated  Master  Schedule,  developing 
measurable  award  fee  criteria  consistent  with  guidance  from  the  Office  of  Federal 
Procurement  Policy  and  subcontractor  notification  to  the  Coast  Guard  of  decisions 
over $5 million—have been fully addressed. The Coast Guard has made progress on 
implementing  most  of  the  remaining  recommendations,  though  we  continue  to  see 
evidence that more improvements are needed. 

Although the Coast Guard has been responsive to our concerns over the past year, 
three  issues  remain  highly  significant  and,  notwithstanding  the  progress  we  have 
seen  thus  far,  likely  will  take  some  time  to  resolve.  These  are:  (1)  the  effectiveness 
of  the  Coast  Guard’s  primary  tool  for  overseeing  the  system  integrator  (integrated 
product  teams);  (2)  the  attention  paid  to  the  affect  of  programmatic  decisions  on 

1 GAO,  Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program  Needs  Increased  Attention 
to Management and Contractor Oversight, GAO–04–380 (Washington, D.C., March 7, 2004) and 
GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Deepwater  Program  Acquisition  Schedule  Update  Needed,  GAO–04–695 
(Washington, D.C.: June 14, 2004). 

2 GAO–04–380. 
3 GAO–04–695. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

overall  costs  and  capabilities  (operational  effectiveness  and  total  ownership  cost); 
and  (3)  proper  planning  for  transitioning  Coast  Guard  personnel  to  the  new  assets 
in terms of operations, training, and logistics (human systems engineering). 

Assessing  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  in  implementing  the  remaining  rec-
ommendations  will  be  a  focus  of  our  follow-on  review  of  the  Deepwater  revised  im-
plementation plan that is to commence in August 2005. To that end, we are working 
on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has  made  and 
will  report  the  results  on  a  timely  basis  to  this  Subcommittee  and  to  the  Coast 
Guard. 

With  regard  to  your  question  as  to  why  it  is  taking  so  long  for  the  Coast  Guard 
to implement these recommendations, we would defer to the Coast Guard for a prop-
er response. 

Question  9.  Should  the  Coast  Guard  use  an  independent  entity  to  help  evaluate 
the  decisions  by  the  prime  contractor,  ICGS,  such  as  decisions  to  purchase  certain 
assets,  or  decisions  to  build  such  assets  in-house  rather  than  subcontract  them  to 
another company? 

Answer.  GAO’s  general  approach  to  assessing  acquisition  oversight  issues  is  to 
comment  on  the  adequacy  of  an  agency’s  processes,  procedures,  and  internal  con-
trols.  GAO  has  not  examined  whether  the  independent  entity  is  needed  to  help 
evaluate decisions or what standards or criteria would be applied. 

Question  10.  What  is  being  done  by  ICGS  and  the  Coast  Guard  to  improve  com-

petition for subcontracts? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  made  progress  in  implementing  our  recommenda-
tions  aimed  at  ensuring  adequate  competition  among  subcontractors.  To  that  end, 
the  Coast  Guard  reported  that  it  is  taking  steps  concerning  cost  control  through 
competition among second-tier suppliers and notification of ‘‘make’’ decisions.4 While 
we  have  not  assessed  the  effectiveness  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  actions  regarding  com-
petition among second-tier suppliers, we are satisfied with its efforts regarding noti-
fication  of  make  decisions.  It  should  be  noted,  though,  that  we  have  not  assessed 
the effectiveness of the following actions. 

Coast Guard officials told us that in making the decision about whether to award 
the  first  contract  option,  the  government  will  specifically  examine  the  system  inte-
grator’s  ability  to  control  costs  by  assessing  the  degree  to  which  competition  is  fos-
tered at the major subcontractor level. The evaluation will consider the subcontrac-
tors’  project  management  structure  and  processes  to  control  costs,  as  well  as  how 
market surveys of similar assets and major subsystems are implemented. The Coast 
Guard is focusing its attention on those areas that were priced after the initial com-
petition  for  the  Deepwater  contract  was  completed,  such  as  the  HH–65  re-engining 
and  the  C–130J  missionization.5 For  example,  a  new  process  implemented  for  the 
C–130  missionzation  was  a  requirement  for  competition  in  subcontracting  and  gov-
ernment  approval  of  all  subcontracts  exceeding  $2  million  in  order  for  the  Coast 
Guard to monitor the integrator’s competition efforts. 

According  to  the  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation,  the  prime  contractor  is  respon-
sible  for  managing  contract  performance,  including  planning,  placing,  and  admin-
istering  subcontracts  as  necessary  to  ensure  the  lowest  overall  cost  and  technical 
risk  to  the  government.  The  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation  further  provides  that 
when  ‘‘make-or-buy  programs’’  are  required,  the  government  may  reserve  the  right 
to review and agree on the contractor’s make-or-buy program when necessary to en-
sure  negotiation  or  reasonable  contract  prices,  among  other  things.  We  rec-
ommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  be  notified  of  make-or-buy  decisions  over  $5  mil-
lion  in  order  to  facilitate  controlling  costs  through  competition.  We  suggested  the 
$5 million threshold because Lockheed Martin, one of the major subcontractors, con-
siders  that  amount  to  be  the  threshold  for  considering  its  suppliers  major.  The 
Coast Guard has asked the system integrator, on a voluntary basis, to provide noti-
fication  1  week  in  advance  of  a  make  decision  of  $10  million  or  more  based  on  the 
criteria  in  the  make-or-buy  program  provisions  of  the  Federal  Acquisition  Regula-
tion. According to Coast Guard officials, to date, no make decision has exceeded $10 
million  since  the  request  was  made.  While  we  are  satisfied  with  the  Coast  Guard’s 
progress on this issue thus far, the details implementing this recommendation have 
not  yet  been  worked  out,  such  as  specifically  who  in  the  Coast  Guard  will  monitor 
the  subcontractors’  make  decisions  to  ensure  that  the  voluntary  agreement  is  com-
plied with. 

4 A ‘‘make item’’ means an item or work effort to be produced or performed by the prime con-

tractor or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or divisions. 

5 The  C–130J  missionization,  planned  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  six  C–130J  aircraft,  is  intended 
to modify and install mission-essential equipment to convert the aircraft into C–130J long-range 
surveillance maritime patrol aircraft. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

While  these  are  important  improvements  in  internal  controls,  it  is  too  soon  to 
know whether they have resulted in adequate competition or whether other actions 
may  be  needed.  We  will  continue  to  monitor  the  Coast  Guard’s  progress  in  imple-
menting  this  recommendation  during  our  pending  review  of  the  revised  Deepwater 
Implementation  Plan  that  is  to  commence  in  August  2005.  To  that  end,  we  are 
working  on  an  audit  plan  to  assess  the  additional  progress  the  Coast  Guard  has 
made and will report the results on a timely basis to this Subcommittee and to the 
Coast Guard. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

RONALD O’ROURKE 

Question 1. Is there replication within Deepwater and the LCS program that can 

be avoided in hopes of acquiring a cost savings to the Nation? 

Answer.  Although  the  Navy’s  Littoral  Combat  Ship  (LCS)  was  originally  justified 
primarily  in  connection  with  performing  certain  missions  in  enemy  littoral  (near- 
shore) waters overseas, some DOD and Navy officials in recent months have stated 
that  the  LCS  might  also  be  suitable  for  homeland  defense  operations.  The  Navy  in 
recent  months  has  also  increased  the  total  number  of  LCSs  that  it  wants  to  build, 
from  an  earlier  potential  range  of  30  to  60  to  a  new  potential  range  of  63  to  82. 
The  Chief  of  Naval  Operations  has  spoken  of  the  possibility  of  building  75  to  100. 
The  Navy  has  not  explained  in  detail  why  its  desired  number  of  LCSs  has  in-
creased  in  recent  months.  The  absence  of  such  a  detailed  explanation,  combined 
with  statements  concerning  the  potential  suitability  of  the  LCS  for  homeland  de-
fense  operations,  raise  the  possibility  that  homeland  defense  operations  form  part 
of the Navy’s basis for increasing its desired number of LCSs. 

Since  the  homeland  defense  operations  that  the  Navy  has  in  mind  for  the  LCS 
might  also  be  performed  by  Deepwater  assets  such  as  National  Security  Cutters 
(NSCs)  and  Offshore  Patrol  Cutters  (OPCs),  these  recent  developments  concerning 
the  LCS  program  raise  the  question  of  whether  the  Navy  and  Coast  Guard  have 
adequately coordinated their force structure (i.e., numerical) requirements for LCSs 
and Deepwater assets such as NSCs and OPCs. 

When asked about coordination between the LCS and Deepwater Programs, Navy 
and  Coast  Guard  officials  have  generally  responded  by  noting  how  the  two  services 
have worked to ensure that LCSs and Deepwater cutters will take maximum advan-
tage of opportunities for using common technologies and components. This is not the 
same,  however,  as  coordinating  the  force  structure  requirements  for  the  two  pro-
grams. It also does not address the question of whether the homeland defense oper-
ations  the  Navy  has  in  mind  for  the  LCS  could  be  performed  more  cost  effectively 
by LCSs or by Deepwater assets such as NSCs and OPCs. 

Potential questions that arise out of this situation, particularly for those who fol-

low the Coast Guard and the Deepwater Program, include the following: 

• Is  the  Navy,  as  part  of  an  effort  to  justify  an  increase  in  its  desired  number 
of  LCSs,  seeking  to  appropriate  some  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  homeland  defense 
or homeland security responsibilities? 
• Would the homeland defense operations that the Navy has in mind for the LCS 
be  performed  more  cost  effectively  by  LCSs,  or  by  Deepwater  assets  such  as 
NSCs and OPCs? 

If  the  answer  to  the  first  question  is  yes,  then  there  may  be  some  duplication  in 

mission justification between the LCS program and the Deepwater Program. 

If  the  answer  to  the  second  question  is  that  the  homeland  defense  operations  in 
question  would  be  more  cost  effectively  performed  by  Deepwater  assets  such  as 
NSCs  and  OPCs,  then  the  total  cost  to  the  Nation  for  performing  maritime  home-
land  defense  operations  might  be  reduced  by  decreasing  the  Navy’s  recently  an-
nounced planned number of LCSs and possibly increasing total planned numbers of 
Deepwater assets such as NSCs and OPCs. 

Question 2. How much confidence do you put in the accuracy of the revised imple-

mentation plan? The RAND study? 

Answer.  Revised  Implementation  Plan.  The  accuracy  of  the  revised  implementa-
tion  plan  depends  to  a  large  degree  on  the  accuracy  of  the  analytical  models  that 
were  used  to  generate  the  plan.  The  briefing  I  received  from  the  Coast  Guard  on 
these models gave me no immediate reason to believe that they were fundamentally 
flawed.  Such  flaws,  however,  are  sometimes  observable  only  through  a  detailed  in-
spection  of  a  model’s  underlying  features.  In  addition,  even  if  a  model  contains  no 
such  flaws,  the  many  assumptions  that  are  sometimes  necessarily  built  into  such 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

a  model  can  provide  the  user  an  opportunity  to  vary  assumptions  so  as  to  achieve 
a preferred result. 

The  Coast  Guard  contracted  with  the  MITRE  Corporation  to  conduct  an  inde-
pendent assessment of the process that the Coast Guard used for its Deepwater per-
formance  gap  analysis  (PGA).  MITRE  performed  the  assessment  between  January 
15  and  March  1,  2004,  and  issued  a  report  on  its  assessment  on  March  30,  2004. 
The Coast Guard provided CRS with a copy of the report. The report stated: 

As part of the Deepwater PGA process, MITRE noted a number of strengths in 
the Deepwater PGA effort. These strengths underscore the credibility of the re-
sults produced. In general, MITRE found that the Deepwater PGA process, and 
the  resulting  analytic  results,  was  likely  the  most  complete  and  comprehensive 
campaign-level study conducted by any uniformed service in recent times. 
The  principal  strengths  of  the  Deepwater  PGA  process  involve  the  composition 
of  the  Deepwater  PGA  Teams,  the  foundation  for  the  Deepwater  PGA,  the  in-
volvement  of  senior  Coast  Guard  leadership,  the  models  and  processed  used  in 
the  analysis,  and  the  consistency  of  the  results,  which  tends  to  verify  the  rea-
sonableness and accuracy of the analysis performed. The work performed by the 
Deepwater PGA Teams successfully met the requirements contained in the Ex-
ecutive Steering Committee charter that guided the work. 
MITRE  developed  a  number  of  recommendations  based  upon  the  findings  and 
independent assessment of the Deepwater PGA process, the documentation pro-
vided  and  reviewed,  and  the  personnel  interviews  conducted.  The  primary  rec-
ommendation  is  to  continue  the  process  initiated  in  the  Deepwater  PGA  as  a 
point  of  departure  for  revising  the  proposal  of  the  prime  contractor,  Integrated 
Coast Guard System, for the Integrated Deepwater System. The remaining rec-
ommendations focus on areas of improvement for subsequent analyses.1 

Potential oversight questions include the following: 
• Is the MITRE assessment the only independent assessment that was performed 
of the process that the Coast Guard used to arrive at its revised implementation 
plan?  If  not,  what  were  the  other  assessments,  and  what  were  their  findings, 
conclusions,  and  recommendations?  If  the  MITRE  assessment  was  the  only 
independent  assessment,  has  the  Coast  Guard  contracted  for  an  independent 
assessment  of  the  post-March  2004  portion  of  its  work  to  develop  the  revised 
implementation plan? If the Coast Guard has not contracted for such an assess-
ment, should Congress require one? 
• Did  the  Coast  Guard  implement  all  of  MITRE’s  ‘‘remaining  recommendations 
[that]  focus  on  areas  of  improvement  for  subsequent  [i.e.,  post-March  2004] 
analyses?  If  not,  which  of  MITRE’s  recommendations  were  not  implemented, 
and why? 
• As  an  entity  with  a  possible  interest  in  securing  future  Coast  Guard  contracts, 
did MITRE have an incentive to avoid significantly criticizing the Coast Guard’s 
PGA  process  or  to  avoid  recommending  changes  that  might  have  significantly 
delayed  the  Coast  Guard’s  schedule  for  completing  the  revised  plan?  Was 
MITRE,  in  other  words,  a  truly  independent  assessor  in  this  instance?  Should 
the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  be  asked  to  perform  an  inde-
pendent  assessment  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  process  for  developing  the  revised 
plan? 
• To what degree can the results of the Coast Guard’s analytical models be varied 
by  varying  the  models’  assumptions?  What  assumptions  did  the  Coast  Guard 
plug into the models, and did these assumptions tend to increase or reduce the 
size of the Deepwater force required to perform various missions? 

In  addition  to  the  above  issues,  there  is  a  more  general  question  concerning  the 
policy  question  that  the  models  were  used  to  answer.  The  models  might  provide  a 
reasonably  accurate  answer  to  the  question:  ‘‘What  is  the  highest-performing  force 
that  can  be  acquired  for  a  total  of  $19  billion  to  $24  billion?’’  If  so,  however,  that 
answer might not be the same as an accurate answer to the question: ‘‘What is the 
lowest-cost  force  that  can  perform  all  the  missions  we  want  the  Deepwater  force  to 
be able to perform?’’ 

Regarding  the  potential  difference  between  these  two  questions,  the  Coast  Guard 
states that while the revised Deepwater force is, in its view, the highest-performing 

1 Independent  Assessment  of  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Deepwater  Performance  Gap  Analysis  Process. 
McLean, VA, MITRE, 2004. (Version 1.0, March 30, 2004, Center for Enterprise Modernization) 
p. i. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

force  that  can  be  acquired  for  a  total  of  $19  billion  to  $24  billion,  this  force  would 
not have enough capacity to perform certain missions of potential interest to policy-
makers. In particular, the Coast Guard states, the revised force: 

• might  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level–2  operations, 

which include: 
—achieving an increased degree of maritime domain awareness (MDA), 
—maintaining continuous presence of two cutters (i.e., 2.0 presence) in the Ber-

ing Sea; and 

—performing additional air interdiction operations; 

• almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level– 
3  operations,  which  include  operations  for  fully  achieving  long-term  (FY  2005– 
FY 2009) Government Performance and Results Act (GPRA) goals; and 
• would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level–4  operations, 

which include: 
—conducting fisheries enforcement in certain areas where fisheries enforcement 

is not currently performed; and 

—performing additional counter-drug operations, should the Department of De-
fense (DOD) reduce its efforts in this area so as to make DOD resources avail-
able for other DOD missions. 

If policymakers determine that the revised force should perform some or all of the 
above operations, then the revised implementation plan, though perhaps accurately 
calculated  for  achieving  the  highest  performance  for  a  total  acquisition  cost  of  $19 
billion to $24 billion, would not be accurately calculated for performing all missions 
of interest to policymakers. 

RAND  Study.  I  have  no  reason  to  doubt  that  the  RAND  study  accurately  cal-
culated  the  number  of  platforms  with  Baseline-level  (i.e.,  Increment  0)  capability 
that  would  be  needed  to  perform  all  Level–4  operations.  One  option  for  Congress 
would  be  to  direct  the  Coast  Guard  to  contract  with  RAND  for  a  follow-on  study 
that would calculate: 

• required numbers of platforms, assuming the same combination of platform ca-
pability  (i.e.,  between  Increment  II  and  Increment  III)  and  force  capacity  (i.e., 
between  Level  1  and  Level  2)  as  reflected  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  revised  plan; 
and 
• required  numbers  of  platforms,  and  resulting  acquisition  costs,  to  perform  all 
Level  2  (or  all  Level  3,  or  all  Level  4)  operations,  assuming  different  platform 
capability levels. 

Question  3.  Do  you  believe  that  the  proposed  increased  capabilities  outweigh  the 

urgent need for a significant increase in capacity of cutters and planes? 

Answer. Achieving a proper balance between the capability of individual platforms 
(i.e.,  ships  or  aircraft)  and  numbers  of  platforms  (i.e.,  capacity)  is  a  longstanding 
problem in maritime force planning. Increasing platform capability can often reduce 
the  number  of  platforms  required  to  perform  a  given  set  of  missions.  The  potential 
for  increased  platform  capability  to  translate  into  reduced  platform  numbers,  how-
ever,  can  be  limited  by  a  requirement  in  the  set  of  missions  to  be  performed  to 
maintain a platform presence in a minimum number of separate operating areas at 
the same time. 

Whether  the  Coast  Guard  has  accurately  calculated  the  reduction  in  required 
platform numbers that results from the revised plan’s proposed increase in platform 
capability depends to a large degree on the accuracy of the Coast Guard’s analytical 
models. As discussed above, one potential option for Congress would be to have GAO 
conduct  an  independent  assessment  of  these  models.  Such  an  assessment  could  in-
clude, among other things, an examination of whether the models accurately trans-
late  increased  platform  capability  into  reduced  platform  numbers  after  taking  into 
account  requirements  for  maintaining  platform  presence  in  separate  areas  at  the 
same time. 

Question 4. Were you surprised at the recommendations of the revised implemen-

tation report? What aspect of the report concerns you the most? 

Answer.  In  light  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  expanded  post-9/11  mission  demands  and 
the  significantly  higher  platform  numbers  recommended  in  the  2004  RAND  report 
for  meeting  those  demands,  I  was  surprised  that  the  revised  implementation  plan 
did  not  recommend  platform  numbers  that  were  generally  higher  than  those  in  the 
original (1998) Deepwater plan. I was not surprised that the numbers in the revised 
plan  were  below  those  in  the  RAND  report  because  articles  in  the  trade  press  sug-
gested  that  this  would  be  the  case.  But  I  did  not  anticipate  that  the  Coast  Guard 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

would calculate that increased unit capability would be sufficient to avoid a general 
increase in platform numbers above those in the original Deepwater plan. 

The  revised  force  appears  to  have  been  optimized  for  an  acquisition  cost  of  $19 
billion  to  $24  billion.  I  do  not  understand  why  a  range  of  $19  billion  to  $24  billion, 
rather  than  some  lower  or  higher  figure,  was  used  as  the  acquisition  cost  range 
within  which  to  optimize  the  revised  force,  or  why  the  Coast  Guard  didn’t  instead 
optimize  the  force  to  fully  achieve  long-term  (FY  2005–FY  2009)  Government  Per-
formance and Results Act (GPRA) goals (i.e., perform all Level 3 operations) at low-
est cost. Federal programs must take limits on available resources into account, but 
as a result of being optimized within an acquisition cost of $19 billion to $24 billion, 
the  revised  force  almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  to  fully  achieve 
the GPRA goals, which presumably are of some importance to the policymakers who 
established them. The Coast Guard did not (and was not required to) include in the 
revised  plan  information  on  the  composition  and  cost  of  alternative  Deepwater 
forces  that  could  perform  all  Level  2  operations  (or  all  Level  3  operations,  or  all 
Level  4  operations)  at  lowest  cost.  Congress  consequently  does  not  have  this  infor-
mation, which would assist Congress, as a policymaking body, in considering poten-
tially  important  tradeoffs  between  achieving  certain  levels  of  Deepwater  perform-
ance and meeting goals for other Federal programs. 

Question  5.  Can  the  United  States  shipbuilding  industry  handle  an  acceleration 

of this project to 10 or 15 years? 

Answer. I believe the U.S. shipbuilding industrial base could accommodate an ac-
celeration  of  the  Deepwater  Program  under  which  the  NSCs  and  OPCs  included  in 
the  revised  plan  are  procured  in  a  period  of  10  to  15  years,  provided  that  design 
work  on  each  class  of  cutter  was  completed  before  procurement  of  that  class  was 
accelerated. The yards that could build these cutters have more than enough unused 
production  capacity  to  accommodate  such  an  increase,  and  these  cutters  are  rel-
atively  low-risk  designs  that  are  to  incorporate  proven  rather  than  developmental 
systems.  The  2004  RAND  report  similarly  concluded  that  the  U.S.  shipbuilding  in-
dustrial  base  could  accommodate  a  compression  of  the  NSC  and  OPC  procurement 
period to 10 or 15 years.2 

Question 6. What shipyards can accommodate the new contracts that would be as-

sociated with building Deepwater cutters? 

Answer.  U.S.  shipyards  that  could  accommodate  new  contracts  associated  with 
building  Deepwater  cutters  include  the  two  yards  currently  involved  in  building 
larger  Navy  surface  combatants—the  Ingalls  shipyard  that  forms  part  of  Northrop 
Grumman  Ship  Systems  (NGSS),  and  General  Dynamics’  Bath  Iron  Works  (GD/ 
BIW). Both of these yards currently have considerable unused capacity. Other ship-
yards that could accommodate the new contracts include yards that currently build 
larger  ships  of  other  types,  but  have  past  experience  in  building  cutters  or  larger 
Navy surface combatants, such as the Avondale shipyard that forms part of NGSS, 
or Northrop Grumman Newport News (NGNN). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

RONALD O’ROURKE 

Question  1.  The  revised  Deepwater  plan  lists  a  number  of  enhanced  capabilities 
that will be provided to the Coast Guard. Understandably, most of these capabilities 
are  aimed  at  the  Coast  Guard’s  security  mission.  How  will  these  new  capabilities 
also  help  the  Coast  Guard  to  fulfill  its  non-security  related  missions,  such  as  fish-
eries enforcement? 

Answer.  Ship  and  aircraft  capabilities  useful  for  performing  homeland  security 
missions in some cases can also be useful for performing non-homeland security mis-
sions  such  as  fisheries  enforcement.  Consequently,  increasing  planned  Deepwater 
ship  and  aircraft  capabilities  so  as  to  enhance  the  Deepwater  force’s  ability  to  per-
form homeland security missions might in some cases also improve its ability to per-
form  non-homeland  security  missions  such  as  fisheries  enforcement.  For  example, 
the  higher  maximum  speeds  now  planned  for  the  Offshore  Patrol  Cutters  (OPCs) 
and  Fast  Response  Cutters  (FRCs)  and  the  improved  sensors  now  planned  for  the 
HC–130  Long  Range  Search  (LRS)  aircraft  and  the  H–65C  Multi-Mission  Cutter 
Helicopter  (MCH)  might  improve  the  Deepwater  force’s  ability  to  detect,  track,  and 
intercept ships or boats engaged in illegal fishing operations. 

2 John Birkler et al., The U.S. Coast Guard’s Deepwater Force Modernization Plan, Can It Be 
Accelerated?  Will  It  Meet  Changing  Security  Needs?  RAND  Corporation,  Santa  Monica  (CA), 
2004. pp. xxv–xxvi, 32–41, 53–61. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

Question  2.  I  am  a  bit  concerned  that  the  new  plan  reduces  the  total  number  of 
assets, especially given the need for physical presence in areas like the Western and 
Central  Pacific.  Being  able  to  see  and  to  identify  an  illegal  foreign  fishing  vessel 
with this cutting-edge technology is all well and good, but how will the Coast Guard 
catch them unless a cutter is out there too? 

Answer. Cutters and their embarked helicopters and interceptor boats are central 
to the Coast Guard’s ability to halt and board fishing vessels that are operating be-
yond  the  range  of  shore-based  helicopters  and  interceptor  boats.  The  Coast  Guard 
states that the revised Deepwater force: 

2 operations; 

• might  not  have  enough  capacity  (i.e.,  platforms)  for  performing  certain  Level– 
• almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level– 
• would not have enough capacity for performing certain Level–4 operations. 
Level–2 operations include, among other things, maintaining continuous presence 

3 operations; and 

of two cutters in the Bering Sea. 

Level–3 operations include additional forces for achieving long-term (FY 2005–FY 
2009)  Government  Performance  and  Results  Act  (GPRA)  goals.  The  GPRA  goal  for 
living  marine  resources  is  to  maintain  a  97  percent  observed  domestic  compliance 
rate by commercial fishers. 

Level–4 operations include, among other things, conducting fisheries enforcement 
in  certain  areas  where  fisheries  enforcement  is  not  currently  performed.  The  Coast 
Guard  states  that  in  the  Pacific,  these  areas  include  waters  between  Hawaii  and 
Australia  covered  by  the  Western  and  Central  Pacific  Tuna  agreement  and  waters 
extending  from  Baja,  Mexico,  down  past  the  Galapagos  islands,  and  west  about 
three-quarters of the way to Hawaii that are covered by the Inter-American Tropical 
Tuna Commission. 
Question 3. Given all of the problems that the Coast Guard has experienced with 
its  two  major  legacy  programs  thus  far,  the  HH–65  helicopters  and  the  110′  cutter 
conversions,  I  am  surprised  to  see  that  the  new  plan  would  upgrade  rather  than 
replace  22  of  your  C–130  aircraft,  and  all  of  your  HH–60  helicopters.  Is  this  really 
the best decision in your opinion, in terms of long-term performance? 

Answer. A decision on whether to upgrade rather than replace a group of aircraft 
can  depend  on  several  things,  including  the  industrial-base  implications  of  upgrad-
ing  vs.  building  new  aircraft,  the  potential  impact  of  an  upgrade  program  on  near- 
term aircraft availability (particularly for numerically small aircraft fleets with high 
operational  tempos),  the  time  horizon  for  calculating  cost  effectiveness  (i.e.,  how 
many  future  years  ‘‘long  term’’  is  defined  to  include),  the  accuracy  of  performance 
estimates for upgraded and replacement aircraft, and the accuracy of cost estimates 
for  upgrading  existing  aircraft,  procuring  replacement  aircraft,  and  operating  and 
supporting  the  upgraded  or  replacement  aircraft.  Some  observers  believe  that  cost 
and schedule estimates for upgrading existing aircraft carry more risk of being inac-
curate  because  of  the  difficulty  of  predicting  certain  problems  associated  with  air-
craft  aging.  Confidence  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  decisions  regarding  its  C–130  aircraft 
and HH–60 helicopters could depend in part on how well the Coast Guard is judged 
to have incorporated lessons learned from past Coast Guard and DOD upgrade pro-
grams. 

Question 4. How can we be sure that the HH–60 and C–130 aircraft will not have 
problems  in  the  long-run?  The  Air  Force  has  found  that  the  older  C–130J  aircraft 
have cracks in their wing-boxes. And in December 2004, during an attempted search 
and  rescue  of  the  fishing  vessel,  the  NORTHERN  EDGE,  3  out  of  4  of  the  Coast 
Guard’s  HH–60  helicopters  were  forced  to  return  to  Cape  Cod  Air  Station  due  to 
mechanical problems. Five of the NORTHERN EDGE crew members died. 

Answer. Careful inspection and maintenance of older aircraft can reduce the prob-
ability  that  they  will  experience  problems  in  operation,  but  some  probability  would 
remain.  Although  the  military  services  have  growing  experience  in  operating  air-
craft  to  advanced  ages,  some  observers  are  concerned  that  the  aging  mechanisms 
for certain aircraft components, and thus the risks of operating aircraft to advanced 
ages,  are  not  yet  fully  understood.  Technical  issues  involved  include  items  such  as 
corrosion,  metal  fatigue  (particularly  on  components  that  undergo  aerodynamic 
stress), and wire embrittlement. 

Question 5. Does the fact that the Coast Guard submitted a $24 billion plan mean 
that  the  $19  billion  plan  will  not  in  fact  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  achieve  its  per-
formance goals for all of its many missions? 

Answer. The Coast Guard states that, until Deepwater assets are actually fielded, 
the exact amount of mission performance they will generate is uncertain. The Coast 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

Guard  wants  the  Deepwater  force  to  achieve  a  certain  level  of  overall  mission  per-
formance.  The  Coast  Guard  appears  confident  that  the  larger  $24  million  force 
would achieve that level of overall mission performance, but believes that the small-
er  $19  billion  force  might  be  able  to  do  so,  depending  on  the  actual  amount  of  mis-
sion  performance  generated  by  the  new  Deepwater  assets.  The  ultimate  force  pro-
cured to achieve the intended level of overall mission performance, the Coast Guard 
states,  could  be  the  $19  billion  force,  the  $24  billion  force,  or  perhaps  something  in 
between. 

Although  the  force  that  is  ultimately  procured  would  be  capable  of  achieving  a 
certain level of overall mission performance desired by the Coast Guard and the De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  this  force  would  not  have  enough  capacity 
to  perform  certain  missions  of  potential  interest  to  policymakers.  In  particular,  the 
Coast Guard states, the revised force: 

• might  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level–2  operations, 

which include: 
—achieving an increased degree of maritime domain awareness (MDA), 
—maintaining continuous presence of two cutters (i.e., 2.0 presence) in the Ber-

ing Sea, and 

—performing additional air interdiction operations; 

• almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level 
3  operations,  which  include  operations  for  fully  achieving  long-term  (FY  2005– 
FY 2009) Government Performance and Results Act (GPRA) goals; and 

• would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level  4  operations, 

which include: 
—conducting fisheries enforcement in certain areas where fisheries enforcement 

is not currently performed, and 

—performing additional counter-drug operations, should the Department of De-
fense (DOD) reduce its efforts in this area so as to make DOD resources avail-
able for other DOD missions. 

Question 6. Why are both of the plans significantly more expensive than the origi-
nal  projection  of  $17  billion  for  completion  of  the  program?  Are  all  of  the  costs  at-
tributable to the new capabilities Coast Guard would acquire? 

Answer. Potential sources of acquisition cost growth from the earlier figure of $17 

billion to the new estimated cost of $19 billion to $24 billion include: 

• additional equipment to be installed on previously planned platforms; 
• additional platforms to be acquired; and 
• repricing  of  previously  planned  items  due  to  revised  inflation  indices  or  a  re-

vised understanding of the intrinsic cost of those items. 

This first item clearly accounts for some portion of the increase above the $17 mil-
lion  figure.  The  second  item  may  account  for  an  additional  portion,  particularly  in 
the case of the $24 billion plan. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

RONALD O’ROURKE 

Question  1.  Will  the  new  mix  of  capability  and  capacity  of  assets  ensure  that  the 
Coast  Guard  will  be  able  to  meet  its  performance  goals  for  all  of  its  security  and 
non-security missions? 

Answer. Although the Coast Guard states that the Deepwater force recommended 
under  the  revised  implementation  plan  would  generate  much  more  overall  mission 
performance  than  the  originally  planned  force,  and  would  be  able  to  meet  certain 
DHS  and  Coast  Guard  long-range  performance  goals,  the  revised  Deepwater  force 
would not have enough capacity to perform certain missions of potential interest to 
policymakers. In particular, the Coast Guard states, the revised force: 

• might  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level–2  operations, 

which include: 
—achieving an increased degree of maritime domain awareness (MDA), 
—maintaining continuous presence of two cutters (i.e., 2.0 presence) in the Ber-

ing Sea, and 

—performing additional air interdiction operations; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

• almost  certainly  would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level 
3  operations,  which  include  operations  for  fully  achieving  long-term  (FY  2005– 
FY 2009) Government Performance and Results Act (GPRA) goals; and 
• would  not  have  enough  capacity  for  performing  certain  Level  4  operations, 

which include: 
—conducting fisheries enforcement in certain areas where fisheries enforcement 

is not currently performed, and 

—performing additional counter-drug operations, should the Department of De-
fense (DOD) reduce its efforts in this area so as to make DOD resources avail-
able for other DOD missions. 

Question  2.  Which  level  of  funding—$19  billion  or  $24  billion—is  needed  for  the 
Coast  Guard  to  implement  all  of  its  missions?  Does  the  inclusion  of  a  $24  billion 
plan  mean  that  the  $19  billion  plan—$2  billion  higher  than  the  original  cost  esti-
mate for Deepwater—will somehow fall short? 

Answer. The Coast Guard states that, until Deepwater assets are actually fielded, 
the exact amount of mission performance they will generate is uncertain. The Coast 
Guard  wants  the  Deepwater  force  to  achieve  a  certain  level  of  overall  mission  per-
formance. The Coast Guard appears confident that the larger $24 billion force would 
achieve that level of overall mission performance, but believes that the smaller $19 
billion force might be able to do so, depending on the actual amount of mission per-
formance  generated  by  the  new  Deepwater  assets.  The  ultimate  force  procured  to 
achieve  the  intended  level  of  overall  mission  performance,  the  Coast  Guard  states, 
could  be  the  $19  billion  force,  the  $24  billion  force,  or  perhaps  something  in  be-
tween. 

Although  the  force  that  is  ultimately  procured  would  be  capable  of  achieving  a 
certain level of overall mission performance desired by the Coast Guard and the De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS),  as  discussed  in  the  answer  to  the  previous 
question,  this  force  would  not  have  enough  capacity  to  perform  certain  missions  of 
potential  interest  to  policymakers  relating  to  Level  4,  Level  3,  and  possibly  Level 
2 operations. 

Question  3.  What  steps  if  any  should  the  Coast  Guard  or  ICGS  take  to  examine 
other  assets  such  as  the  Littoral  Combat  Ship  that  Navy  is  acquiring,  as  an  alter-
native to the cutters in the Deepwater Program? 

Answer.  The  2004  RAND  report  on  the  Deepwater  Program  recommended  that 
the  Coast  Guard  explore  alternative  platforms  and  technologies  for  meeting  the 
service’s  expanded  post-9/11  mission  demands.  The  report  states  that  the  Coast 
Guard can meet its expanded post-9/11 responsibilities: 

only by acquiring significantly more cutters, unmanned air vehicles (UAVs), and 
helicopters than are in the current [1998 Deepwater] acquisition program, or by 
mixing into the program other platforms and technologies that provide the same 
or additional capabilities . . . . 
We  recommend  that  the  USCG  pursue  a  two-pronged  strategy.  The  USCG 
should meet its mission demands and start replacing its aging assets by (1) ac-
celerating  and  expanding  the  asset  acquisitions  in  the  current  Deepwater  Pro-
gram and, at the same time, (2) identifying and exploring new platform options, 
emerging technologies, and operational concepts that could leverage those assets. 
Such a two-pronged strategy may satisfy demand more quickly and at less cost 
than expanding the original Deepwater plan. 
While we recommend that the USCG accelerate Deepwater and buy more assets 
than  in  the  current  plan,  we  also  recommend  that  USCG  leaders  bear  in  mind 
that buying more of today’s assets may not provide an optimal solution over the 
long-term.  To  handle  some  of  the  responsibilities  currently  handled  by  tradi-
tional  assets,  the  USCG  could,  for  example,  employ  offshore  rigs  and  airships, 
or  realize  emerging  UAV  concepts.  Placing  rigs  near  sea-lanes  may  enable  the 
USCG  to  base  and  sustain  surface  and  air  assets  in  Deepwater  environments, 
while lessening its traditional reliance on cutters. Employing airships or relying 
more heavily on UAVs, particularly those able to stay aloft for long periods and 
to  cover  significant  territory,  may  allow  the  USCG  to  enhance  its  surveillance, 
reconnaissance,  and  search  and  rescue  capabilities.  Such  alternatives  may  in-
volve less-costly assets than platforms the USCG currently uses to handle its re-
sponsibilities. 
We  provide  a  preliminary  analysis  of  cost  and  performance  for  a  100-percent 
force  structure.  Our  analysis  is  sufficient  for  order-of-magnitude  comparisons; 
however,  more  work  would  be  required  to  produce  budget-level  cost  estimates 
and  analysis  of  operational  effectiveness.  Policymakers  should  use  the  order-of- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

magnitude  estimates  of  the  100-percent  force  structure  as  an  upper  bound 
against which they can explore and evaluate alternative concepts and assets that 
provide the same or improved capabilities at less cost, rather than as a road map 
to pinpoint specific acquisition decisions.1 

In addition to the systems mentioned above (offshore rigs, airships, and emerging 
UAV  concepts),  potential  alternative  ship  platforms  for  meeting  the  Coast  Guard’s 
post-9/11 mission demands include, but are not limited to, the following: 

• the Littoral Combat Ship (LCS), which currently exists in two designs—a high- 

speed monohull and a high-speed trimaran; 

• a  ship  like  the  Navy’s  recently  built  high-speed  catamaran  X–Craft  (previously 

known as the Littoral Support Craft-Experimental, or LSC–X); or 

• ships  like  the  high-speed  catamaran  ferries  that  the  Defense  Department  has 

leased in recent years for experiments and operational evaluations. 

Question 4. Is it possible, given the needs for shore-based facilities and personnel 
training,  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  implement  its  entire  Deepwater  plan  in  a  shorter 
timeframe? 

Answer.  If  annual  funding  were  sufficiently  high,  the  systems  envisioned  in  the 
revised  implementation  plan  could  be  acquired  in  something  less  than  the  20  to  25 
years  contemplated  in  the  revised  plan.  In  general,  the  more  the  acquisition  period 
for  the  entire  plan  is  compressed,  the  greater  the  burden  of  managing  the  program 
would  be,  and  the  higher  the  risk  of  a  problem  occurring  in  program  execution. 
Again  assuming  sufficient  annual  funding,  the  Coast  Guard  could  accelerate  its 
plans  for  shore-based  facilities  and  personnel  training  to  meet  a  compressed  plat-
form-acquisition  schedule,  but  the  more  the  acquisition  period  is  compressed,  the 
greater  the  management  burden  associated  with  preparing  shore-based  facilities 
and training personnel would become. The 2004 RAND report stated: 

With  respect  to  accelerating  Deepwater  acquisitions,  it  should  be  noted  that 
both of the acceleration schedules we examined—the 10-year and the 15-year— 
are  feasible.  However,  to  assess  the  ability  of  the  USCG  to  integrate  assets  it 
would  acquire  using  either  of  those  schedules  was  beyond  the  scope  of  this 
study.2 Without  that  assessment,  we  are  reluctant  to  make  a  recommendation 
on whether to go with a 15-year or a 10-year acquisition schedule.3 

Question 5. What new assets would be easiest to accelerate, and could be acceler-

ated with the least risks in terms of the GAO concerns? 

Answer. Assuming sufficient annual funding, assets whose procurement would be 
the  easiest  to  accelerate,  and  could  be  accelerated  with  the  least  risk,  would  be 
those: 

• whose producers currently have unused production capacity; 
• whose  designs  are  complete  and  relatively  stable  (i.e.,  not  likely  to  be  revised 
• whose systems and technologies are proven and well understood rather than de-

significantly in the near term); and 

velopmental or novel. 

Among  the  Deepwater  assets  that  can  be  viewed  as  currently  meeting  all  three 
criteria  is  the  National  Security  Cutter  (NSC).  The  Offshore  Patrol  Cutter  (OPC) 
can  be  viewed  as  currently  meeting  the  first  and  third  criteria.  With  regard  to  the 
second  criterion,  the  FY  2006  Deepwater  budget  request  includes  funding  to  com-
plete the design for the OPC. 

Question  6.  I’d  like  for  all  of  the  witnesses  to  elaborate  on  this  question  I  posed 
to Admiral Collins during the hearing. The Army—the only other Armed Service to 
use  the  ‘‘Lead  Systems  Integrator’’  approach—recently  backed  away  from  that  ap-
proach  in  their  Future  Combat  Systems  procurement  due  to  concerns  over  lack  of 
cost  control.  These  are  similar  to  the  concerns  that  GAO  raised  on  the  Deepwater 
Program.  Are  the  Army’s  new  arrangements  for  managing  this  contract  similar  to 
those that the Coast Guard has in place? Should the Coast Guard use this approach 
to ensure that the costs are kept down? 

1 John Birkler et al., The U.S. Coast Guard’s Deepwater Force Modernization Plan, Can It Be 
Accelerated?  Will  It  Meet  Changing  Security  Needs?  RAND  Corporation,  Santa  Monica  (CA), 
2004. pp. xix–xx, xxviii–xxix. Italics added for emphasis. 

2 At this point, the RAND report has a footnote that reads: ‘‘By integrate, we mean providing 
the  facilities,  training,  manpower,  and  other  implications  that  such  a  force  structure  might  re-
quire.’’ 

3 Ibid, p. xxix. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

Answer.  As  part  of  a  restructuring  of  the  business  aspects  of  the  Future  Combat 
System  (FCS)  program  announced  on  April  5,  2005,  the  Secretary  of  the  Army  di-
rected that the FCS Other Transaction Agreement (OTA) with the lead system inte-
grator,  Boeing/SAIC,  be  changed  to  a  Federal  Acquisition  Regulation  (FAR)-based 
contract that includes the Truth in Negotiations Act, the Procurement Integrity Act, 
cost accountability standards, and an organizational conflicts of interest clause. Boe-
ing/SAIC  remains  the  lead  systems  integrator  for  the  FCS  program.  The  FCS  pro-
gram  is  still  a  large,  system-of-systems  acquisition  program  that  is  being  executed 
for  the  government  by  an  industry  entity  acting  as  lead  system  integrator,  and  the 
FCS program continues to share this basic structural similarity with the Deepwater 
acquisition program. 

The  Army’s  recent  restructuring  of  the  FCS  program  also  included  the  following 

actions intended to strengthen the Army’s management of the program: 

• The  Secretary  of  the  Army  and  the  Chief  of  Staff  of  the  Army  will  conduct  an 

in-depth review of the program at least three times a year. 

• The  Secretary  and  the  Chief  of  Staff  will  serve  as  the  lead  Army  officials  for 

all major changes to the program. 

• The  Army  will  establish  an  Army  Modular  Force  Integration  Office  to  ensure 
that FCS technologies are incorporated into the Army as soon as they are ready, 
and  to  integrate  and  coordinate  the  FCS  program  with  evolving  Army 
warfighting doctrine and the Army’s emerging global communication and infor-
mation infrastructure. The new office will be overseen by the Acting Under Sec-
retary of the Army and the Vice Chief of Staff of the Army. 

• As an additional oversight measure, the Army Audit Agency, the Army Science 
Board,  and  an  outside  panel  of  advisors  will  conduct  periodic  independent  as-
sessments of program cost, schedule, and technical viability.4 

As points of comparison with the last of the above actions by the Army, the Coast 

Guard, has done, or is doing, the following: 

• During  the  source-selection  phase  of  the  Deepwater  Program,  the  Coast  Guard 
used  an  Independent  Analysis  Government  Contractor  (or  IAGC,  staffed  origi-
nally  by  the  MITRE  Corporation  and  later  by  Booz  Allen  Hamilton)  to  provide 
the  Coast  Guard  with  independent  assessments  of  the  bids  submitted  by  the 
three industry teams that competed for the right to become the Deepwater Pro-
gram  prime  contractor.  The  IAGC  was  stood  down  following  the  completion  of 
source selection.5 

• During  the  source-selection  phase  and  on  two  subsequent  occasions  (including, 
most recently, during the analysis that led to the revised implementation plan), 
the  Coast  Guard  turned  to  the  Logistics  Management  Institute  (LMI)  for  inde-
pendent cost estimates relating to the Deepwater Program.6 

• In early 2004, the Coast Guard used MITRE to perform an independent assess-
ment of the process the Coast Guard had developed for performing the Perform-
ance  Gap  Analysis  (PGA)  that  eventually  led  to  the  revised  Deepwater  Imple-
mentation Plan.7 

• As  of  late-April  2005,  a  third-party  assessment  of  the  use  of  competition  by 

ICGS was in progress.8 

The broad similarities between the Deepwater and FCS acquisition strategies, and 
the  Army’s  recent  actions  to  strengthen  its  management  of  the  FCS  program,  raise 
the following potential oversight questions for Congress: 

4 U.S.  Army  News  Release,  ‘‘Army  Announces  Business  Restructuring  of  the  FCS  Program,’’ 
April  5,  2005.  [http://www4.army.mil/ocpa/print.php?storylidlkey=7125]  See  also  Jen 
DiMascio,  ‘‘Army  Announces  Future  Combat  System  Contract  Restructuring,’’  Inside  the  Army, 
April 11, 2005; and Jonathan Karp and Andy Pasztor, ‘‘About-Face: Army’s Decision On Boeing 
Changes Philosophy,’’ Wall Street Journal, April 6, 2005. 

5 Source: Telephone consultation with Deepwater Program office, May 3, 2005. 
6 Ibid. 
7 MITRE  Corporation,  Independent  Assessment  of  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Deepwater  Performance 
Gap Analysis Process, McLean (VA), 2004. (Version 1.0, March 30, 2004, MITRE Center for En-
terprise  Modernization,  McLean,  Virginia).  A  copy  of  this  report  was  provided  to  CRS  by  the 
Coast Guard during the April 28, 2005 briefing. 

8 U.S.  Coast  Guard.  Oversight  and  Management  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Integrated  Deepwater 
System, Washington, 2005. (Rear Adm. Patrick M. Stillman, USCG, Program Executive Officer, 
Integrated  Deepwater  System,  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Headquarters,  Washington,  D.C.,  27  April 
2005) p. 5. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

• How do the Coast Guard’s arrangements for managing the Deepwater Program 
compare  to  the  Army’s  arrangements,  as  recently  restructured,  for  managing 
the FCS program? 
• Are the Army’s arrangements for managing the FCS program stronger in some 
ways  than  the  Coast  Guard’s  arrangements  for  managing  the  Deepwater  Pro-
gram,  and  if  so,  should  the  Coast  Guard  consider  adopting  the  stronger  Army 
measures? 
• How  does  the  Coast  Guard  compare  to  the  Army  in  terms  of  in-house  acquisi-
tion-management and system-integration expertise? Does the Coast Guard have 
enough  in-house  system-integration  expertise  to  conduct  complete  and  fully 
independent assessments of ICGS decisions and recommendations regarding the 
Deepwater Program’s system-integration approach? 
• Should  the  Coast  Guard  establish  a  standing  independent  organization—per-
haps  similar  to  the  Deepwater  source-selection  IAGC  (but  permanent  in  na-
ture),  or  to  the  Army’s  outside  board  of  advisors  for  the  FCS  program—to  pro-
vide periodic and ongoing assessments of ICGS decisions and recommendations 
regarding the Deepwater Program, including decisions relating to the program’s 
system-integration  approach,  or  to  solicit  and  assess,  on  an  ongoing  basis,  pro-
posed  innovations  for  the  Deepwater  Program,  particularly  from  firms  outside 
the ICGS team? 
• Have the Coast Guard and Army established a regular process for sharing with 
each  other  their  experiences  in  managing  the  Deepwater  and  FCS  programs, 
and  for  trading  ideas  for  improving  their  management  of  the  programs?  If  not, 
would the Coast Guard and Army benefit from establishing such a process? 

Question 7. Should the Coast Guard conduct an analysis of alternatives to ensure 

the Deepwater Program is on the right track? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  may  believe  that  the  performance  gap  analysis  (PGA) 
and  associated  analytical  work  that  the  Coast  Guard  did  to  arrive  at  the  revised 
implementation  plan  amounts  to  an  updated  Deepwater  analysis  of  alternatives 
(AOA),  and  that  another  AOA  consequently  is  not  needed  at  this  point.  As  a  cross- 
check  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  work,  a  possible  option  for  Congress  would  be  to  direct 
DHS  to  contract  for  an  independent  AOA  to  be  performed  by  an  entity  outside  of 
DHS that has the requisite analytical capability and independence from DHS. 

As  discussed  in  relation  to  an  earlier  question,  the  2004  RAND  report  on  the 
Deepwater  Program  recommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  explore  alternative  plat-
forms  and  technologies  for  meeting  the  service’s  expanded  post-9/11  mission  de-
mands.  An  AOA  could  form  part  of  the  process  for  exploring  such  alternative  plat-
forms and technologies. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:17 Nov 24, 2010 Jkt 062473 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\62473.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

